THE
MERRY TALES
OF THE
THREE WISE MEN OF GOTHAM.
THE MAN MACHINE;
OR,
THE PUPIL OF CIRCUMSTANCES.
I was
born, began the first Wise Man of Gotham,
in a country that I consider unworthy of my
nativity
,
and for that reason I shall do all in my
power to deprive it of the honour, by not
mentioning
its name. I am, moreover, descended from
a family, which must necessarily be of great
antiquity
,
since, like all old things, it has long since
fallen into decay. My father had little or no
money
,
but was blessed with the poor man's wealth,
a fruitful wife and great store of children. Of
these I am the eldest; but at the period I shall
commence my story, we were all too young to
take care of ourselves, until the fortunate
discovery
was made by some great philanthropist, that
little children, of six or seven years old, could
labour a dozen or fourteen hours a day without
stinting their minds, ruining their health, or
destroying
their morals. This improvement in the
great science of PRODUCTIVE LABOUR, delighted my
fatherit was shifting the
onus
, as the lawyers
say, from his own shoulders to that of his
children
.
He forthwith bound us all over to a
cotton
manufactory, where we stood upon our legs
three times as long as a member of congress, that
is to say, fourteen hours a day, and among eight
of us, managed to earn a guinea a week. The
old gentleman, for gentleman he became from the
moment he discovered his little flock could
maintain
himthought he had opened a mine. He
left off working, and took to drinking and studying
the mysteries of political economy and
productive
labour. He soon became an adept in this
glorious science, and at length arrived at the
happy
conclusion, that the whole moral, physical,
political
and religious organization of society,
resolved
itself into making the most of human labour,
just as we do of that of our horses, oxen, asses
and other beasts of burthen.
I was nine years old when I went into
bondage
,
and had previously learned to read and write
pretty fluently; for in my country there are few
so poor that they cannot obtain these advantages.
It was lucky for me, for I never learned any
thing afterwards but the art of adding to the
amount of productive labour. I continued in this
happy asylum of infant innocence till I was
thirteen
years old. I say happy, according to the
glorious science of productive labour. It is true
we had little to eat, but as we had but little time
to eat it in, it was of little consequence whether
we had plenty to eat or not. The short space
allowed us for eating had another great
advantage
,
as the superintendent assured us. By
swallowing
without chewing, our food was longer in
digesting, and of course administered more to our
nourishment. He instanced the snakes, who
always
swallowed their prey wholeand the wisdom
of serpents was proverbial. Food and time were
precious things, and people ought to make the
most of them. It was also a maxim with him
that too much liberty or leisure, was quite as bad
as too much food and too much time to eat it
in. It made people radicals and unbelievers.
Thus he clearly proved that the little we had to
eat, and the little time to eat it, was highly
beneficial
.
To enforce this salutary doctrine, there was a
system of fines, which for a long while made a
great hole in our pockets. Our moments were
all numberedthere was a fine for every moment
we exceeded the limited time of mealsa fine
for every moment we went beyond the specified
time allowed for all the ordinary operations of
naturea fine for looking out at a windowa
fine for opening a window, although we might be
suffocating in an atmosphere of cotton exhalations,
heated like an ovena fine for sneezing, lest we
should blow away some of the particles of
cotton
,
and thus diminish the amount of productive
labour. There was a fine for nodding over a
spinning jenney, when the poor souls, worn out
with the endless monotonous toils of the day,
involuntarily
sought refuge in a momentary
forgetfulness
.
In short, we were chained and enslaved
by a system of petty fines and exactions, which, in
addition to the certainty of being punished on
Saturday
night, when we brought home our
diminished
earnings, soon made us as docile as the
galley slave at his oar. We had neither time to
learn, nor inclination to play, for the short
intermission
of our labours was passed in dozing. We
became stupified in mind, and the functions of
our bodies gradually obeyed the impulses of the
engine, which gave life and motion to the
machinery
.
By the time I had been there three
years, I became sensible that my soul had
transmigrated
into a spinning jenney, and that I had
actually become a piece of machinery.
But the happy discovery that even little
children
of six or seven years old could add to the
amount of productive labour, instead of wickedly
eating and being merry at school or at play, was
fated to be improved upon, like every thing else
in this most improving age. Some persons of
rather
morbid sensibility, began to surmise that this
mode of calling out the productive labour of little
3
children of six or seven years old, was not
altogether
either humane or politic. It was
discovered
in the course of inquiry, that this
seclusion
from air, exercise, instruction and amusement,
together with the total absence of all variety in
the routine of their existence, each so essential
to the welfare and happiness of children, was
highly pernicious to their health, their morals and
their minds. Though it might add to the great
mass of productive labour, it was equally certain
that it also added to productive vice and
ignorance
.
Various plans were accordingly suggested
from time to time, for combining perpetual
confinement
and labour, with the necessary freedom,
instruction and amusement; and for arresting the
progress of moral and physical degeneracy, without
infringing upon the paramount claims of
productive
labourthe grand and only desideratum of
the social compact.
It was in pursuance of this great object that a
celebrated philosopher, or philanthropist, I hardly
know which, fortunately conceived a plan by
which these desirable effects might not only be
produced, but combined with an entire new state
of society, which would remove all temptation
to crime, and consequently all necessity for
punishment
.
Accordingly he lost no time in
establishing
in our neighbourhood a manufactory for
the spinning of cotton and the perfectibility of
man.
My father was quite taken with this
improvement
in the glorious science of productive labour,
which he considered would be killing two birds
with one stone; and for my part I was quite
willing
to go just whither he pleased. I had lost
all habit of thinking or acting for myself, and
being pretty well assured that I could not be
much worse off, felt perfectly resigned to go any
where else, than where I was. I never envied
any thing that I recollect, but a little bird that
had made its nest within view of the window
where I worked, and whose merry notes and
wayward liberty, sometimes brought the tears into
my eyes, without my knowing what was the
matter
with me. The superintendent caught me at
it one day, and fined me for losing time in wiping
them away with my sleeve. I accordingly joined
the new establishment with as little anxiety or
anticipation as the blind man changes his
prospect
.
When about five hundred men, women and
little children were got together, our master, the
manufacturing philosopher, made us a speech, in
which he proceeded to lay down his first
principles
.
I think I remember almost his very words,
for they made a great impression at the time,
and he often repeated them afterwards. My
memory being the only faculty I ever had
occasion
to exercise during the early part of my life,
has likewise become very retentive.
I consider, said he, the people employed in
my establishment as a part of the machinery, the
whole of which it is my duty and interest to
combine
,
so that every hand, as well as every spring,
lever and wheel, shall effectually co-operate
to
produce the greatest pecuniary gain to the
proprietors
,
which is what I understand by the perfectibility
of the Man Machine
.
[1]
[1]
There is such a remarkable coincidence between this and
the following positions, and those advanced in A New View of
Society, lately published, that we cannot help suspecting the
author
of the latter of having had a peep into the Wise Men of
Gotham.
You are well aware of the advantages of having
good substantial machinery, and the necessity of
keeping it clean, well arranged and in a high state
of repair; and that if it is allowed to get dirty, and
out of order, it produces unnecessary friction, and
consequently will not perform
the same quantity of
work
. If then a want of due care as to the state of
your inanimate machines, produces such
mischievous
results, what may not be expected when the
MAN MACHINE is suffered to get out of order by
neglect?
When you shall acquire a right knowledge of
these machines, their curious mechanismtheir
self-adjusting powerwhen the proper main spring
shall be applied to their various movements, you
will become conscious of their real value, and you
will be readily induced to turn your thoughts more
frequently from your inanimate to your living
machines
;
you will discover that the latter may be
easily trained and directed to procure A LARGE
INCREASE
OF PECUNIARY GAIN, while you may also
derive from them high and substantial gratification.
Now the main springs, or first principles, which
I would apply to the regulation of these
Men
Machines
,
are equally obvious and simple. In the
first place, I am fully satisfied that children are
merely compounded of corporeal machinery; and
that, as you may equally apply the powers of a
steam engine to the manufactory of cotton or the
destruction of mankind, so you may with equal
ease direct the machinery of man to good or evil
purposes. In the one case, it is done by regulating
the operation of the steam engine by certain rules
of science and experience, in the other by example
and education. Unhappily, however, the talents
and ingenuity of men, have lately been too much
turned to the object of improving inanimate
machinery
,
forgetting, it would seem, that the labour of
the Man Machine may, by proper regulation, be so
regulated and arranged
that one man may be able to
do the work of twenty
.
3*
Not only this, but I will venture to assert,
without
fear of contradiction, that as you may improve
the Man Machine so as to make it doubly
operative
in adding to the mass of productive labour; so
may you in like manner give it, at the same time, any
character you please, by means which are at the
command of all those who influence the affairs of
the world and take a proper advantage of
circumtances
.
I also assert, that a community may be
so trained, as to live without idleness, without
poverty
,
without crime and without punishment, by the
mere application of circumstances
.
[2]
[2]
The author of the New View of Society, has apparently
borrowed these sentiments.
Ed
.
I assert, in the second place, that the will of
man has no power over his opinions, and therefore
it is absurd to make him accountable for errors
which originate entirely in a defective system of
education, over which he has no control
whatever
,
at the period in which he receives all his
impressions
.
In fact, my dearly beloved machines, it
is susceptible of demonstration,
that from the
creation
of the world to the present time, all men have
been erroneously trained, and hence all the
inconsistencies
and misery of this world
.
[3]
[3]
3.
Hence, it arises
that generation after generation have been taught
crime from their infancy, and when so taught,
hunted like beasts of the forest, until they are
entangled beyond escape in the toils and nets of the
law. All this would have been avoided had
CIRCUMSTANCES
been altered. The judge would have
been at the bar, and the criminal on the bench.
From these undeniable facts, it results that as
the human machine cannot be accountable in the eye
of reason for opinions originating in an erroneous
system of education over which it has no control,
so neither can it be legally or morally accountable
for its actions so far as they are influenced by those
opinions. To punish the Man Machine for these
by fine, imprisonment or death, is therefore about
as rational and just, as to punish a spinning jenney
for going wrong, after being constructed on wrong
principles. Indeed nothing can be more absurd or
barbarous than the whole system of punishments.
Punishment, I will venture to assert, never has, nor
ever can have any effect to prevent the
commission
of crime, as is proved by the daily commission
of crimes, notwithstanding these punishments.
Punishment does not entirely prevent the
commission of crimes; therefore it does not prevent
them at all; therefore it is absurd, inexpedient, and
cruel. Experience therefore has settled the
question
.
But even if this were not the case, analogy
would be decisive on the subject. It is the opinion
of some of the best philosophers, that mankind
originally derived all their knowledge and a great
portion of their virtues from the example of the
beasts of the field; and certainly this is a much
better foundation, than the erroneous system of
education which has been pursued for the last six
thousand years, and which by gradually substituting
the precepts of blockheads, for the examples of
nature, hath brought ruin upon a thousand
generations
.
Look round then upon all nature, and see
what her unsophisticated votaries practice. Is the
eagle punished by the rest of his tribe for robbing
the fish-hawk of the prey he has attained by long
and laborious watchfulness? Is the rat or the
weasel clapt up in his hole, for the better part of
his life, by a jury of rats or weasels, for making
inroads upon a cheese, or robbing a hen-roost that
did not belong to him? Is the tyger hung in chains
by his self-styled rulers, for tearing a lamb to pieces?
Or is the lordly lion shut out from the light of
heaven, and fed on bread and water, because he
follows the instinct of nature in hunting down and
devouring the weaker animals? No, my dear
Men Machines, the wise animals of the forest, are
too reasonable to punish their fellows, for doing
what nature, habit, example, and education have
made it impossible they should not do.
Extend the analogy through all creation, and
you will find man alone arrogating to himself the
prerogative of punishing his fellow creatures, for
the absurd purpose of preventing crime. And
what has been the consequence? Beyond doubt,
mankind are absolutely allured into the commission
of crimes, by the very terror of punishment, in the
same manner, that birds are inevitably drawn into
the jaws of the serpent, from the actual fascination
of terror.
Besides this, it is demonstrable, that criminal
laws, instead of preventing, create crime, by
making
that criminal which was before innocent. I
recollect hearing an observation made by an
innocent
man, who had been forced into the
commission
of murder, by the erroneous system of
education
pursued for the last six thousand years, which
made a great impression upon me, and gave the
first hint of my New View of Society.
[4]
[4]
Another singular coincidence!
Ed
.
`Alas!'
said the unfortunate, or as the vulgar say, guilty
man`alas! what an unlucky being am I. If
society had not thought proper to punish murder, I
might have passed for an innocent man.' By
following
this train of reasoning we shall find that
the sole use of criminal law is to create criminals,
who are only so because the law capriciously
inflicts
punishments upon certain acts which would
otherwise be perfectly innocent.
The error of these wise lawgivers, is in
mistaking the real object and end of all laws.
They have been pleased to suppose, that laws are
intended as restraints upon the extravagant
impulses
of the PASSIONS, those phantoms which like
all other phantoms had their origin in the ignorance
and bigotry of mankind, and which I have
altogether
excluded from my New View of Society.
Now if religion and morality cannot prevent men
from committing crimes, what is the use of religion
and morality, or what is the use of laws to prop
up such a patchwork system? If one cannot
answer the end, all three together cannot do it. If
religious and moral impressions connot restrain
mankind from the commission of crime, then the
laws will not do it. If the stings of conscience, and
the fear of eternal punishment is insufficient; then
the fear of temporal punishment must be equally
sotherefore law and religion are entirely useless
in the world, and therefore I have banished them
entirely from my New View of Society. In fine,
my dear young pupils, be assured that crimes will
never cease in this world, till all punishments are
abolished, and mankind taught virtue by means
of an inveterate habit; by certain fixed and
inflexible
rules, inherent as it were in the Man Machine,
like the laws of motion which govern the spinning
jenney, and from which it cannot depart, without
a dissolution of its parts, equivalent to the
cessation
of motion called death, in the Man Machine.
Yes, my dear pupils, nothing is wanting to
restrain
these crying evils, and repair as far as possible
the miseries inflicted on the Man Machine for the
last six thousand years, by an absurd and erroneous
system of education, than an habitual, invariable, and
inflexible adherence to the sublime maxim,
that
self-love properly understood and uniformly
practised
,
is the basis of all virtue, as well as happiness,
in the social state
.
[5]
[5]
Here, again, the author of the New View has borrowed
from the Wise Men.
Ed
.
Instead of burthening you
with abstract principles of right and wrong, which
have no other effect than to confound all
distinctions
between virtue and vice, I shall merely
advise
you, whenever you have any doubt on the
subject
to consult your self-love, that is to say, in
other words, inquire what course will best conduce
to your own individual happiness, and depend upon
it, that will point unerringly to the happiness of
society. I will now dismiss you, the elder to the
instructive lessons of the steam engine and the
spinning
jenney; the younger to the play ground, where
they will be taught all the duties of self-love, at
leap-frog and jackstones. Take notice, however,
I prohibit you all from playing at push-pin, a game
which, by giving rise to mischievous ideas of
individual
property, may justly be denominated the
root of all evil.
Unfortunately I was too old to be permitted to
learn all my social duties in the play ground, so I was
dismissed to the spinning jenney for a lesson. Here
as before, I worked so many hours in the day for
the benefit of productive labour, and the honour of
the New View of Society, that I had little leisure,
and less inclination, to trouble myself with nice
distinctions
between the social and moral duties.
Indeed, I considered them as of little consequence
to the perfection of the Man Machine, recollecting
that nothing but self-love, properly regulated, was
necessary to the most perfect virtue and happiness.
Now I had as much self-love as most people, and
as my master had laid it down as the so very
excellent
a thing, I thought as a matter of course, the
more I had, and the more I indulged it, the better
for myself and the world. I soon found, however,
there was little or no room for cultivating and
indulging this excellent fundamental principle of
happiness. I had a natural inclination for good
eating, and my self-love was always particularly
gratified, by playing with children somewhat
smaller than myself, over whom I could exercise a
reasonable degree of influence and authority.
This propensity to ambition, was, however,
carefully
checked during the play hours, when we
were superintended by certain worthy old ladies,
who taught us, that the only ambition compatible
with a well regulated self-love, and the
perfectibility
of the Man Machine, was that of labouring
most advantageously for our master. As this was
a community of which the most perfect equality
was to be the basis; it would be highly improper,
they said, to attempt any undue exercise of talents
or energy. It would be only generating envy,
jealousy, and all those passions which had been the
bane of society, ever since the serpent seduced
Eve, with the temptation of superior knowledge.
As the whole system of our master-proceeded
upon the assumption, that the Man Machine was
as much without passions as a steam engine, and
that they were generated in him by the abominable
mode of education inflicted upon each succeeding
race, for the last six thousand years, he organized
the system accordingly. All the children, being of
course born without passions or desires, it was his
opinion that it was only necessary to tell them to
do right, and they would do it of course. We
were accordingly very seriously told, what all
children
,
so far as I know, have been told from the
creation of the world, that we were never to
injure our play-fellows, but on the contrary to
contribute all in our power to make them happy.
This principle, would our master say with
infinite
self-complacencythis principle, this simple
precept, when properly comprehended, if no
Counteracting
Principles
oppose its influence, will
4
effectually supersede all the errors which have
hitherto kept the world in ignorance and misery.
[6]
[6]
See New View of Society for similar doctrines.
Ed
.
But these counteracting principles, as our
master called them, and which I suspect were
nothing more than those passions which are
supposed
by some ignorant people to be implanted in
human nature, were always getting between his
legs, as it were, and tripping up his theory.
Emulation
was continually peeping forth, in one wicked
little rogue outrunning another, and thus mortifying
his feelings. In wrestling, the stronger machine
was very apt to impose upon the weaker, by
throwing
it down with as little ceremony as possible.
At leap-frog, a mischievous urchin would sometimes
designedly bump a little fellow down on his nose,
by not leaping high enough. In short, these
counteracting
principles were so troublesome and
inconvenient, that my master more than once
wished them fairly at the dl, they stood so in
the way of the perfectibility of the Man Machine.
My master was indeed sometimes highly provoked
at these counteracting principles, thus eternally
thrusting their noses into his plan of perfectibility.
It puzzled him confoundedly to find where his theory
was out at the elbows. At last he discovered that
his children were not young enough to give his
system a fair chance. It was his opinion that
children received those impressions which give a
decided direction to their future character, almost
the moment they are born. Nay, he went still
further, and maintained, with great appearance of
reason, that they took special notice of every thing
that happened at the time, he himself recollecting
perfectly well, being very much alarmed, when the
nurse first took him in her arms, least she should
let him fall on the floor.
Accordingly he determined to go to the
fountain
head, by introducing into the establishment
the institution of matrimony, and having the
children
begotten to his hands. I shall take them
ab ovo
, said he, a phrase of which I have since
learned the meaning, although at that time I did
not exactly comprehend it. The first born of this
new and perfect race in perspective, was a little
boy, who from the moment of his birth was
allowed
to hear nothing but the repetition of the
great precept, not to harm his play-fellows, but
to do all in his power to make them happy. At
three years old he was launched into the play
ground, and made his debut by biting the finger
of one of the matrons who presided over our
sports, and who attempted forcibly to keep him
from indulging the instinct of the Man Machine,
for dabbling in a mud-puddle. Our master cast
about for the counteracting principle that had
produced this enormity, that he might give it a
sound drubbing, and to his great satisfaction
discovered
it in a habit, which the mother had a long
time indulged, of biting her nails. This practice
was strictly forbidden; but as one of the
fundamental
principles of my master was, that no
punishments
were necessary to keep the Man
Machine
in order, any more than the steam engine,
nobody minded the prohibition, and the women bit
their nails, as usual, when vexed or perplexed.
Notwithstanding the all-powerful precept which
lays at the root of the perfectibility of the Man
Machine, and which was not spared upon the
little biting boy, there was some counteracting
principle which certainly baffled detection, or at
least opposition. By the time he was twelve
years old the machine became so completely out
of order, that my master turned him out of the
establishment as a disgrace to his theory.
Still the plan of inculcating perfection into the
Man Machine, by play, would certainly have
answered
the end completely had it not been for
two counteracting principles. The first, was
those same inconvenient products of that
erroneous
system of education pursued for the
last six thousand years, which my master called
circumstances, and which, coming perpetually
in conflict with his first principles, for a long
time pretty generally got the better, and routed
them completely. To subdue these entirely, or
to direct them uniformly to the furtherance of
that self-love, which is the source of all virtue
and happiness, was found rather of the nature of
an impossibility. The second counteracting
principle was, that the little pupils of the play
ground, by having their plays always prescribed
to them, and by being eternally under the eyes
of the superintending matrons, who were
perpetually
telling them not to do this and to refrain
from thatwho were in fact always standing over
them, repressing their gambols, directing their
sports and restraining entirely the free will of the
Man Machine, became at last entirely indifferent,
or rather frequently declined going out to play.
When they did, they preferred sitting quietly still,
rather than be perpetually restrained, lectured,
advised and dosed with the eternal repetition of
the grand precept. The consequence was, there
was no room for the practical exemplification of
the virtues of the system, at play. For my part,
although I was principally confined to the
spinning
jenney for instruction, I freely confess that
such was the weariness of mind and lassitude of
body, produced by this mode of eternal
supervision
over our hours of relaxation, that it became
4*
a task at last from which I was glad to escape
by sleeping away my play hours. But
notwithstanding
all these discouragements, the
practicability
of the system ere long began to be fully
exemplified. There was one little machine that
was at last brought, if not quite, very nearly, to
perfection. Owing to the absence of those
counteracting
principles which played the deuce with
most of the pupils, this little machine, at last
became so completely regulated, that my master
pronounced it almost as perfect as the machinery
of a cotton mill. If he had a task to do, he was
sure to do it exactly, and no more. If he was
told to go to a certain place, he could no more
be brought to go a step further than a horse in
a mill or a turnspit at the jack. He never
discovered
any disposition to excel his companions
in their sports or their exercisesnever did any
thing but what he was toldnever committed an
offencenever resented an affrontbut always
appealed
to the golden rule. In short, he seemed
happily free from the operation of those
mischievous
counteracting principles, erroneously called
the passions. If my master could only have made
us all exactly like him, we should have
represented
the millennium. But unfortunately there were
as yet too many counteracting principles among
us, to admit of universal HARMONY, and the
perfect
Man Machine fared but indifferently. He
was a sort of butt, and instead of righting his own
wrongs, always carried his complaints to the
matrons
.
This got him the name of tell-tale, and the
ill will of his fellows. My master considered him
as a living evidence of the triumph of his
system
,
and at length when he grew up, made him
one of his committee of management or supreme
junta. In the course of his performance of the
duties of this new station, he one day had occasion
to walk to a neighbouring town, on his way to
which he met a wagon, and not having my
master
,
or one of the matrons, to tell him what to
do, suffered it to walk right over him, while he
was considering the matter. He was the first
perfect Man Machine I ever saw, and my
master
ever afterwards held him up as an example.
I had now reached the age of eighteen; but I
must confess that my machinery was not a little
out of order. The perpetual routine of the same
employmentsthe want of those excitements, or
rather a field where the excitements of
emulation
,
ambition, desire of riches and distinction,
might bestir themselves, became at first irksome,
then stupifying. My faculties sunk into a
benumbing
apathy, for want of exerciseand my personal
activity expired under the drudgery of the same
daily task, neither more or less, that I had to
perform
as my contribution to the state of perfectibility.
Still I was fully persuaded that the system was
practicable
,
and that its operation would certainly produce
the perfection of the Man Machine, were it not for
the unlucky force of those counteracting
principles
which beset it on every side. Nothing, I was
convinced, but those vile passions, which are not
natural, but absolutely forced upon us, by a
preposterous
system of education for six thousand years
past, could possibly prevent its ultimate and final
consummation, in the perfection of the Man
Machine
.
But unfortunately these impertinent and
troublesome
passions, are always nestling about one's
heart, and playing the most intolerable pranks with
our machinery. In process of time there grew up
some young girls in our establishment, and I was
moved with a desire to marry. There was, it is
true, the most perfect equality reigning among us,
together with a perfect community of interests.
But it unluckily happened that, owing to some
counteracting principle or other, the machinery
of some of these damsels was better constructed,
more highly finished, and somewhat more sightly
than that of others. There was one especially who
was so superior to the rest that she played the
mischief
with my master's system of equality. All the
young fellows were anxious to marry her; and as
there was no community of goods allowed here, my
master's old enemies, the counteracting
principles
,
began to bestir themselves with great activity.
In vain he represented to us that it was only the
mischievous
influence of these villains that made us
think one woman better than anotherthat it
was their equally villainous coadjutors, the five
senses, and the rest of the gang of countervailing
circumstances, that assisted in leading us to the
preposterous
conclusion, that it was necessary to our
happiness we should marry this pretty girl. All
would not dowe quarrelled about itfought
about itand the machinery of the whole
establishment
was at times thrown into great confusion.
My master's indefatigable enemies, the
counter-acting
principles, were in fact continually at work,
throwing stumbling-blocks in the way of our
perfectibility
,
and going about like roaring lions among
us. It was enough to provoke a saint to see how
they succeeded for a time in thwarting the success
of my master's plans, for the harmony of the
universe
.
The great difficulty was to produce that
perfect state of equality which would preclude all
possibility of one machine envying another. Now
it happened unfortunately that this perfect equality,
and this perfect community of goods, which were
both so essential to the perfection of the system,
proved for a long time very difficult to preserve.
The least breath ripples even the stagnant pool,
and renders the surface unequal, and the least
circumstance
,
was sufficient to create jealousies and
rivalships among us, until by degrees, we quietly
sunk into a calm acquiescence to the will of the
committee of management, and acquired a habit of
perfect submission, which is one of the principal
ingredients in the pure state of perfectibility.
It was thus in our community. Although their
rights and their duties were all equaland all
equally shared in the common fund in proportion
to their labours; still, as those who had laboured in
the community ten years, had of course twice the
stake in the common fund of those who had only
laboured five, this single counteracting
circumstance
produced a broad and palpable inequality.
Accordingly a lady whose husband had twice the
claim on the great fund, did not fail to look down
on one who had not a claim to half as much. She
valued herself on her fortune, just as if it had been
in her own possession, and for aught I could see,
the passions engendered by this species of inequality
were precisely those of the world, in the degraded
state it has been brought to, by the erroneous
training
[7]
[7]
The author of the New View has borrowed this phrase.
Ed
.
of the last six thousand years. Nay, I
am sorry to say, they seemed far more bitter and
malignant, from the parties being continually as it
were under the same roof, and brought together
many times a day, every day of their lives. But
even if this provoking inequality had not existed,
there were other counteracting principles, which
assailed the Man Machine, from different quarters,
and occasionally put it out of order.
It sometimes happened, that one member of the
community by the regularity of his machine, and by
being perhaps less beset by those intolerable
rascals
,
the counteracting principles, would by a
course of conduct as regular as clock-work, entitle
himself to the special notice and rewards of our
master. This approach to perfectibility in the
Man Machine, instead of operating as an example
and stimulus to others, as it would have done but
for the counteracting principles, produced only
disorder. Every body was jealous of the unfortunate
Man Machine who had approached so much nearer
to perfectibility than themselvesinstead of
imitating
,
they envied him, not his perfectibility, but the
particular honours and rewards he acquired. To be
sure it is just so in the world, where the
counter-acting
principles go about like roaring lions; but
it ought not to have been so in our new state of
society; and that it was so, is to me quite
unaccountable
.
I speak from my own experience. My ambition,
which I take to be one of the counteracting
principles
,
at length prompted me to put my
machinery
in order, and make a dash at perfectibility,
that I might obtain the particular notice of my
master, and perhaps something more substantial.
I succeeded, and became the most miserable dog
in the community. I had upset the beautiful
system
of equality, upon which the whole
establishment
rested; I was no longer their equal, and they
began to envy, of course to hate me, by the mere
force of the counteracting circumstances. To
make my peace with these pragmatical machines,
and to restore the equilibrium of the society, I was
actually obliged to backslide a little in order to
bring myself down to the dead level of perfectibility.
Thus I found to my great mortification, that
individual
perfectibility, was incompatible with the
perfectibility
of the whole, and that the only way to
preserve HARMONY was to be no better than
other people.
The rascally counteracting principles,
received
aid and assistance from other sources, besides
the inequality of wealth, and the different
estimation
in which different persons were held by the
society at large, and especially by our master.
Some of the married women, had prettier children
than othersand this was a source of inequality.
Some were without any children at all, and sorely
envied their more happy next door neighbours,
whose pretty little curly pated machines, were
playing themselves into perfectibility on the lawn,
before their doors. On the other hand, some of the
men had better, younger, or prettier wives than
others
,
who not being specially instructed in such
matters
,
did frequently break the tenth commandment.
My master was, in truth, for a long while the victim
of counteracting circumstances; he at one time,
as I have heard, had serious thoughts of cutting off
all the women's noses, to bring them to a level, and
so organizing his men and women machines, by the
mere force of education, as that they should conform
to the law of nature which ordains, that every bird
shall lay only so many eggs within a certain period.
He had no doubt of bringing this about, if he could
only begin
ab ovo
, and dodge his old enemies the
counteracting circumstances.
But he was for some time deterred from this
plan by the astounding objection that, though he
might regulate the number of children, it would be
difficult, if not impossible, to regulate their looks,
and prevent one from being handsomer than
another
.
He had no doubt that nature produced none
of these ridiculous inconsistencies, but that they
were the offspring of that diabolical system of
education
under which mankind had groaned for the
5
last six thousand years. Some pigs, quoth he,
are, it is true, handsomer than othersbut then
the pig is sophisticated by associating with man,
and suffering under the influence of the
counter-acting
circumstances. Doubtless all young wild
boars are perfectly equal in a state of nature. I
will inquire into these matters. His inquiries
ended, I imagine, in conviction, for he attempted
some reforms in these matters; which caused so
much dissatisfaction among our women, that they
came near seceding in a body, and thus putting an
end to all prospect of the perfectibility of mankind.
My master accordingly gave up the point, satisfied
that though he might regulate the man machine to
some little purpose, the woman machine, was too
much under the influence of the counteracting
principles, ever to become perfect, without an
entire new organization.
Scarcely had this danger blown over, when a
dispute occurred, which again threatened the
destruction
of our HARMONY and the prospective
perfectibility of mankind. This affair
unfortunately
originated in too near an approach to the perfect
system of equality contemplated by my master.
There were two married women, living in opposite
sides of the square which formed our village, whose
circumstances, situation, husbands, children,
characters
and persons were so singularly equal in all
respects, that they hated each other mortally, for
no other reason that I could ever learn than
because
their pretensions were so equally balanced,
that the rest of the community could never agree
as to which was entitled to be considered the most
happy. What was still more provoking, as there
were no reasonable grounds of quarrel between them,
and nothing to complain of, they were obliged to
take it out in civil speeches. In this state of
affairs
,
one of them luckily discovered, that her best
room fronted north, while that of her rival looked
to the south, and consequently monopolized all her
sunshine, great part of the year. Here was a
manifest
hole in the elbows of my master's great
system
of equality. There was no dividing the
sunshine
equally among mankind. He might have
altered his village, so as to make the whole of it
front south: but his whole system so
completely
hung on the shape of his village, that it would
have fallen to the ground, on the least hint of an
alteration. He was horribly puzzled by this
counteracting
circumstance.
In the mean time, a northern and southern
interest
sprung up among us, such as prevails in
some countries, and founded upon equally
important
differences. The lady of the north front had
her faction, which held firmly to the principle,
that there was a manifest partiality in favour of
the lady of the south front; while the lady of the
south front had also her friends, who swore
roundly
that they could perceive a leaning in favour
of her of the north. Each had her party, whose
clamour was exactly loud in proportion to the
insignificance
of the occasion, the few causes of
excitement
among us, and the narrow sphere in
which they were exercised. In short, there was
the deuce to pay among the Men Machines, the
Women Machines, the first principles, and the
counteracting circumstances, which all pulled
different ways, so that my master hardly knew
which way to turn himself to get rid of these
implacable enemies. He was inclined to suspect
at one time, that it might be possible to shave the
chin of equality so close as actually to draw blood
from the patient, who, though his beard might be all
of equal length, might be himself in a humour to
knock him down. But he was not a man to knock
under to counteracting circumstances, nor any
such saucy fellows, while there was the remotest
prospect, to use his own words, of making one
woman to do the work of twenty,
[8]
[8]
See New View of Society for similar expressions.
Ed
.
of improving
man as an instrument of labour,
Ibid.
and training
him so as to produce a large increase of
pecuniary
gain, a return not less than fifty per cent.,
[9]
[9]
See New View of Society for similar expressions.
Ed
.
on all the investments and expenditures for the
improvement
of the Man Machine.
But these pestilent villains, the counteracting
circumstances, were not so easily managed as
might be expected. They had in the long
period
of six thousand years, in which the Man
Machine
has been debauched and corrupted by
education
,
insomuch that it is a thousand miracles
that his machinery is not irretrievably out of order
I say, they had acquired such power, and withal
such a thorough knowledge of the Man Machine,
that as fast as they were driven out of one door
they popped in at another. Nay, if the doors
were all shut they climbed in at the window,
and if there was no window, they managed to
squeeze themselves through the keyhole. Thus
in the case of the two ladies of the northern and
southern exposure; my master had no sooner
quieted the two factions, by demonstrating that
to be out of the sun in summer, was equal to
being in it in winter, when the counteracting
circumstances, like vile traitors as they were,
changed sides before you could say Jack Robin
5*
son, and the Men Machines forthwith fell into a
great quarrel, about which party would have been
in the right, provided the case had stood as they
originally apprehended. As to the two ladies,
they hated each other worse than ever, when they
found my master had decided there was not a toss
up of copper between them. Marry come up,
my dirty cousin, exclaimed each of the otherI
should be very sorry if I was no better than I
should be.
But I have not come to the worst yet. Not only
the wicked counteracting principles, played
pranks with my master, but it sometimes unluckily
happened that his own principles would turn upon
him, and show their teeth terribly. For example,
it was easy to comprehend the simple principle of
self-love, which, as I have said, constituted the great
primum mobile
of the Man Machine, according to
my master's theory. But to apply it successfully to
the attainment of the great end of perfectibility
was a different affair. When the good man talked
to them about the absolute necessity of attending
exclusively
to the happiness of self
,
[10]
[10]
See New View of Society, p. 18, for similar doctrines.
as the only
means of promoting the happiness of the
community
,
they were extremely apt to comprehend this,
as not only a permission, but an exhortation, to
follow
the bent of their passions and appetites, or in
other words, the counteracting principles,
without any regard to the happiness of others,
taking for granted that would come as a matter of
course. My master in vain attempted to set the
Man Machine going according to the nice
adjustment
of the self-love and social principles. The
one was perpetually getting the better of the other,
being a hot-headed self-willed rascal, and withal a
great bully; while the other had hardly a word to
say for itself. It was in vain to threaten an appeal
to the laws, for as there was to be no crimes in our
community, there was no necessity for restraints or
punishments.
I will give an example here, of the terrible
blunders
some of us made, in the application of this
grand fundamental principle of my master, whose
whole system, I am convinced, was perfect, except
that it was not calculated for the particular kind of
Men Machines, he had to do with. These have
been so bedeviled, by the horrible system of
education
pursued for the last six thousand years, that
I question whether it will not take at least six
thousand years more, to put their machinery in
perfect
order. But to my example.
There was among us, a wild, sprightly man
machine
,
which, owing to being as it were, under high
steam pressure, was continually getting into the
claws of the counteracting principles, and
making sad misapplications of my master's precepts.
It was next to impossible to bring his passions and
appetites under the dominion of metaphysicks, or
to instil into him a proper comprehension of the
great abstract truth, that the indulgence of our
self-love
,
consists in restraining it. One day my
master brought him up before us all, for the
purpose of lecturing him for the benefit of the
community.
Well, Sandy, quoth my master, mildly, I am
afraid I shall never be able to make a perfect
machine
of you.
How so, sir, replied Sandy.
Why, you are continually violating the sublime
fundamental principle of self-love.
I don't know how that can be, sir, for I do all I
can to gratify it, as you have convinced me it is my
duty to do.
Yes, but you did not properly comprehend me.
The self-love I mean, is the sacrifice of our wishes
and desires to those of othersit is in fact the
absence of all self-love.
Why did you not tell us so at first, said Sandy,
rather sulkilyI'm sure I should never have
thought that it was possible a thing could be exactly
what it is not.
That doubt is owing to the imperfection of our
sophisticated nature, which cannot comprehend the
sublime truth, that man is a machine, originally
constructed with a due regard to the two great
moving principles of matter, the centripetal and the
centrifugal forces. By the first, his passions,
appetites
,
wants, wishes, desires, and gratifications, are
perpetually urging towards the centre, thus
exclusively
concentrating in his own individual
gratification
.
By the second, a continued endeavour is
made to resist and overpower the first, by forcing
or attracting the passions and appetites from this
disposition towards the centre or self, and giving
them a wider and more beneficial sphere of
indulgence
.
It is in the proper balancing and
restraining
the centripetal force of the passions, by the
interposition of the centrifugal, that these, the
gratification
of which is the grand object of
self-love
,
become the foundation of all worldly happiness,
and constitute the perfect state of the Man
Machine
.
This confounding of matter and spirit, and
jumbling together the ideas of mechanical, physical
and moral action, was what always puzzled us, and
gave an air of incomprehensibility to my
master's
theories. The Man Machine Sandy, was at
first either convinced, or confounded, I hardly know
which; but he soon rallied again, and to say the
truth, I sometimes was half inclined to think his
common sense pretty nearly put my master to a
dead halt.
You have exactly hit upon my case, sir, and the
very difficulty that prevents me from becoming a
perfect machine in the shortest time possible.
Somehow or other, I can't get this same
centrifugal
force, my master talks of, to do its duty. It
is a lazy, lounging, indifferent principle, that is
half the time asleep while the other is as busy as
a bee, and some way or other, manages to get the
better nine times in ten. My good wishes, instead
of going abroad now and then, as they should do,
are almost always attracted to the centre by that
rascally centripetal gentleman you mentioned.
That is because you don't suffer my
fundamental
principles to operate upon you properly;
and wilfully resist the natural and inevitable result
of a perfect system of education, which can be
nothing less than a perfect state of the Man
Machine
.
Indeed, sir, I don'tI try all I can to love
myself
in the proper manner; and to be persuaded
that perfection is as easy as kiss your hand. But
somehow or other, I confess I do love Jenny
better
than Kateand the centripetal principle
especially
moves my self-love to prefer kissing her, to
seeing any body else do it.
Out upon you, exclaimed my masterthis
is all owing to the counteracting principles.
What are they, sir. I confess I never could
fairly understand them.
Whyhemwhyhahehummy
master
appeared a little puzzled hereWhy the
counteracting
principles are a sort ofa kind of
stumbling-blocks, which education, habit, and bad
systems have thrown in the way of the
perfectibility
of man. In short, they are what I call
circumstances
.
I reckon you mean the wants, desires, and
passions
of us Men Machines, quoth Sandy.
And I reckon you are a great blockhead,
exclaimed
my masterHow often have I told you
that the Man Machine has naturally, neither wants,
desires or passionsThey are the product of that
erroneous training which has produced all the
miseries and inconsistencies of this world.
What! no passions, sir?
Nonenot an atom more than a piece of
calves-foot
jelly.
Why, Lord bless you, sir, I always heard say,
that if we had no passions, desires, and all that
sort of thing, we should be without any motives of
action whatever.
Poohself-love would keep us going.
But what is this self-love, sir?
A bundle of circumstances, quoth my master.
I reckon its a bundle of passions, quoth
Sandy.
And I reckon thou art a confirmed,
incorrigible
,
irreclaimable blockhead of a Man Machine,
cried my master in a great passionI say, sir, may
the dl take thee for a sophisticated idiotI
affirm that man is born without passionsthat there
are no such scoundrels in the creationthat they
are nothing but circumstancescircumstances, sir
counteracting principlescounteracting principles,
sirwhich an erroneous system of education has
conjured up to the confusion of all those who
labour for the perfectibility of the Man Machine.
Hereupon my master seized Sandy by the
shoulders
,
and would have thrust him forth from the
community had he not offered to acknowledge the
supremacy of circumstances, to knock under to
the counteracting principles, and swear there
were no such villains as the passions in this world.
After all, quoth Sandy, a little doggedly
after all, thank fortune, I am not answerable
either for my opinions or my actions.
Not answerable!I'll make you know to the
contrary, sirrah.
No, siryou tell us every day that the will of
man has no power over his opinions, and that it is
therefore absurd to make him accountable for his
errors. You teach us, that children have no
control
over their early education, which is conducted
uniformly upon mischievous principlesthat they
are not only taught to think and reason wrong, but
actually to commit those crimes for which they
are afterwards punishedthat, therefore, when they
grow up they cannot be justly charged either with
the errors of their opinions or the wickedness of
their actions.
[11]
[11]
See New View of Society, pp. 83, &c. &c. for similar
doctrines.
I thank my stars, therefore, that
if I think or act wrong, my teachers are to blame,
not I.
Here was the mischief to pay again among the
counteracting principles, which thus turned short
upon my master, and bit him shrewdly. His first
and great principle, that the errors and
inconsistencies
of men proceeded entirely from an
erroneous
system of education, and that they were
therefore not accountable for them, here did him
the worst office that could be. It convicted him,
in the sight of the whole community, of getting in
a passion contrary to fundamental principles, and
that the man who professed to teach perfectibility
was himself imperfect.
He might as well attempt, thought I, to teach
music without understanding the gamut. But
6
this was a momentary doubt, which soon yielded
to the force of habit, and I still continued to
think my master a perfect Man Machine, although
the counteracting principles were sometimes
permitted to assail him, as Satan did Job, merely
to try his patience.
The Man Machine Sandy continued to
exemplify
from time to time the influence of the
centripetal
force, and the mischievous activity of the
counteracting principles. He was perpetually
demonstrating
the notion of my master, concerning
the diabolical errors of an erroneous system of
education. But these errors being, according to his
theory, not his fault, but that of his parents who
were both dead, could not be punished without a
terrible
perversion of justice. To compromise matters
as well as he could, my master at length dismissed
him into the wide world, where, as I afterwards
learned, the poor fellow, acting upon the principle
of not being accountable for his opinions or actions,
appropriated to himself certain bank notes that did
not belong to him, and was hanged in defiance of
all the rules of justice, as well as in utter disregard
to the sublime notion of a community of goods.
In the course of my master's experiments upon
the Man Machine, there were a great many
machines
that left the establishment, or were turned
away for being too much under the influence of the
counteracting principles. They took with them
their share of the common stock which had
accumulated
during their induction into the mysteries of
perfectibility; but somehow or other there were so
many deductions, for this, that and the other matter,
that the Men Machines complained loudly at the
smallness of their dividend. But there was no help
for it; for my master's system proceeded entirely
upon the principle, that as the Men Machines who
presided over this perfect establishment, must of
necessity be entirely and exclusively perfect in
themselves, there was no necessity to guard their
administration of the public fund, with that jealous
circumspection requisite towards less perfect rulers,
in a less perfect system.
Upon the whole, however, our community
sustained
its numbers pretty well. The children that
were born, and the recruits that came in from time
to time, prevented any apparent diminution. For
my part I had no inclination to leave the
establishment
.
I had at last become a model, as my master
assured me, of a perfect Man Machine. I had
neither virtues to exercise, nor counteracting
principles
to lead me astray. I worked my task as
regularly as the spinning jenney went through hers:
I ate like a machine, at a particular timeI slept
by rule, rose by rule, and did every thing by rule.
In short, I did every thing like a perfect machine of
a man. In process of time our whole community
also arrived at a perfectibility that was truly
astonishing
,
considering its apparent impossibility. It
might be said that we had neither virtues nor vices,
at least there was neither room for the exercises of
the one, nor excitement for the indulgence of the
other. There is no doubt that we all became
quite perfect.
My master valued himself exceedingly at having
at last got completely the upper hand of his old
enemies, the counteracting circumstances. He had
not the least doubt but that his system would in a
little time be universally adopted, and that there
would then be no further use for law or gospel in
this perfect state of society. But of all the pieces
of machinery ever invented, the most wayward,
perverse, and inconsistent beyond all doubt is the
Man Machine. No sooner does it become perfect,
but it begins to decay, grows rickety and good for
nothing. At least so it was with the machinery of our
establishment. Our perfectibility at last centered
exclusively in the performance of our daily duties.
These consisted in working at our tasks regularly
eating, drinking, sleeping regularlyand in fact
doing every thing we had to do with a regularity
becoming perfect machines. Every thing was in
common; therefore no one was in want; and
therefore
there was no room for the exercise of charity
and benevolence. The children were all taken
care of by the community, and the aged and sick
were nursed and sustained by persons expressly ap
pointed to superintend themthe relative duties of
parent and child, were therefore of little
consequence
among us, and were seldom or ever called
into exercise. In short, as the system of our society
was so perfect as not to require the cement of
mutual
wants, mutual weaknesses, and mutual
dependence
,
there was no room, nor indeed any occasion,
for the exercise of the social virtues, except so far
as they are negatively exercised in refraining from
actual violence or injury.
Again, as the perfection of my master's system,
and of his Men Machines, consisted in the total
absence of the passions, or rather the annihilation
of the counteracting principles, it is obvious that this
could only be brought about by the absence of
those excitements which stimulate them into
rebellion
.
In removing these, it was requisite, or
rather it was unavoidable, that most if not all the
motives for any extraordinary exertion of talent, or
vigorous exercise of the intellect, should be
wanting
.
Our talents, therefore, as well as our virtues,
soon became rusty for want of exercise. Our
master and the committee of management,
[12]
[12]
See New View of Society, Constitution, Laws, &c. for similar
provisions.
were
the only persons to whom the exercise of any but
the working faculty, was at all necessary. They
6*
thought for us, and they acted for us. They made
the laws, and they administered them. They took
care of our morals, our manners, and our money,
while we, thrice happy machines, had nothing to do
but move ourselves about, with all the regularity of
a spinning jenneywe worked by rule, ate by rule,
slept by rule, and were as merry as so many
cabbages
,
growing in regular lines. As the endeavour
to excel our companions, in any thing but work,
would have savoured of a design to overturn the
perfect system of equality, all such unseemly
ambition
was studiously repressed as one of the
mischievous
counteracting principles which it was
necessary to put down in the most summary
manner
.
As there was no such thing as exclusive
property
in our community, and even a man's soul
could not be called his own, being under the
exclusive
direction of my master's first principles
the passion of avarice, or the desire of
accumulation
,
had certainly less influence over us, and we
worked solely for the good of the whole. It is true
we did not labour with that spirit and alacrity men
do when they are labouring for themselves, but from
a habit acquired by the machine, which went its
regular course day after day. But this, my
master
considered as the highest proof of
perfectibility
,
which properly understood, consisted in
doing every thing necessary to the happiness
of the community not from a sense of duty
but from a habit acquired by the Man Machine.
It is much better, would my master say,
to do good from habit than impulse, sentiment,
or feeling, which are such capricious rascals they
can never be depended upon. On the whole
there is no doubt but we actually became perfect
machines. We believed in all my master's first
principlesin the encouragement of crime for
the last six thousand years, by an erroneous system
of educationin the non-accountability of man for
his opinions or actionsin the wickedness of
punishing
crimesthe division of labourthe
community
of goodsthe perfect equality, and above all,
in the committee of management. If this was not
perfection, I believe there is no such thing in this
world.
But scarcely had my master demonstrated the
great truths of the New View of Society, and made
his Men Machines quite perfect in their evolutions,
when his old enemies the counteracting principles,
rallied again, and became as troublesome as ever.
My master in a little time discovered, that though
it was quite easy to make the Men Machines
perfect
,
it was not quite so easy to keep them so. As
the inanimate machine becomes rickety, out of
order, and wears out in time, so does the animated
machine called man, continually give way to that
mischievous counteracting principle, called
backsliding
.
Scarcely therefore were the great
counteracting
principles, of ambition, love of glory, and
desire of knowledge, thus totally subdued, than the
lesser and more ignoble ones began to cut a figure,
like corporals and sergeant-majors, in the absence
of the commanding officers. The counteracting
principle of envy, the most grovelling,
contemptible
,
and at the same time, the most malignant,
began to erect itself, and to do the duty of half a
dozen others, in sowing the seeds of dissolution in
the perfect system of society. Experience, as I
sometimes thought, gradually developed a truth
that my master had left out in his catalogue of
counteracting circumstances, to wit, that it is utterly
impossible to place the Man Machine in any
situation
where he is out of the reach of the
counteracting
principles. On a desert island, said I,
mentally, in my moments of disappointment, where
no other human being exists, it actually seems that
he will envy his fellow men the enjoyment of social
intercourse, and the birds the wings that enable
them to go whither they will, while he is confined
to his solitude. Place him in a dungeon, and,
I dare say, he will envy others the enjoyment of air,
exercise, and free action. Place him in beggary,
and he will very likely envy the dog his boneand
place him on a throne, he will envy the poorest
peasant his ruddy health and active limbs.
Where-ever
there is inequality of any kind, there, as it
would seem, will envy subsistand if it were
possible
to produce the most perfect equality in
physical
and mental qualitiesin every species of
possessionin all that Providence can bestow
upon man, I could almost swear there would
still be the same necessity for the ten
commandments
as the rules of our actions, and of laws
to enforce them, that there is at this moment.
Yet for all this you are not to suppose that I have
ever doubted, except in momentary intervals of
vexation or disappointment, the possibility of
introducing
a universal state of perfectibility into this
world, provided it is not destroyed too soon to give
my master's first principles a fair chance of
operating
upon the Men Machines. How long did
mankind
go on patiently doing the work of steam
engines
and spinning jenneys, until an inspired
nobleman
suggested the idea of the one, and an inspired
barber demonstrated the possibility of the other?
Ages elapsed from the first suggestion of the
application
of the power of steam to mechanical
purposes
,
and the application itselfand still other
ages, before the machine was perfected. Can we
then expect that the Man Machine, equally
complicated
in its mechanical organization, will all at
once spring into perfection? No, my friends; as
the nice skill of the moulder labours whole days to
prepare for the perfect casting, so must the nice
skill of the reformer labour whole years, not to
say centuries, to produce the perfect man. Nothing,
I am convinced, is necessary to the perfectibility of
the human machine, but the same labour and
perseverance
which has perfected the steam engine and
cotton machinery, co-operating with the proper
application of circmstances and the absence of
the rascally counteracting principles. Then,
gentlemen
then
there will be no further occasion for
laws or religionpunishments or rewards
potentates
or presidents,the whole universe will be
governed by A COMMITTEE OF MANAGEMENT, of
which I expect to be treasurer, and then
Hey diddle diddle, the cat and the fiddle,
The cow jumped over the moon
Here the Man Machine jumped up and began to caper
about till he came nigh oversetting the bowl, and
putting an end to the perfectibility of man at once.
It was some time before he recovered his gravity
sufficiently to proceed, as follows:
But however this may be, I must confess that
besides the little malignant counteracting principle
of envy, which is ever the substitute of emulation
and ambition, there were certain other
circumstances
,
as my master called them, such as those
unnaturally natural appetites, or instincts, which,
however trifling and contemptible, like rats and
mice on board a ship, often endangered his whole
system. These were perpetually thrusting
themselves
forward in the disguise of a preference of
beauty to deformityof light hair to darkof
blue eyes to blackof youth to ageof fair to
brown, and of brown to fair. Sometimes two
machines
would agree in their preferences, and this
agreement at once gave play to a whole train
of counteracting circumstances, which caused my
master infinite trouble and vexation. At other
times two machines would differ about what my
master in his New View of Society, had expressly
stipulated there should be no difference about.
For instance, one was a presbyterian, another an
episcopalian, and another had no religion at all.
This was sufficient for argument, which on such
subjects generally becomes contention, and often
abuse. In the great and good-for-nothing old system
of society which subsists in the world, where the
excitements
to the passions are divided and subdivided
almost to infinity, such disputes are easily
forgotten
and forgiven, except among those whose
interest
it is to keep up the antipathy of sects. But
in our community, we had so few causes of
excitement, that one answered the end of the
whole, and seemed to concentrate within itself
the fury of all the passions. No matter
therefore
what was the cause, however insignificant, it
produced the same effects. The perfect Man
Machine
who saw his neighbour machine receive
particular notice or approbation from my master,
envied as bitterly as the courtier who sees his rival
supersede him in the favour of the king. My
master lectured away, on the sublime principle
of self-love, but it all would not do. That
incomprehensible
scoundrel, human nature,
seemed
to set his face against him; and it happened
too often that the man of nature, aided by the
rascally counteracting circumstances, got the better
of the Man Machine and caused him to backslide
exceedingly.
But my master did not despair, for amidst all these
discouraging circumstances, the common fund
increased
,
and the committee of management had
every year a larger amount of property to manage
for the community. But for my part, I began to be
discouragednot that the reflections I have just
now made, occurred to me at that time; they are
the product of succeeding experience in the great
world. I firmly believed, and believe still, that
the fault of all this was not in my master's
system
,
but in human nature, that is to say, human
nature debased and corrupted by six thousand
years of erroneous training, as my master
called
it.
Rome was not built in a day, said my
master
one timeand a system of six thousand years
can only be completely routed by a
counteracting
system of equal duration. I shall not live to
see itbut it will certainly happen; if my
system
is pursued six thousand years it will become
completely successful. I will not despair. And
who knows after all what may happen? Who
knows but the moral perfectibility may bring about
the mechanical perfectibility of the Man Machine.
If my system can only prevent, as I have proved
it can, for a time, the commission of all sin, then
of course there will be no necessity for future
rewards
and punishments, and as a natural
consequence
no necessity for a man to die. Who
knows but I may live long enough to see the
millennium? It is only applying the principle of
perpetual motion to the Man Machine.
My master was highly delighted with this new
light, and went on with new hopes and
spirits
.
He was quite sure his Men Machines had
been perfect, at least for an hour or two, and
though they had afterwards got a little out of order
he had fairly established his principle, that they
were susceptible of absolute perfectibility. All
therefore that was necessary was to make this
perfectibility everlasting, and this could only be
done by operating upon a long succession of
generations
of Men Machines. So he held faster to
his system than ever, and so did I. Indeed I had
no doubt that each succeeding race of our
community
,
provided they were properly trained, and
the counteracting principles could be kept down,
would approach nearer and nearer to the perfect
state, and at length reach it permanently at last.
7
Nay, I carried my anticipations so far as to
calculate
that in the course of three or four centuries,
at farthest, our surplus fund would increase to such
an extent as to enable my master, if he lived so
long, to purchase all the land in the kingdom, and
thus make perfect Men Machines of all my
countrymen
by actually buying them up as we do other
machinery.
But alas!one of my master's old and desperate
enemies, was destined, by that envious
Providence
which, as it would seem, could not bear
to see a vile system which it had permitted to exist
for six thousand years, routed by his New View of
Society, to destroy all my anticipations in the bud.
My master had unaccountably forgot, that in order
to make his system complete, it was necessary that
the rulers as well as the people should be equally
perfect. A reciprocity of perfection was
indispensable
.
But here my master's system was terribly
out at the elbows, and presented a signal example
of the extreme difficulty of introducing perfection
into this world, or in other words, of reconciling
impossibilities. It is obvious that the Men
Machines
,
having the management of the surplus
fundthe buying and sellingin fact, every thing
connected with the pecuniary affairs of the
community
,
must of necessity mix with the world and
become acquainted with the value of money, the
arts of bargaining, and other matters indispensable
to a judicious superintendence of our fund. They
would therefore be assailed not only by the bad
examples of people educated in that erroneous
system which has prevailed for six thousand
years, but also by all those temptations, or
counteracting
principles, which constitute what are
called the seductions of the great world. It is
hardly possible, therefore, but that their machinery
should get more or less out of order, and they
themselves
backslide from the summit of perfectibility.
Thus it happened that the treasurer of our
establishment, who, at the time of his election, was
considered the most perfect Man Machine amongst
us, being assailed by the counteracting
principle
called a love of money, and by the other
counteracting principle, the desire of
appropriating
other people's property to his own use,
played us all a saucy trick. He fell from grace
his machinery got terribly out of order; and
he backslided into a far country with nearly the
whole proceeds of the surplus fund we had been
labouring to accumulate for years. The
committee
of management ran after the treasurer
my master ran after the committee, and we were
left alone like so many babes howling in the
wilderness
.
Having been so long in leading strings,
not one of us could walk alone, and it became
sufficiently evident that after all, the perfectibility
of the system entirely depended, not upon our
selves, but upon a runaway treasurer, a runaway
committee, and a runaway reformer. From the
mere force of habit our machinery continued to
perform its taskto eat and sleep, to rise in the
morning and lie down at nightbut the rest was
all a vacuuma blanka state of absolute
perfectibility
,
produced by a state of stagnation.
In process of time my master, who was
perfectly
innocent of all participation in the fraud
of that infamous Man Machine, the treasurer,
except in so far as he had not sufficiently provided
against the influence of the counteracting
circumstances
,
returned from an unsuccessful
pursuit
of many hundred miles. We had now the
world to begin again. But to say the truth,
perfectibility
is such a horrid dull thing, and there
was such a want, a total absence of the charm of
variety in our lives and occupations, that for some
time past a great portion of our community had
hung loose upon the establishment. It was only
the cement of the surplus fund, that kept them
together, and that being gone they longed like
children, for such in fact they were in knowledge
of the world, to go forth and see its distant
wonders
.
In one word, they sighed for that freedom
of will, that release from eternal restrainteternal
supervisionand eternal monotony, which they
were obliged to submit to, in order to arrive at
perfection. The idea of freedom was so
exquisitely
grateful, that they forgot their losses, and in a
little time, in spite of my master's exhortations,
and the logic of his New View of Society which he
read over to them six times, they flew away like
gay birds in all directions, leaving him a
disconsolate
teacher without any scholars, but myself, and
a few of the lame, blind and incapable of the
community
who were left behind. The ties of kindred
and the feelings of humanity had, in truth, been
very much weakened for want of exercise in our
establishment, if they were not entirely left out in
the march to perfectibility. What became of the
grown up children, thus putting themselves upon
their country, destitute of the habits and
experience
necessary to self-government, security, nay,
existence in the wide world, I know not to a
certainty
.
I have heard that many of them were
wrecked upon the unknown coast of the world, and
that the remainder, during a great part of their
lives, were indebted for support, to that society
which they had deserted, in pursuit of perfection.
My business is not however with them. I am to
relate my own story, which will exemplify the
situation of human beings, such as it would in all
probability be in the event of the ill success of
my master's great plan, and the consequent
necessity
of their again mixing with the world as it is,
with the obligation of obeying its laws, conforming
to its institutions and fulfilling its duties.
I continued with my master some time after the
backsliding of the treasurer, and the dispersion of
7*
his flock. Notwithstanding his little eccentricities,
I could not help liking him for the trouble he took
to make the world perfect. Besides, as the
apostate Man Machine of a treasurer could not
run away with the village, the land and the
improvements
,
our establishment was not altogether
ruined, and recruits begun to flock in from time to
time. It would seem indeed that whatever may
be the situation of a man, good, bad, or indifferent,
there will always be found some one to occupy it
the moment it is vacant. Be this as it may, my
master railed more than ever against the
erroneous
system of education pursued for the last six
thousand years, and I verily believe would actually
have hung up the counteracting principles in a
row, could he have fairly got them in his clutches,
notwithstanding his opinion of the injustice of all
punishments.
We used to hold conversations together, and
my master, who had great confidence in the
perfection
of my machinery, frequently consulted
me on the subject of either converting these
vile counteracting principles to his own notions,
or exterminating them entirely. On one of these
occasions, I thought I would bring him fairly to
the point, by asking what he meant exactly by
these counteracting principles, which seemed to be
always in his way.
To tell you the truth, sir, said I, although
my corporeal Man Machine is perfect, so far as
respects its being entirely and exclusively governed,
directed, set going and stopped, by the great
principle
called the force of habit, whereby the
mischievous
influence of the passions is entirely
obviated
;
yet I fear that I am not equally perfect in
my comprehension. I confess, sir, I have never
yet been able to understand exactly which you
mean by the counteracting principles. I have no
doubt they are a set of diabolical rascals, but I
should like to have so particular a description that
I might know them half a mile off, and get out of
the way when I saw them coming.
What I mean, replied he, after some
considerable
pausewhat I mean by the `
counter-acting
principles,' or `the force of
circumstances
,'
is, all those vices, follies, inconsistencies,
absurdities
,
habits, principles, and feelings, which an
erroneous system of education for the last six
thousand
years has implanted in the human race, so as
to change, as it were, their very natures, making
them almost unsusceptible of perfectibility, and
it would seem, incapable of remaining perfect
when I have made them so. O! if I could only
get rid of these, what a world I would make
of itthere would be no use in a better, I
promise
you.
I was just as far off as before, and went on.
May I ask, sir, what you mean by an erroneous
system of education?
A system which counteracts human nature,
sir.
But how, sir?You have always told us that
human nature is nothing but a bit of wax, on
which any impression may be made, if taken while
it is soft. It seems to me, though I know I am
mistaken, that there can be no such thing as
human
nature, and therefore that it cannot be
counteracted
by an erroneous system of education.
Right, sirrighthuman nature is an absurdity,
a non-entityaain short, man is nothing but
a machine, and his nature, or the first principle of
his existence, nothing more than the force of an
innatean innateanalaw of matter like that
which causes the wheel to go in a circle, and the
runner in a horizontal line.
But it has often puzzled me, sir, whyif
human nature is a mere machine with its one
inflexible law of action like that of a wheelwhy
you should take so much trouble to make it go
better. But after all, sir, I don't see how this
explains
the counteracting principles.
Look'e, sir, said my master, who was so well
satisfied with the truth of his theory that he never
would allow any body to question it, without growing
rather soreLook'e, sirthe counteracting
principle
is that tendency to wrong and mischief, which
is implanted in the Man Machine by an erroneous
system of education; and the force of circumstances
is nothing more than the temptations thrown into
his way by this erroneous system.
As how, sir?
By the counteracting principles, sir.
I believe I am very stupid, sirbut really I
do not even yet comprehend these principles.
What are they?
My master began to redden.
Why, sirif I must take the trouble to answer
your impertinent questions, sir, I tell youthat
avarice, lust, ambition, envy, malice and revenge,
are what I call the counteracting principles.
O! I understand nowwhat we used to call
the passions.
The passions!'tis false, sirthey are not
what we used to call the passionsthe passions are
phantomsthey have no existence except in the
brain of stupiditythey are the infamous
incestuous
product of the vile system of education pursued
for the last six thousand years. There is no such
thing as passionor I say, there should not, and
there would not, be such a thing, if it were not for
the rascally counteracting principlesyou are a
blockhead, sirand may gowhere you please.
It may bebut I am a perfect machine for all
thatnobody shall convince me to the contrary.
You are a perfect ass, said my master,
turning
his back upon me in great wrathyou are a
perfect assand the machinery of your upper
works is not worth a tobacco-stopper. I wonder
how I could make a tolerable cotton spinner of
you.
This attack upon my perfectibility, nettled me a
good deal; neither was I quite satisfied with my
master's definition of the counteracting principles.
I began to hang rather loose upon the
establishment
;
but am not sure I should have left it, but for
a circumstance, which I consider the most
unlucky
that ever happened to me in my whole life.
It is time to remind you that I had once a father,
mother, brothers and sisters. The pursuit of
perfectibility
,
with other important matters, has
hitherto
prevented my telling you that I lost them all,
one after the other, in the course of a few years.
My fatherbut I will not expose himhe died.
My mother did not long survive; and my poor little
brothers and sisters dropt one after another, into
that yawning tomb prepared for their reception by
the glorious champions of productive labour. They
withered like so many poor ignoble little flowers,
shut out from air and sunshinethey waxed pale,
sickly, and yellowthey became stinted in growth,
dry, flimsy, inactiveand at last incapable. One
after another they died away, as it were of no
other disease than that of the spinning jenney.
When I think of them now, the tears come into my
eyes, although it was so long ago; but their fate at the
time made but little impression. I was too busy
attending upon the evolutions of the ever turning
wheel, the sole object of my earthly
contemplations
.
From long watching the eternal round of
the spinning jenney, its action became so impressed
on the pupil of my eyes, and its buzzing noise upon
the drum of my ear, that present or absent,
sleeping
or waking, my brain retained no other image,
and bore no other impress but that. The wheel
was perpetually dancing before me; and as a man
after looking at the bright sun in the firmament,
for a few moments, sees when he withdraws his
eyes a thousand orbs dancing before him, so did I
a thousand spinning jenneys. It was thus that my
natural feelings and nicer perceptions, died away
for want of exercise, and when I saw myself alone
in the world, by the death of all my family, I
tried to be sorry, but could comprehend nothing
distinctly but the spinning jenney.
About the time my master insulted me for not
properly comprehending the counteracting
circumstances
,
and while I felt a little sore on the subject,
one of these diabolical villains was let loose upon
me before I was aware of it. News was brought
me that a person possessing a good estate in a
distant
part of the country, had died intestate, and
that after minute investigation it was found I was
next heir to the whole of his property. I was
therefore regularly summoned to take possession.
Here was a counteracting circumstance, as my
master called it, enough to make one's hair stand
on endturn his whole New View of Society
wrong side outwards, and destroy the perfectibility
of man.
My views, perceptions, and opinions were for a
time changed, as if by magic. When I had
nothing
I was a great admirer of a community of
goodsnow I was rich I turned up my nose at the
very idea of such an odd ridiculous notion, and
argued with my master on the subject with a
degree
of independence at which he was quite
astonished
.
I offered to bet him a round sum to back my
opinions, and this was better than all his first
principles
put together. My master proposed to make
me treasurer, but as there was no common fund,
but what I might contribute, I resisted the
tempting
offer of being allowed to take care of my own
money, manfully. In an evil hour, I determined to
give up all the delights of perfectibilityto yield
to the force of the counteracting circumstance
to follow the bent of the enlarged principle of social
self-love, and return to the great world again, to set
a good example and reform its abuses. Before I
went, I resigned my portion of the village, the land
and its improvements, to the remnant of the
community
that had laboured with me, after which I
sallied forth, full of hopes, fears and anticipations
of I knew not what. I remember the first thing
that alarmed me in my debut, was seeing two pigs
fighting, an atrocity which none of the orderly swine
brought up under the New View of Society ever
were guilty of while in a perfect state. They are
terribly under the influence of the counteracting
principles, said I, to a person who happened to be
near.
Of what? said he, turning quick upon me.
Of the counteracting principles, said I.
They are under the influence of passion,
said he.
My dear sir, there are no such things as the
passionsthey are nothing but circumstances.
Who told you so? replied he, eyeing me with
a queer look, half surprised and half angry.
My masterhe can prove to you, by his
precepts
,
if not by his example, that there are no such
things in his New View of Society, as passions.
They are nothing but circumstances and
counteracting
principles, as I said before.
Tut, replied he'tis only a new name for
an old thingyour master, whoever he is, may
call black white, or white black, yet that won't
alter the colour.
I see you have never read the New View of
Societyyou are suffering all the evils, miseries
and inconsistencies of that abominable system of
8
education which has prevailed in the world for
the last six thousand years. You have `been
taught crime from your youth,' as my master says,
and I dare affirm, will one day be unjustly
subjected
to punishment for those very offences which
it was impossible you should not commit.
Abominable system of education! Taught
crime from my youth! Punished for offences it
was impossible I should not commit! What do
you mean, sir? cried he, in a passion.
I mean, said I, with perfect politeness
I mean that it is more than an equal chance
that you will one day be hanged by the mere
`force of circumstances'as my master says.
Upon this the imperfect Man Machine unluckily
gave way to the rascally counteracting principles,
and came forward with an evident intention to
knock me down.
I'll teach you to throw out reflections upon
me
My dear Man MachineI meant no reflection,
none in the worldif you should happen to be
hanged it will not be your faultit will be the
fault of your education, for which you are no more
accountable than for your subsequent actions. If
any body deserves to be hanged, it is your father
and mother, who brought you up in a profound
ignorance of the `counteracting principles,' and
that delightful self-love, which is the basis of all
social happiness.
My good friend, replied he, in a tone of
contempt
you
are either a fool or a madmanI
can't tell which.
I am a philosopher.
The difference is not much now-a-days,
quoth heand coolly turned away.
As I proceeded on my way to take possession of
my estate, I every moment discovered that I had got
into a new world, where I was a fish out of water.
Every thing seemed at sixes and sevensand there
was a horrible freedom of will and of action that
kept me in perpetual trepidationneither man
nor beast seemed to pay the least attention to
the sublime precepts of the New View of Society.
In our establishment there was a perfect equality
except that no person was permitted to have a
voice in choosing the committee of management,
unless he was worth a hundred pounds.
[13]
[13]
See New View of Society, Constitution.
There
was also a perfect freedom of actionexcept
that the committee regulated the employment of
every member consistently with the public
good.
Ibid, for similar regulations.
In short, there was a regularitya
beautiful monotony, like the ticking of a clock,
or the evolutions of a spinning jenneymen,
women
,
and childrenpigs, ducks, geese and
chickens
hogs,
dogs, horses, cows, oxen, sheep and
assesthere seemed scarcely any perceptible
difference
between themthe instinct of the one
seemed quite equal to the reason of the other
and if there was any difference, it was in favour
of honest instinct. The committee of
management
constituted the great moving principle,
which set the whole machinery of the
establishment
goingthey were the steam to the engine.
I should do injustice to one of the most perfect
machines I ever saw, if I neglected to mention in
this place, a most sagacious donkey, whose
special
vocation it was to carry water. He would go to
the well and return with his load as regularly as a
Man Machine, and that too without a driver. But
no reasoning, no violence, no first principles, could
make him go one step beyond the well, or carry a
single load after the hour of twelve. He knew as
well as any Man Machine, when the clock struck
twelve, and whenever it was attempted to make
him take another trip to the well, the
counteracting
principle became invincible. What more
could we expect from your boasted rational
animals
?
But the world into which I had got, was a
melancholy
contrast to this perfect system. Every
man seemed to be actually in some measure
governed
,
and impelled by his own will, and of course
every man took his own way. Every one chose
his own occupation, without consulting, or being
directed by a committee of management, which by
relieving the community from the labour of
thinking
for itself, leaves every one at full liberty to
do nothingbut labour for the joint benefit of
others. As with the biped so with the quadruped
machines. Not one of them seemed to know its
place as in my master's establishment; each
rambled
and fed, apparently where it liked, and so it
performed its appropriate task, or answered its
destined
end, was allowed every other species of
freedom
.
The worst of it was, that though I could not
help pitying and despising all of them in a lump, I
was provoked to see them look a hundred times
happier and more sprightly than my master's two
legged, and four legged machines. The men
whistled
and the women sung at their workthe little
children laughed and shouted in a most unseemly
manner amid their unregulated gambols, where
they sometimes fought and squabbled horribly.
Their happiness was unaccountableand could
only proceed from an utter ignorance of my
master's
New View of Society. If they could only
read that, thought I, they would go near to destroy
themselves. The poor creatures little anticipated,
that probably two thirds of them would live to be
hanged or otherwise punished, only for committing
8*
crimes actually forced upon them by the erroneous
system of education inflicted on mankind for the
last six thousand years. But the greatest
enormity
I saw, was an ox who seemed so particularly
delighted with the liberty he enjoyed of doing as he
pleased for a little while, that he actually cut a
caper
that would have scandalized all the sober
machines
of my master's establishment. I could not
help drawing a contrast between the gaiety I now
saw, and the philosophic ennui, which at all times
displayed itself in our establishment, and which
increased
with every advance to perfection.
These impressions and reflections, however
insensibly
,
gave place to others, as I gradually
approached
towards my new home, where I at length arrived
without any material accident. It was a retired
spot, in a remote countypleasantly situated, and
within two miles of a little town. The old servants
of the late owner received me with attentive
respect
,
and conducted me to a room where dinner
was served up in handsome style. I asked them if
they had dined, and on their replying in the
negative
,
invited them to sit down with me. They at
first thought I was jokingbut on my peremptorily
insisting upon it, they sat down with awkward
embarrassment
.
It was plain to me they never had read
the New View of Societyand knew nothing of
the community of goodsthe perfect equalitythe
incapacity of the Man Machine to govern his
opinions
or actionsthe horrible system of education
of the last six thousand yearsthe divine impulse
or circumstance of self-love, and the counteracting
principles. Here was a fine field for the
application
of my master's theory.
I resolved to lose no time, and as soon as dinner
was over, began by laying down the first principles
of the New View. I taught them that man was a
machine, and might be governed like all other
pieces of machinerythat as men were taught
crime by the very education they received, there
was no necessity nor even justice in inflicting
punishment
that
from the beginning of the world to
the present time, all men had been erroneously
trained, and hence all the inconsistencies and
misery of mankindthat a man's will has no
control
over his opinions nor his actions, so far as they
are influenced by those opinionsthat as all crimes
originated in an erroneous education over which
we had no control, we could not be justly
accountable
for them, either in the sight of God or
manthat self-love was the prime source of all
virtue and happinessthat man was a machine
having naturally no passions but what are instilled
into him by an abominable system of education
that he is capable of perfectibilityand that
nothing stands in the way of it but the rascally
counteracting principles. These doctrines I
repeated
every day, until my people got them by
heart and could repeat them. Nay, I put them in
the form of a catechism, which I heard every
Sunday, instead of sending them to church to hear
the parson dogmatize. I put in force a number
of my master's regulations, and adopted his system
in all its material parts, having no doubt that in a
reasonable time, I should produce a great reform in
my household. And so I should without doubt, but
for my master's old enemies, some of whom
followed
me into my retirement, and were as busy
as ever in counteracting our plans for the
perfectibility
of the Man Machine.
My establishment consisted of an old
house-keeper
,
with whom I had more trouble than with
all the rest put together. She had long reigned
mistress, and master too, of the housefor I have
been credibly informed, that my predecessor, an
old bachelor, was more afraid of her than my
master
was of the counteracting principles. Indeed,
my experience has long since taught me, that it is
no way of escaping the tyranny of the sex to
remain
single. I never yet saw an old bachelor
that was not sooner or later most awfully
henpecked
by some bitter old, or sweet young housekeeper,
nurse, cook, or bed-maker. Mistress Jeannie, as
she was called, was one of the very pillars of
aristocracy
.
She could not bear the sight of your
ruff scruff, as she called them, and disliked your
poor people inordinately. The pedigrees of all
around, far and near, were known to her a thousand
times better than at the herald's office, and Lyon,
King at Arms, was a fool to her in genealogy. You
could tell the antiquity of a family by the
courtesy
she made to its representative at church. In
short she had been used to the exercise of power;
and held herself considerably above the majority
around hertwo of the great counteracting
principles
in the way of reform. It will always be
found, I fear, that the desire, or the abhorrence of
a system of equality, entirely depends upon the
question, whether it will raise or depress us in the
scale of society.
The other members of my establishment, were a
steward, or manager, a shrewd, wary Scotsman, of
whom it was said that he paid much attention to
the affairs of his master, and much more to his
own. He was supposed to be considerably under
the influence of the counteracting principles
something of a hypocrite, and a little more of a
rogue. His name was Macnab, and he prided
himself
upon what he was pleased to call his Celtic
origin. There was a footman, a coachman, stable
boy, and one or two others of miscellaneous
occupation
,
together with two maids, one of whom was
no beauty, and the other had as much vanity and
affectation as a dutchess of three tails. Rather
unpromising machines for perfectibility, thought I
but what of that? I have no doubt, as my master
affirms, that any character may be given to a
community
,
or to the world at large, by means which
are at the command of those who influence human
affairs.
[14]
[14]
See New View of Society for similar doctrines.
Much to my satisfaction, I discovered in a little
time, that my people glided with perfect ease into the
New System of Society, so far as respected their
intercourse
with me. They set down at meals at the
same table with me, and so far from displaying any
awkward embarrassment, or making any sacrifices
of appetite in consideration of my authority, they
made a point of helping themselves to the choice
bits on all occasions. This was promising, and I
had little doubt of ultimate success, when all at
once the villainous counteracting principles made
their appearance, and hatched a plot against me
that had well nigh overturned my New System.
The first was the counteracting principle of
insubordination. My steward, the Celtic Macnab,
began to demur most sturdily to my directions
insisting that as we were upon a perfect equality,
in all other respects, he, as the person that had
most experience in these matters, ought to have
the sole superintendence of the agricultural part
of the system. On my demurring to this, he
turned away without ceremony, muttering some
thing exceedingly disrespectful to spinning jennies
and machinery. He then went to honest
Murdoch
the ploughman, a brave Kilkenny boy as ever
broke heads for amusement, and directed him to
plow a certain field for the purpose of planting
ruta baga.
Ruta what? quoth Murdoch.
Turnips, said Macnab.
The divil burn such articles as turnips, say I.
But you must plant them for all that.
Mustmust, did you say? That for you
Macnab
,
cried Murdoch, snapping his fingersthere
is no must here in the New Jerusalem. Turnips!
faugh!would you set an Irishman planting
turnips
when there is such a ting as the beautiful
patate
,
in the land of the living. Divil burn me
Macnab
,
if I plant a turnip if you christen them by the
name of the best saint in the calendar.
But I say you must and shallan't I the
manager
?
You forget yourself, Mr. Murdoch.
Faith, Macnab, you're out thereI'm just
beginning to remember myself. You manager!
take notice, ye old Celtic dried up mushroom, there
is to be no manager or management hereour
masterthat is to say, our instructor, for all other
master's I disdainhas satisfied me that we have
nothing to do with making our own opinionsnow
my opinion is decidedly in favour of planting
patatees
and
if I am wrong you will please put it down
to the errors of my educationpatatees for ever!
ye old worn out Man Machine, cried Murdoch,
throwing up his hathuzza for patatees!
I say turnips, vociferated Macnab.
And I say patatees, vociferated Murdoch.
If I plant any thing but patatees, may they rise up
and ate me, instead of my ating them.
Macnab was on the point of referring the matter
to me, when he recollected that this would be
acknowledging
my authority. So he gave up to
Murdoch
,
who planted his potatoes in triumph.
One day I desired my coachman to get up the
horses, for a ride to the neighbouring village. But
he declined the motion, observing that the
principle
of self-love, which I had convinced him was the
groundwork of all happiness, prompted him to go
in the carriage himself, having made a party with
the pretty chambermaid to the fair. Accordingly,
he went to the stables and ordered out the horses.
The stable boy demurred; it appears he also had
made a party to the fair, and would not give up
to the coachman. The counteracting principles
waxed warm within themthey incontinently fell
together by the ears, and battered each other till
the Man Machine was terribly disarranged.
The inside of my house was in a worse state if
possible, than the outside. There was the mischief to
pay among the Women Machines. The authority
of the old housekeeper fell to the groundand her
long established system of domestic economy was
assailed by the whole force of the New View of
Society
.
The Women Machines in fact carried my
master's first principles to such an extreme that
they actually degenerated into the counteracting
principles, and went over to the enemy. The
principle
of perfect equality, in their hands became
self-willed disobediencethe principle of a
community
of goods, became the counteracting
principle
of helping themselves to whatever they wanted
and the great fundamental principle of self-love
became anti-social, by the prevalence of my
master's
grand counteracting principle of the
centripetal
attraction. In short, there was one eternal
squabble in the house, and poor Jeannie, who had
never throughly come over to the principle of
universal
equality in all things, almost fell a victim to
the sublime doctrine of perfectibility. Half the
time I had no dinner cooked, and was obliged to lie
in an unmade bed, owing to the predominating
influence
of the counteracting principles.
O! man, man! I sometimes exclaimed in
despairand more emphaticallyO! woman,
woman!after all I fear that thou art nothing but
a bundle of counteracting principles. But
perseverance
does wonders. My master certainly
made Men Machines perfect at one timeI will
not despair.
9
With this resolution I set about a reform, as
speedily as possible, for to say the truth, I found
that if we went on in this way much longer, I should
be obliged either to take up money or starve.
Saving
honest Murdoch's potatoes, our crop this year
was nothing. It really appeared, that owing to some
misunderstanding or misapplication of my master's
first principles, that his perfect system of equality,
resulted in making every body dependent
exclusively
upon the person whose duty it was to
perform
the particular office required. Thus I was
entirely at the mercy of my cook for a dinner
my coachman for a rideand my housemaids for a
new-made bed. This I was satisfied must be the
work of the counteracting principles. I will set
about counteracting them forthwith.
I called these refractory Machines together and
lectured them on the spirit of insubordination,
paying at the same time proper respect to the
principle of equality. I told them that equality
was, after all, not the entire absence of every
species
of inequality, but such an equality as was
consistent with a due spirit of subordinationthat
a community of goods, did not mean the right of
helping ourselves to just what we wantedthat
the sublime principle of self-love, was not the love
of self, but of societyand that the idea of a man
not being accountable for his opinions and actions,
only meant to apply to those opinions he might
indulge, and those actions he might commit, with
a due regard to the laws and customs of society.
Och murder, roared MurdochOch
murder
and Irishour teacher has gone over to the
counteracting principles. Divil burn the New
System of Society, say I; it is nothing but the old
one in disguise after all.
Here it will be perceived that the counteracting
principles carried the Man Machine, Murdoch,
from one extreme to the other. The moment I
talked to him of restraining one of my master's
first principles, he and all the rest of them
immediately
protested that I abandoned my whole
system
.
I was almost tempted to believe that if man
was a machine, it must be a pendulum, which
never stops, except at extremes, until it ceases
its motion entirely.
Thus it happened with the machines of my
establishment
.
I could never get them to stop at the
right place. The villanous counteracting
principles
,
were always tugging at the skirts of the men,
and the petticoats of the women, now pulling them
over the line this way, and now that, from one side
to the other, to the total disarrangement of my
plans, and the downfall of perfectibility. As I
proceeded to qualify the application of my master's
great fundamental principles, they all help up their
hands, and raised their voices against such
unheard
of restraints in a perfect system of society.
Arrah! exclaimed orator Murdochhere's a
pretty kettle of fresh fish all turned salt. Here's
a pretty attack on the perfectibility of man.
Here's splitting of hairs and philosophising people
out of their liberty. I'm for none of his
wishey-washey
,
half-and-half equality, and community.
Neck or nothing with Murdoch. By St. Patrick,
who set all the sarpents and frogs free from old
Ireland, I'd rather be a slave outright, than not
be as free as a mother Carey's chicken. By Js,
added he, after a pauselet's vote him down.
Here's six of us, each equal to himsix to oneall
hollowvote him downvote him downhuzza
for the first principles, and let every one do as
they please.
The counteracting principles carried all before
themthe resolution passed by acclamation, and I
found myself in the situation of a man, who in
getting
through a wall, has made a hole which he can't
stop again for his life. Still I did not despair,
being
positively certain that my master had at one
time succeeded in making Men Machines
perfect
,
and that what had been done might be done
again. I determined to discharge my present
machines
as incorrigible, and collect a new set,
younger, and less under the influence of the
counteracting
circumstances. Calling them together, I
announced my intention of dismissing them, on the
score of their not comprehending my master's first
principles. But an unexpected difficulty
presented
itself, in the shape of a counteracting principle
as usual.
Not one of them would go, unless I consented to
make a fair division of the common property. With
the exception of the old housekeeper, who sighed
for the restoration of her ancient dominion over the
household, I was deserted by all. They clamoured
for a division of property, although I tried to
convince them, that as they had not contributed
any thing to the common fund, but had spent twice
as much as they earned, they were entitled to
nothing
.
Och, then, he denies the sublime principle of
equality, cried Murdochhe has fallen from
the state of perfectibility. My sweet ones, what
say youlet's vote him outlet's banish him the
community as an outlawa white boyan
imperfect
machinea traitorous adherent to those
diabolical
villains the counteracting principles.
Murdoch's motion was carried without
opposition
,
except from the housekeeper, and
yielding
to the force of the counteracting principles, I
quietly went into banishment at the neighbouring
village. Thus I found to my no small
astonishment
,
that the operation of my master's first
principles
,
being somehow or other got under by the
force of the counteracting principles, had actually
turned me out of my inheritance.
9*
I have said nothing of the Celtic Macnab of late.
The truth is, he seemed to join but little in these
revolutionary proceedings. He was generally
either busy or affecting to be busy elsewhere,
and kept himself perfectly quiet. It will be seen
anon what he was about all this while. At the
village, I was waited upon by the minister of the
parish, who, hearing of my situation, came to offer
me advice and consolation. He advised me to
appeal
to the laws for redress. I shook my head
That would be giving up my system entirely.
What system, I pray? asked the old man.
The system of perfectibility, as exemplified in
my master's New View of Society.
So then, you believe in the perfectibility of
man?
CertainlyI believe that if the Man Machine
was only freed from that erroneous system of
education
which has prevailed for the last six thousand
yearsand could escape the influence of the
counteracting
principleshe would almost as a matter
of course, become a perfect Machineas perfect
as a steam engine.
The good man shook his head, and smiled a
melancholy
smile
So then, you intend to put up with this
wrong, and refrain not only from claiming your
rights, but from punishing those who have
invaded
them?
CertainlyI hold that as all the miseries,
inconsistencies
,
and crimes of the Man Machine,
proceed from the errors of his early education,
over which he can have no control, it follows as a
matter of course, that he ought not to be punished
for them. He can no more help them, than a
machine
constructed upon false principles, can help
going wrong.
And you seriously believe the world has been
going wrong ever since the creation, and that you
are destined at last to set it going right.
I and my master.
O! the inordinate pride of human nature,
quoth the old man, shaking his white locks.
Pooh!there is no such thing as human nature,
or any other kind of nature. Nature is nonsense
an absurdity, a phantom, conjured up by folly
and prejudice. Man, sir, is a machineyou might
as well talk of the nature, the passions, the innate
impulses, of a spinning jenney, as of a man.
Your principles go to the complete
disorganization
of the present system of society.
To be sure they doand that is exactly what
I conceive constitutes their peculiar excellence.
The whole system is radically wrong, and I and my
master mean to set it right if we can only baffle
those scoundrels the counteracting principles, and
evade the force of circumstances.
But what is there so very wrong in the present
system, that you wish to overturn it?
In the first placepeople are actually taught
crime, and then punished for it by the operation of
an unjust system of laws. Now, sir, in order to
remedy these crying evils, I would first put the
judge in place of the criminal and hang him, to a
certainty. Then I would abolish the whole system
of punishments, as unjust and unnecessaryfor
nothing can be plainer, than that as all crimes and
errors proceed from an erroneous system of
education
,
it is idle and cruel at the same time, to make
laws for their punishment.
Thento return to the pointyou mean to
leave these people in possession of your estate.
I mustor abandon my system.
Your estate is worth a dozen such systems.
For shame, sirdo you value a few paltry
acres more than the perfectibility of the Man
Machine
.
I never saw a machine so completely
under
the influence of the counteracting principles,
as you are.
We had many similar conversations, all ending in
the same unsatisfactory manner. In the mean time,
my honest friend, the Celtic Macnab, was quietly
maturing a plan to arrest in the most effectual
manner
,
the perfectibility of man, so far as it depended
upon myself. He had represented me to the
proper
authorities as a mischievous madman, going
about propagating principles that struck at the
whole existing institutions of societyan enemy to
property, order and religion. He further stated
that I was totally incapable of managing my estate,
and that it was the duty of the commission to
appoint
an administrator to take it out of the hands
of my domestics, who had possession, and were
wasting it as fast as they could.
In pursuance of this information, I was
unexpectedly
taken into custody, and carried before a
commission, to undergo an examination.
Macnab
stated shortly what I have heretofore detailed
to the reader, and I was called on for an
explanation
of the motives of my conduct. I detailed in
the clearest manner, the first principles of the New
View of Society, and stated the grand objects my
master and I had in view, in thus attempting to
overturn the whole system of the world. I never
was so eloquent before or since. But the machines
constituting the commission of inquiry were sadly
out of order, and the vile counteracting principles
were too strong for my arguments. They
pronounced
me mad, although I proved to them that a
man could not possibly be made accountable for
his opinions, and appointed honest Macnab
administrator
to my estate.
I was carried to a neighbouring city and placed
in a lunatic asylum. I made no resistance, for I
was satisfied they could not place me among a set
of people more mad than those I had just left.
Nay, a sudden hope dawned upon me, that I
might possibly in time introduce my New System
of Society among the machines of the asylum.
Accordingly, one day when all the most quiet and
manageable among us were amusing ourselves in
the enclosure appointed for that purpose, I took an
opportunity of laying down my master's first
principles
.
Contrary to my expectations there was a
decided opposition to the principle of equality, as
well as that of a community of goods.
Shall I, who am Alexander the great, sink to a
level with Alexander the coppersmith? cried one.
Shall I, who have written verses, ten thousand
times superior to Milton, or Homer, twaddle arm
in arm through Grub-street with Croly and Mrs.
Hemans? cried another.
And shall I, who have made the Apocalypse
as clear as noonday, grovel on the same level
with the expounder of a Chinese puzzle?
exclaimed
a third.
And shall I, who have demonstrated the grand
principle of perpetual motion, acknowledge an
equality with a mere inventor of steam engines?
roared a fourth.
And shall I, who have completed a canal to
connect the Icy Sea with the North Pole, degenerate
into an equality with an Irish ditcher? roared
a fifth.
And shall I, who have invented a New System
of Society, to supersede law, gospel, crime and
punishment, be placed on the same shelf, with
such fellows as Moses, Solon, Peter the Great,
Napoleon
Bonaparte, and Jeremy Bentham? roared
a sixth.
You are the man for my money, thought I. I will
make you treasurer of the Society, which I have
observed is always the favourite office of great
reformers
and philanthropists. I could almost have
persuaded myself that this was my master speaking,
but it proved to be a poor fellow, who in the sequel
demonstrated that he had not above half his
discretion
.
Before I could proceed to enforce my
doctrines
by some of my master's best arguments, the
counteracting principles began to play away finely.
The indignation of the whole party fell upon me,
whom they looked upon as a leveller, a democrat,
a radical, who wished to deprive them of their just
claims to superiority.
Alexander the Great seized Perpetual Motion by
his thin spindle leg, with which he proceeded to
serve me as he had done old Clytus, and run me
through with his javelin. The poet thundered
forth an anathema, that beat that of Ernulphus, or
even one of lord Byron's curses, quite hollowthe
expounder of the Apocalypse pronounced me the
beast with seven heads and ten hornsthe
lawgiver
proceeded to a breach of his own laws, by
knocking me on the head with a corn-stalk
the internal improvement man threatened to make
me read all that had ever been written on the
subject
and
the champion of the New System,
forfeited
all claim to the office I had destined for him,
by seizing me by the collar, and demanding whether
I dared to question the eternal truth, that no man
was justly accountable for his opinions.
The uproar brought out the keepers, who having
traced its origin in the promulgation of my New
System of Society, immediately placed me in
solitary
confinement. Here I had full leisure to
reflect
,
and to mature my plans for the perfectibility
of mankind. What a world is this, thought I, and
to what has it been brought by the erroneous
system
of the last six thousand years! It has I fear
entirely unfitted mankind for any thing like a state
of perfectibility. Neither men in their senses, nor
men out of their senses are willing to adopt the
New System, which seems like the unlucky tailor's
coat that fitted nobody. I had many tight
arguments
with the keeper who had me in charge, and
who was sadly under the influence of the
counter-acting
principles. I could never convince him
that the world had been going completely wrong
ever since the creation, that all mankind were in
error, and my master alone right. He insisted the
first was a reflection upon Providence, and that it
was entirely contrary to reason that one man should
be so much wiser than all the rest put together. I
have indeed observed that reason is always in the
way of us great reformers, and have often heard
my master say, it was one of the strongest
counter-acting
principles he had to deal with. There was
another obstacle always in his way, which he
called
a circumstance, namely, the experience of
mankind, which my master swore, was the most
obstinate blockhead in the world.
I remained in this state of solitary abstraction
for about a month, during which my enthusiasm in
behalf of the New System of Society somewhat
abated
.
I had all the zeal in the world, but had no
ambition
to become a martyr. At the end of the month,
the visitor, a benevolent physician, came to examine
into the cases of these unfortunate beings. He
visited
me, and we had a long conversation, in which I
studiously abstained from the doctrines of the New
System of Society. I considered that no man was
bound to sacrifice himself to a theory; and that at
all events, I could do nothing to propagate the
perfectibility
of man, while thus shut up from all
communion
with my fellow creatures. It was
impossible
to reform society, from the inside of a
mad-house
.
The doctor was surprised at my
rationality
,
and seemed inclined to report me as being
perfectly
restored, when, unfortunately, happening to
differ with him in some point, I apologized, by
observing
,
that no man was accountable for his
opinions
or actions in this world.
10
Good day, my friend, replied the doctor,
bowing
almost to the ground, with great gravityI
am afraid you are not quite cured yet, and away
he went. I could have bit off my tongue, and made
a solemn resolution not to say a single syllable
about the Man Machinethe perfectibility of man
the counteracting circumstances, or any such
matters, the next time the doctor came.
At the end of a month the visitor came again,
and I conducted myself with such discretion that
he immediately procured an order from the
trustees
of the asylum for my release. The keeper, as
he bade me farewell, warned me against
perfectibility
,
and I was very near being shut up again for
cautioning him against the counteracting principles.
Without losing any time I bent my steps towards
my estate with a design of bringing the Celtic
Macnab
to a reckoning, for procuring me to be shut up
in a mad-house. When, however, I came to
recollect
,
that all the errors, inconsistencies, vices and
crimes of the Man Machine originated in his being
set going wrong at first by an erroneous system of
education, and that he could not in strict justice be
called to account for his opinions or actions, I
determined
to treat him in the most friendly
manner
.
We accordingly had an amicable meeting,
in which, in discussing the subject of the New
View of Society, he observed, that the old world
was not the proper sphere for trying the
experiment
.
Old habits, old errors, and old
establishments
,
were difficult to change, or pull down. It
was in the wide space of the new world, where
there was plenty of elbow-room to give it a fair
trial, and where habits, manners and opinions had
not attained to that rigidity of muscle which renders
them unalterable, that it was undoubtedly destined
the experiment should completely triumph. He
also casually mentioned that my old master, had
already made arrangements for the grand
experiment
,
and had sailed for the new world.
I caught at the ideaand after some little
discussion
,
such was my impatience to follow my
master
,
agreed with Macnab to leave him in quiet
possession
,
for a sum of money which hardly amounted
to two years' purchase. It was a good estate,
although my people, yielding to the force of the
counteracting principles, had dilapidated it sadly.
Macnab had turned them all out except the old
housekeeper, who still maintained her rank and her
authority. I know not what became of the rest,
only that orator Murdoch took a trip to Botany Bay,
for acting too largely upon my master's grand
principle
of a community of goods. I went to bid the
good old parson farewell.
You are going on a wild goose chase, said he.
Yesbut people sometimes catch wild geese.
Much oftener than perfectibility.
Ayeaye, said I, good humouredlyyou
parsons can't bear the idea of perfectibility, because
it would put down your calling.
He answered my smile
Well, go thy ways for an odd Man Machine.
Thou wilt one day discover the Providence is wiser
than thou artFarewell. Tell me how you get
on in the new worldwhen your community
becomes
quite perfect, send for me. I will come to
show you, that we parsons are not afraid of
perfectibility
.
As I was going away he called me back
Stay, friend Perfectibility, said he, merrily.
Thou mayest want some person to certify for thee
in the new world, that thou art not quite as mad as
a March here. I will give thee a letter to an
American
,
formerly a fellow student of mine at
Edinburgh
,
who will befriend thee if necessary.
He then sat down, and in a few minutes finished
a letter, which he gave me, directed to Mr. Robert
Ashley, at Bristol, Pennsylvania.
Full of anticipations, I went down to a
neighbouring
seaport, and embarked for the new world,
where I arrived after a short passage without any
accident or event worth recording. During the
passage, I had some conversations on the New View
of Society, with an old sailor, who I attempted to
bring over to my master's theory. At last,
however
,
he cut me short by Dg his eyes if he
believed there was any way to make a man perfect,
except by making a perfect sailor of him.
There was, however, a fellow passenger on board,
who I found to be more reasonable, and less under
the dominion of the counteracting principles. We
had frequent discussions on the subject, and I
opened
to him all my plans without reserve, not omitting
the sum of money I had with me, to invest in the
perfect community. He became a complete
convert
to the New View of Society, and we agreed to
co-operate zealously in the great work of
perfectibility
.
We went to live at the same lodgings,
where we digested a plan of operations for the
future. The second day after landing, he came to
me, to say that by a great piece of ill luck, the
merchant on whom he had a credit for a large sum,
was out of town, and could not supply him with
funds.
But I should not have minded that so much,
said he, except that another merchant to whom I
am indebted in part of this money, insists on my
paying him immediately. Now all I want is for
you to advance me the sum, till the day after
to-morrow, when the person on whom my bills
are drawn will be in town.
He offered to show me the bills, but on
second
thoughts, had left them with the merchant's
clerk. The sum he wanted was nearly all I was
worth in the world, but I lent it with as little
hesitation as my friend borrowed it. He then left
me to go and pay the debt he spoke of, desiring
10*
me to have dinner ready at four o'clock, when
he would certainly be back. But four came,
without my friend, and hour after hour passed
without his appearing. The dinner grew cold,
for I had no inclination to eatnot that I was
uneasy about my money, but my friend. I was
afraid that his simplicity had been imposed on,
or that like me he might have been mistaken for
a mad-man, and put in a lunatic asylum. A week
passed away without my seeing him, during which
time the remainder of my money had disappeared
also. I began to grow uneasyand one day took
a solitary walk, in the envrions of the city, to
reflect
on my situation, and ponder on the
mysterious
disappearance of my friend. What was my
joy, on turning round a short corner, to meet him
face to face when I least expected. I was
rejoiced
to see him, but I cannot say that he
appeared
to share my raptures.
My dear Man Machine, cried I, I am so
delighted to meet you againI was afraid they
had put you in a mad-house, for believing in
perfectibility
.
By the wayI have spent every
farthing
of my money and will thank you to let me
have what I lent you.
What, in a community where all things are to
be in common? You forget the New View of
Society
,
said he, with a sort of sneer I did not like.
Yes, but the system you know is not yet in
operation.
No matter, the principles on which it is
founded
are eternal and immutable, sir. If a
community
of goods is right in one case, it is right in
another
.
Your money is gone.
You don't say so, said I, in great dismay.
Gone, sirI have considered myself as acting
up to the sublime principles of the New System, by
distributing it among the community, upon the just
basis of mutual wants, and mutual conveniences.
The tailor has some of itthe jewellerthe
hatter
the
tavern keeperhas each his share
but the last guineas went for a couple of dozen
Bingham wine, which would do your heart good
even to smell at. You shall come this blessed day,
and help crack a bottlehey! my fine piece of
perfectibility!
So then, you have spent all my money?
Your money? my dear friend, you again forget
the sublime doctrines of the New System of Society.
You have only to consider each of these persons
who have received a share of your money, as
members
of our community, and you will acknowledge
that it could not possibly belong to you.
I believe you are a great rascal.
My dear friend, how can you make that out?
You have cheated me of my money.
My good friend, you are certainly under the
dominion
of the counteracting principles, if ever a
man was in this world. But suppose, for the sake
of argument, that I had defrauded you of your
money
.
What thenam I to blame?
Who else in the name of common sense?
Don't mention common sense, I beseech you
it has nothing to do with the New System of
Society
.
We must try the question by our great
master's
first principles.
Agreed.
Well then, can you deny that all the errors,
inconsistencies
,
and crimes of the Man Machine, for
the last six thousand years, may be traced in a
direct
line to the absurd and mischievous system of
education which has prevailed all that time.
No.
Very welland can you deny the immortal,
and immutable truth of the great principle of
perfectibility
,
that no man can be justly held
responsible
for his opinions or his actions?
I do not deny it.
Very well; then answer me, thou ricketty,
addle-pated
,
imperfect machine, whether, even
supposing
I had actually defrauded you of your money, I
am to be blamed for it? You must blame the
erroneous
system of society, and if you punish any
body, it must be my parents who did not take
sufficient
care to put down the rascally counteracting
principles.
And you think yourself justified on these
grounds?
Certainly, certainlybesides, it was my
opinion
that if I did not rid you of your money,
somebody
else would, that might not make as good use of
it; and the sublime circumstance of self-love, which
you know is the basis of all social duties, prompted
me to give the preference to myself. You at least
cannot blame me for acting up to first principles.
First principles! If the truth were known these
are nothing but my master's great enemies the
counteracting
principles.
They are the principles of perfectibility.
They are the principles of the dl, who it is
said can even quote scripture to his purpose.
My dear machine, how can you, a perfect man,
talk about such antiquated stuff as the scriptures.
Don't you know they are entirely unnecessary to
the perfect state.
I don't know, cried I, in despairI know
nothing, I believe.
There now you may pass muster in your
master's
great community. To know nothing and to
be conscious of it, is the most perfect state of
the Man Machine. Then assuming all the air of
a mentor, he added,
Look'e, Mr. Harmony, I will give you a piece
of advice, which if you follow it, will be worth
more than all your money, so that we shall be quit
at all events. The next time you meet with a
stranger, don't attempt making him a convert to
principles that will not only justify his borrwoing
your money without ever paying, but picking your
pocket into the bargain. So saying, he marched
off at a long trot, and presently disappeared in the
great wilderness of houses.
I was now left destitute in a strange land, and
what was most provoking of all, as it were, by the
operation of my master's first principles, which,
now for the first time I began to distrust not a
little. What to do I knew not, for I had been
so used to be told every day what to do, and to
do every day the same thing, that I was a perfect
inanimate machine, so far as respected the total
absence of the principle of self-government. I
stood with my hands in my breeches-pockets, I
dare say with a most rueful expression of face,
when suddenly I felt the letter of the worthy old
parson crumpled between my fingers. As the
last resort, I determined to go and deliver it to
Mr. Ashley, and claim his good offices. He lived
a considerable distance from the city, but being
a man well known, I soon got a direction to his
country seat.
In the morning, I was about getting into a stage
with my trunk, when the master of the house
came up with very little ceremony, or rather none
at all, and presented me a bill. I began to
talk about the first principles, the community of
goods, and the New View of Society. But this
was one of the most intractable machines I ever
had to do with. He told me his first principle
was to get his money if he couldhis second to
send his boarders to jail, when they ran in debt
without being able to pay. These sounded to me
very much like some of my master's old enemies,
the counteracting principles. But the truth is, I
began to be so confused about principles, that I
could hardly tell one from another. Be this as
it may, I was carried to prison, when, according to
one of my master's first principles, the landlord,
who applied for, and the magistrate who granted
the commitment, ought to have been put there in
my place. Here I was admitted into a society
which came nearer to my master's New View, than
any thing I ever saw before or since. Here all
were equal, and there was a perfect community
of goods, each man borrowing from his
neighbour
without ever thinking of payment. They
all moreover agreed perfectly, in laying the blame
of all the evils they had suffered, and all the
faults they had committed, to the errors of their
education, and were equally unanimous, in
declaiming
against the injustice of legal punishments.
I verily believe there was not one of them, that
would not have come most heartily into my
master's
idea of a community of goods, throughout
the whole world. Indeed, I thought our
community
in some respects preferable to that of my
master, seeing we had nothing to do, and had the
best possible chance for perfectibility, being
removed
from the temptations of this world, and out of
the reach of the counteracting principles. We
had iron bars, and double doors to keep the villains
out.
Notwithstanding some symptoms of ennui, which
began to creep over me, I felt myself so
comfortable
that I hardly knew whether to be glad or sorry,
when one day a gentleman was ushered into my
room, who announced himself as Mr. Ashley.
I just now, said he, received a letter from an
old friend of yours and mine, who says he gave you
one to me, and inquires whether I have seen you.
Being in town upon some business, I thought I
would look you out, and after some little tracing,
found you, where I am very sorry to see you, sir.
I have nothing to reproach myself with, and
very little to complain of, said I. Our society
here approaches tolerably near to the New View,
and the men come as near to the state of perfect
machines, as any I have seen, except my master and
myself.
He looked at me with a mixture of pity and
wonder.
I am glad you have been so comfortable
here. But at all events I hope you will have no
objection to go home with me for a little time.
I have paid your small debt, and though our
society may not be quite so perfect as this, I
hope you will be able to tolerate it.
There was an honest freedom, mingled with
hearty kindness, about Mr. Ashley, that won my
confidence, and after some little struggle with
myself
I agreed to accompany him home. His
establishment
was large, and he had about him a
number
of workmen and labourers. But I regretted
to see that he had made little or no advance in the
great plan of perfectibility. He paid no regard to
the system of perfect equality, except so far as the
administration of justice required, and the grand
principle of a community of goods, was entirely
banished. Instead of treating his men and women
like machines, he actually put them on the footing
of rational beings, accountable for their actions,
forgetting entirely that these proceeded from an
erroneous system of education, over which they
had no control whatever. He laughed at the idea
of entirely banishing idleness, poverty and crime,
and of course the necessity of punishment, by
means of any system ever yet invented. As to the
counteracting principles, he went so far as to say
that this was a phrase invented by my master, who
by giving new names to old things, had sought to
screen the absurdity of his new system, from the
eyes of the ignorant.
11
Nevertheless, Mr. Ashley was a shrewd,
clear-sighted
man, who had seen much, read much, and
reflected much in the course of his life. Like all
the well educated Americans, I have seen, he had
those practical notions of liberty, that are essential
to its existence, and which only the habitual
enjoyment
of it can thoroughly implant in the mind.
When the rational inhabitants of the new world,
speak of freedom and equality, they mean
nothing
more than the privilege of making their
own laws, and an equality of civil and religious
rights. The first right of a people, said Mr.
Ashley to me, in one of our discussionsthe first
right of a people is that of making their own laws
their first duty is to obey them. They and the
magistrates who administer them, are the only
sovereigns. This is a sentiment, I may say a
habit, with the Americans; and I often have had
occasion to observe that one of the last things they
think of, is resisting laws assented to by their own
peculiar legislature. My friend and I had long
and frequent arguments, upon the advantages of
the old and new system, for though he was my
benefactor
,
I was determined not to give up to him
on that account.
Your master, as you call him, said Mr.
Ashley
to me, one day that I had advanced the doctrine
of perfectibilityyour master appears to
consider
all the vices and crimes of mankind as
proceeding from ignorance.
Certainly, said I, they are the necessary and
inevitable consequences of ignorance, as my master
affirms.
As an abstract proposition and taken in its
broadest sense it is probably true. Could we
conceive
the idea of any being, but Omnipotence alone,
gifted with perfect knowledge, that being would
probably be free from all vice. Perfect
knowledge
presupposes a perfect conviction of the
futility
of indulging the passions, except to the extent
in which they are essential to the existence of the
grand system of the universe. Perfect knowledge,
or wisdom, would know that inordinate lust,
avarice
,
ambition, gluttony, selfishness, envy, malice,
revenge, and all those passions which lead to the
commission of crime, were in fact sources of
misery
,
repentance and despair. It would therefore,
having this perfect conviction, abstain from the
criminal indulgence of these passions.
I am happy, said I, that you are a convert
to one of my master's first principles at least.
In its abstract, not in its application. I
consider
it, when applied to man, as a preposterous
absurdity
.
As how?
Because it can never apply to him to the
extent
necessary to your first principle. It must be
perfect wisdom, or the argument falls to the ground.
But do you not believe, that in proportion as
we lose our ignorance, we recede from vice?
Indeed, I do not. In the main, I do believe that
the acquisition of knowledge, unless, said Mr.
Ashley
,
smiling, it meets with one of your master's
counteracting principles, is favourable to virtue.
But he must be little acquainted with the world, as
it has been, and as it is, not to be convinced, that in
the scale of virtue there is little difference between
knowledge and ignorance, except in the refinement
with which the one, and the grossness with which
the other indulges its vices. Generally speaking,
ignorance is not the fault of mankind, but their
misfortune. It would therefore impeach the justice
of Providence to suppose they were the worse on
that account.
Here, at least, said I, eagerly, you have
admitted
one of my master's first principles. You
say that ignorance is generally not the fault, but
the misfortune of mankind. Is not this
acknowledging
what my master affirms, that, as no man
directs his early education, so no man can justly be
accountable for his opinions or his actions.
Indeed, it is not. What I find fault with, in
your master's first principles, is, that though they
are, a great many of them, such as have been
admitted
by the writers on morals and metaphysics,
yet until now they were never carried to that
mischievous
extent of practical application, which I
consider the defect, I might almost say, the wicked,
ness of your master's system. Consider what would
be the result of the application of your principle
of non-accountability. A perfect latitude of crime,
and a complete freedom from punishmentthe
absence
of all restraints of conscience or law.
But where would be the harm, if the Man
Machine
was perfect?
Neither you or your master have a right to ask
the question until you make them so.
But you will admit that if they were perfect,
there would be no harm in it?
Certainlyonly make them perfect, and I will
become a convert to the New System.
Only give us time, and you will see it all come
about. All that is necessary is to get rid of the
rascally
counteracting circumstances.
O certainlythere I agree with you perfectly,
said Mr. Ashley, smiling. But as time is, you
acknowledge, necessary to make man perfect, what
is to become of society in the mean while, when
all the restraints of accountability and punishment
are thus suspended? It will fall into a state of
nature
,
if there ever was such a thinga perfect
anarchy
a
dissolution will take place.
11*
My dear friend, that is just what we want. If
we could only dissolve the present state of society,
and produce a perfect chaos, we would then begin
ab avo
, as my master says, and do what we pleased
afterwards in remodeling it.
But to return, continued I, to the
inseparable
connexion between vice and ignorance. You
don't believe in it?
Let me answer you by another question, in
our yankee fashion. Which are most free from vice,
children or grown people?
Why, children, to be sure.
And which have most knowledge, children or
men?
Why, men, to be sure.
Then how can ignorance be the sole cause of
vice?
Mr. Ashley seeing me rather posed, went on.
My good friend, be assured the great error of
all system makers, is that of ascribing to one cause,
what is the result of the operation of many.
Degrees
of vice are not to be measured by degrees of
ignorancenor does the mere teaching of what is
right furnish any absolute guarantee for acting
rightly. There are a thousand temptations
assailing
us, from which all the knowledge that will ever
fall to the lot of man, can be but an inadequate
defence?
That is owing to the intervention of the
rascally
counteracting principles.
Call them what you will, said Mr. Ashley,
names do not alter things, nor can all thy master's
jargon about principles and circumstances, disguise
the passions and appetites of human nature, from
those who are not governed by mere words. It is
indeed a happy circumstance that the morals of
mankind do not depend upon the understanding of
metaphysical distinctions, else I fear there would
be little of morality in this world.
Then, said I, after a pause, you do not
believe
in the influence of knowledge at all?
Pardon me, said he, I believe it has great
influence
,
and that to know our duties, is essentially
necessary to the practice of them. They are, to a
certain extent, indispensable to the maintenance
and enjoyment of that freedom which is the basis of
national prosperity and happiness. If to know
what is right is essential to practice, it is still more
essential to the enjoyment of our rights, that we
should know in what they consist. This cannot be
known without education. All I deny is, that
human knowledge will suffice to the total
prevention
of crimes, or obviate the necessity of penal
statutes and punishments.
Punishments! said I, my master allows of
nothing of this kind. He has proved that
punishment
is not only cruel, but entirely ineffectual in
the prevention of crime.
As how?
Why because, notwithstanding these
punishments
,
crimes are committed every day, said I.
Ah! that is your master's usual mode of
drawing
conclusions. Because punishments do not
prevent
crime entirely, he concludes that they are of
no effect whatever. Because they don't do every
thing, it follows in his system that they do nothing.
He sees that crimes are committed in spite of the
punishment; but only Omniscience can see how
many others are refrained from, in the
apprehension
of the punishment that awaits them. In good
truth, my friend, of all thy master's absurdities,
and truly they are manifold, the absurdity of
dispensing
with punishments altogether, because those
already denounced are insufficient for the total
prevention
of crime, is the greatest. It is as if a parent
should say to a wayward and obstinate child, `Go
thy ways, and do as thou pleasest; I find ten stripes
will not prevent thee from transgressing, therefore I
will not increase them to twenty, but let thee off in
future, without any punishment at all.'
But my master relies upon the force of habit,
the absence of temptation, and the hope of reward,
said I.
My good friend, thy master relies upon
insufficient
securities. The force of habit is strong I
allow, but where is thy master's surety that men
will not adopt bad habits as well as good?
The absence of all temptation to do evil,
replied
I.
My friend, replied Mr. Ashley, where there
are temptations to do good, there will be
temptations
to do evil. They are coeval, co-existent
and inseparable.
But we are to have neither temptation to one
or the othertemptation is to be banished entirely.
Then what becomes of the hope of reward
is not that a temptation to do good? But be
assured
that rewards will not do alone in this world,
without the aid of punishments. You may
punish
a man for committing a crime, but it would be
impossible for society under any view, new or old,
to reward all persons for abstaining from it. But
even if society had the means, how is it to arrive at
a knowledge of the degree of temptation resisted,
of the degree of virtuous forbearance exercised, so
as to proportion the reward to the resistance? It
would be confounding all degrees of virtue to
reward
all alike, and it would be arrogating to
ourselves
the Omniscience of the Supreme Being, to
pretend to discriminate between the temptations
and forbearance of all those who abstain from the
commission of crime. Solon, one of the wisest of
lawgivers, ancient or modern, has said, that in
order
to make men virtuous, you must allure them by
rewards, and deter them by punishments. All
legislators
have proceeded upon these principles. Is
thy master wiser than the wisest of all ages? To me
it appears that his system, so far from indicating
superior wisdom, is founded in a total practical
ignorance
of man; and a complete misapplication of
the little abstract knowledge he possesses.
Then you deny that the hope of reward
operates
in favour of virtue, said I.
Indeed, not I. I only deny that it is sufficient in
itself to restrain the passions of mankindI find fault
only with thy master for affirming it to be so. A
perfect system can no more be made out of a single
principle like this, than a perfect man could be
made with only one leg. Thy system has but half
a leg in truth.
Here I observed that I thought my master at least
sincere and disinterested, in his plans for improving
the happiness of the human family, and that
however
he might be led astray by an unlimited
application
of his first principles, his object at least
should shelter him from ridicule.
Why, I don't know, replied Mr. Ashleya
good intention certainly goes far to sanction a
reasonable
degree of theoretical absurdity. But when
such absurdities strike at the root of the whole
frame of society, and in their operation go to
unsettle
the very fundamental principles of religion,
morals and government, the author of them
becomes
Fer Natur
a sort of common enemy,
whom it is lawful to run down, either by reason or
ridicule, whichever may be most efficacious. Now,
my good friend, I believe the sage Don Quixote
was the last man that ever seriously undertook to
fight with a windmill; except it may be that I am
somewhat liable to a similar imputation, in having
seriously attempted to battle with thy master's first
principles. To oppose fanaticism, or uncloak
hypocrisy
,
by serious argument, is a hopeless task,
because
the former neither reasons, nor listens to
reason
,
and the latter is always too interested to
become
a convert. I do not doubt thy master's
sincerity
,
although he talks a little too much, I think,
about increase of profit, pecuniary gain, and such
like worldly matters, which slip out occasionally;
but whether sincere and disinterested or not, he has
no right to demand, or you either, that because he
is serious, others must of necessity be serious too.
Goodness of intention, like charity, covers a
multitude
of sinsbut a good intention can only be known
to him who searches all hearts, while its evil
consequences
may be estimated by every rational being.
It would be making error perpetual to approach it
on all occasions with a most profound and
reverential
gravity. Such is indeed the infirmity of our
nature that what is often impenetrable to reason,
and invincible to persecution and torture, is
brushed
away by the light feather of ridicule in a single
moment. There is another good practical reason
for using this weapon in cases like the present.
Errors and mischievous absurdities, are best put
down by the good sense and good feeling of the
people, excited and awake nedby addresses to both.
This excitement is to be produced, either by
verbal
arguments or by printed publications, which
last, to be of any service, must be read. Now,
hundreds
will read a book that makes them laugh,
where one will read a book that only makes him
wise. I never expect to attack thy master's first
principles, in a book, but I claim the privilege of
laughing at them when I please, notwithstanding
your gravity. I hope you will take it in good part,
for I promise you, that in some ages and countries,
your master would not have been let off with a
laugh.
These arguments were renewed almost every
day, and I confess that each one contributed in some
degree to unsettle for a moment my faith in the
New View of Society. But though weakened I
was not overcome, and I exulted from time to time
in detecting Mr. Ashley in what I supposed
inconsistencies
and contradictions.
If I understand, said I one day, you deny my
master's first principle, that any character may be
given to a community, or to the world at large, by
means which are in the power and at the command
of those who influence human affairs?
I do, as usual, replied Mr. Ashley, to the
extent to which he carries it.
Then you deny the influence of power, wealth,
talent, superstition, corporeal strengthin short,
whatever has enabled men to obtain an influence
over nations, and to modify their systems of
government
?
My good friend, it appears to me the pupils of
perfectibility have a very imperfect mode of
understanding
argument. You, for example, seem to
suppose that I deny every thing you advance,
because
I don't assent to every thing. I believe if I
were to deny that this was a bright sunshiny day,
merely because it rains, you would take me up as
affirming there was no such thing as sunshine in this
world. Here, as usual, your master's proposition is
true to a certain extent; but to affirm that the
character
of a community entirely depends on its
rulers
,
or in other words, `those who influence
human
affairs,' is running into an extreme, and all
extremes
are absurdities. This would be making
man a machine at once, to be set in motion entirely
at the will or caprice of another. I certainly
believe
in the very weighty influence of rulers and
lawgivers, but I don't believe all of them put
together
,
could make the native of Lapland or
Kamschatka
,
an Italian amateur of the fine arts, any
more than I believe a pig could be brought to prefer
wiping his nose with a cambric handkerchief by
the influence of either his master's precepts or
example
.
I have seen a learned pig it is true, but his
12
scholarship originated in a proper distribution of
rewards and punishments, both which your master
discards from his new system. That power, wealth,
virtue and genius, give certain men great influence
in the formation of the community in which they
live, is certain. But there are a thousand other `
circumstances
,'
as your master would call them, either
aiding or counteracting this influence, and
modifying
habits, manners, and opinions. Your master is
only wrong here, as he generally is, in ascribing all
to the influence of man, and leaving nothing to those
more powerful instruments wielded by Providence.
He appears to deal in none but secondary causes.
Proceeding in the discussion of my master's first
principles, we at length came to the community of
goods, the perfect equality, and the great axiom,
that nothing was necessary to supersede the whole
complicated system of education, government and
religion but the proper understanding of the great
truth, that self-love and social are the same. In
discussing these points Mr. Ashley observed
That the object of my master, in making a
perfect
equality, and a community of goods, two of the
fundamental principles of his system, appeared to
be that of withdrawing from his Men Machines three
of the great sources of injustice and crime among
mankind, to wit, ambition, avarice and envy. But
the idea of so perfect a system of equality, so
perfect
a community of every thing, as would place
people out of the reach of the operation of these
passions
Counteracting principles, if you please.
Well, counteracting principles then, said Mr.
Ashley, good naturedlythe idea, I say, is absurd
and preposterous. There is an inequality in
nature
,
if nowhere else, which is beyond the control
of systems and theories; and even admitting there
were not, unless you could produce a perfect
equality
in that estimation in which men hold the good
things of this world, it would be impossible to
prevent
them from envying some one or otherfrom
indulging a desire to appropriate what is not their
own, and to control the opinions and actions of
their fellows. In short, you must place man in the
grave before you can place him beyond the reach
of the pass I beg pardon, the counteracting
principles
.
But were it even possible to introduce and
sustain for any length of time so perfect an
equality
,
as that all should be precisely on a footing with
regard to worldly goods, and worldly sources of
enjoyment
,
I fear there would not be the less play of
the little and malignant passions. Experience,
which is a surer guide than the vagaries of sanguine
or deluded theorists, has convinced me that it is
precisely in this state of perfect equality that these
ignoble passions are most excited, and most
mischievously
,
for the happiness of the community.
My observation has taught me that those who are
far above, or far below, or far distant from us in
any respect, are seldom the objects of our envy
or jealousy. But even if they should become so,
they are placed beyond the reach of their daily
effects
.
It is among our equals, and companions,
those who rival us in our favourite pursuitswho
cross our paths in the attainment of what we most
ardently covetwho share with or deprive us
of the gratification of some long sought good or
pleasureit is towards these that the malignant
passions are most frequently and most bitterly
excited
.
People so circumstanced, are perpetually
coming into conflict with each other, in the
attainment
of those objects, which in any state of society I
have ever been acquainted with, must and will
constitute
our most powerful excitements. These
petty rivalries, so far from being diminished, only
rage the more venomously, where people are
cooped
up in a small space and crowded together under
the immediate eye of the dispenser of honours and
rewards. Proximity is to the passions, what oil is
to the fire; it makes them rage ten times more
furiously
.
They will be found to operate in a
narrow
and confined sphere much more actively,
incessantly
and vehemently, than out in the broad space
of the great world, where there is such a vast
variety
of pursuits, and so much elbow-room for all,
that the passions seem to lose their force and
malignity
by expansion. There are so many
temptations
,
and interests, each pulling a different way,
and each in turn exercising a momentary influence,
that the mind is in a vast many cases saved from the
worst of all tyrannies, that of a ruling passion, the
source of most of the crimes and excesses that blot
the history of the human race.
Mr. Ashley was no better pleased with my
master's
great principle, that all that was necessary
to the perfection of society was self-love properly
understood.
Like all the rest of your master's principles,
said he, it is alike absurd and dangerous in its
application
,
by being carried to an extreme. Besides,
it is refining too much. Mankind are not to be
governed by metaphysical niceties, and it is
especially
dangerous, to attempt to make that the
foundation
of all virtue, which has ever been
considered
the foundation of all vice. In the language and
perceptions of ordinary people, self-love, is
synonymous
with the total absence of all the social
duties
,
and the danger of inculcating it as the basis of
social happiness, is, that you may persuade them
that excessive sensual indulgences, are not only
allowable
,
but praise-worthy. With ordinary minds,
I imagine it will be difficult to make out a clear
comprehension of the difference between that
self-love
which seeks its fruition in the indulgence of
the selfish passions, and that which finds it in
administering
to the happiness of others. The latter,
12*
the ignorant, at least, would be much more apt to
call self-denial, rather than self-love; and I should
have been much better pleased with your master's
system, had he condescended to administer to their
comprehension, by giving it a name they can
understand
.
But my master's system is addressed to the
wise, instead of the ignorant. There will be no
such thing as ignorance in the new system of
society
.
We are all to be philosophers.
What! a community of philosophers! That is
but another name for bedlam. And philosophers
too, passing the greater portion of their time at the
spinning jenney, the loom and the steam engine.
The school of Socrates certainly was nothing to
this. No doubt you will all be perfect in time.
Aye, sir, perfect Men Machines.
I have no doubt of it, said my friend dryly.
But, said I, we are not to be always learning
philosophy and metaphysics at the spinning jenney
we are to be taught all the moral duties, that is to
say, the childrenand instructed in their exercise at
the play ground. There, under the superintendence
of sage mentors, the little candidates are to be
initiated
into all the mysteries of the proper
application
of the great fundamental principle of
self-love
.
Mr. Ashley shook his head.
My good friend, there is a time for all things
a time for play and a time for instruction. If you
make the plays of children a medium for
inculcating
either morals or knowledge, they cease to be
recreations, they become tasks, and the whole end
and object of plays, to wit, relaxation of mind, and
wholesome exercise of body, is lost. You may
teach children to forget they are hungry by play
but neither philosophy or morals, I imagine, are to
be learned at children's plays, which essentially
consist, and in fact derive their principal
excitements
,
from the strife of strength, skill, courage,
swiftness of foot, or some other physical qualities.
Besides, if you are to make philosophers by play,
it is essential that they should play nearly the
whole time, and then what becomes of the spinning
jenney and the common fund?
Then, replied I, in great vexation, you don't
believe in one single one of my master's first
principles
?
Not to the extent to which he carries their
operation. Every one of them in my opinion, are
practically false.
Nor in the force of `circumstances?'
Certainly, if you mean the temptations of this
life.
My good sir, I mean no such nonsense.
What then do you mean?
Whythetheforce of circumstancesand
I suppose you deny that the counteracting
principles
are the greatest rascals in the world?
If you mean the passions, I do not deny it.
Pshaw! I beg pardon, but you talk nonsense.
There is no such thing as passions in my master's
New View of Society.
That may be, but this don't prove they have no
existence.
You believe, in short, that the present state of
society cannot be improved?
There you go againbecause I don't believe
it can be made perfect, you make me say it cannot
be improved. I think it may be greatly improved,
but not by such reformers as your master. His
system
may increase the amount of productive labour
it may, to use his own words, produce to the
administrators
of a community of this kind, `
a large
increase
of pecuniary gain, preserve the body in a good
working condition, and enable one woman to do the
work of twenty
.'
[15]
[15]
See New View of Society, for similar expressions.
If this is perfectibility then you
will undoubtedly be perfect.
These arguments, and a variety of others Mr.
Ashley from time to time brought forward against
my master's new system, I confess undermined for
a time my firm reliance upon its practicability. By
degrees, I abandoned all present thoughts of joining
the new association of which I saw flaming accounts
in the public papers, and begged Mr. Ashley to
procure
me some employment.
With all my heart, said he, what are you fit
for? Can you plow?
No, sirbut I can tend a spinning jenney.
Can you mow?
No.
Thresh?
No.
Plant corn?
No.
Make cider?
No.
Have you learned any trade?
Noexcept tending a spinning jenney.
Can you handle an axe?
No.
A spade?
No.
Do you know when to plant, when to gather in
harvest, and at what season to perform the different
operations of rural economy?
Noall seasons were alike with us, and there
was a time not for all things, but for one thing only,
watching the spinning jenney. But I dare say I
can learntry me, sir.
Accordingly I went into the fields with Mr.
Ashley
,
to assist in some light labours of the field, but I
made a poor hand of it. One day he set me to
driving a cart, and found me about an hour
afterwards
,
standing before the wheel watching till it
should begin to go round like a spinning jenney.
From time to time, he tried me at other
occupations
,
but I know not how it was, I could never get
on, for want of the inspiring din, and clattering
wheels of the cotton machinery, and was either
found quite becalmed in the fields, or watching the
motion of a water wheel, belonging to a mill upon
the estate. At length, however, Mr. Ashley hit
upon an expedient, that partly answered the
purpose
of setting my machinery going. He procured
a machine called in America, a horse-fiddle, which
was placed on a pole in the field where I was to be
employed. So long as that went, I went; but when
the weather was calm, the fiddle stopt, and so did I.
The people about laughed at me most
unmercifully
,
but I was delighted with the experiment, which
demonstrated entirely to my satisfaction, that I had
become a perfect Man Machine. In fact I became
more than ever a convert to my master's new
system
,
and nothing could afterwards shake my
conviction
of the perfect ease with which the
perfectibility
of man might be attained, if we could only
get rid of the circumstances, and their
confounded
abettors the rascally counteracting principles.
But not even the consciousness of superiority,
can sustain a man for any length of time against the
ridicule of all around him. I began to be tired of
Mr. Ashley, and he, I believe, became quite tired
of me, finding I was proof against his sophistry. It
one day chanced to fall out, that I came across the
sublime theory of the
Concentric Spheres
, which
struck me exceedingly. I determined at once to
leave Mr. Ashley, and as I had become convinced
that the outside crust of this world was not fitted
for my master's theory, nor my master's theory for
it, decided to try the experiment, and see what the
inside would do for us.
Where art thou going, my good friend, said
Mr. Ashley.
To search for the perfectibility of man, among
the Concentric Spheres.
Right, thou wilt find them together, I'll
warrant
thee. And thus we parted.
The rest you
know
.
STORY
OF THE
SECOND WISE MAN OF GOTHAM.
13
THE PERFECTION OF REASON.
My
brother Harmony, said Mr. Quominus, the
second Wise Man of Gotham, has fallen a
sacrifice
to the perfectibility of man; I, on the contrary,
am a martyr to the Perfection of Reason. I was
born in a country, where they have sufficient
wisdom
to make their own laws, but not quite enough,
as it would seem, to understand them afterwards.
In order to remedy this singular inconvenience,
they resorted to a method equally singular, and
original
.
They enlisted the wise men of other nations
in their behalf; and justly considering that it was
quite a sufficient effort of human wisdom for one
country to make its own laws, they determined to
resort to another for their interpretation.
Accordingly
,
they made a vast number of laws, believing
they could not have too much of a good thing, and
then sent beyond sea to get them explained. In a
couple of hundred years, these explanations, being
all carefully recorded in books, amounted to
upwards
of three thousand volumes, of goodly size,
containing upon an average, each, one hundred
contradictory interpretations of different wise men.
Such a mass of wisdom, and such a variety of
opinions
,
supported by such unanswerable arguments,
never got together under the same roof in this
world. Some very aged persons, who had lived
long enough to get about half through this
invaluable
collection, discovered that it was like the
sermon
that suited any text, and the text that suited
any sermonfor every man could find in it, a
decision
,
or at least, an opinion, to suit his purpose. A
system so supported on all sides, by all sorts of
opinions
,
certainly merited the honour of being called
a science; and such a science, as certainly,
deserved
a respectable name. It was accordingly aptly
denominated
the perfection of reason
, because
it furnished every man, however different his
opinions
might be, with reasons in support of them.
In addition to this great requisite of every
perfect
system, namely, that it should suit every body
this accumulation of contradictory opinions, it
was affirmed, possessed another irresistible claim to
the dignified appellation it had obtained. It
cannot
be denied, said the admirers of this science,
that although the laws are expressly devised to
settle
such disputes, or conflicting claims, as might
otherwise occasion a resort to force, still it is never
the intention of a wise legislator, that people should
actually appeal to them for this purpose. They
are merely to be held up
in terrorem
, or rather like
buoys, to float on the surface of society, for the
purpose
of warning mankind of the shoals and
quicksands
below. In this point of view, then, it is
apparent
,
that the more intricate and inconsistent the
laws, and the more various and contradictory their
interpretations, the greater delay and expense
there will be found in settling appeals to them, and
consequently the number of law-suits be greatly
diminished. Thus, when the laws become perfectly
unintelligible, they are absolutely perfect, for then
nobody in their senses will go to law, and the
science
will do its duty after the manner of a
scarecrow
,
which frightens the birds from the corn,
merely by flourishing its unintelligible rattle. Thus
you see, that no other name than that of the
perfection
of reason, could possibly have suited this
excellent science.
In addition to the singular happiness of being
born in a country, governed according to the
perfection
of reason, I was brought up under an uncle,
(my father dying when I was quite a child,) who
adored the law, and might be said never to have
had any other mistress. He was a bachelor, of
competent estate, but rather indifferent education
he was better fed than taught; and, when I say
he could read and write and cipher a little, I go as
far as strict biographical veracity will warrant. He
was without a profession, rich, and a bachelor.
Such a man has but one chance for happiness in
this worldhe must get unto himself a hobby, and
ride away as if the sheriff was at his heels. To
trace a man's hobby to its first cause, is like
searching
for the source of the Niger. Yet I think I can
account for that of my uncle. He had gained
possession
of a large part of his property, by a
law-suit
,
and ever after held law to be the perfection of
reason, while the honest gentleman who lost the
estate, held it in utter abhorrence. The suit
lasted
nineteen years, at the expiration of which, there
was found a great flaw in the defendant's title. He
had no more money, and no man ever successfully
appealed to the perfection of reason, with an empty
pocket.
From this time, it was his great delight to attend
the courts, where, as he used to affirm, with
surprising
satisfaction, they sometimes nearly argued his
head off his shoulders, and so confounded his
notions
of the distinctions between right and wrong,
that he could hardly tell the difference, until he
went home and looked over the ten
commandments
.
I remember the delight with which he
related a case he had read in some book of reports,
where a man tried on a confession of murder, was
acquitted by the jury, under the express direction
of the judge, because the charge set forth that he
committed the murder outside, whereas it
appeared
in evidence that it was done inside, of a certain
door. Another time, he fell into an ecstasy at a
decision which he always held to the day of his
death, to be the most exquisite specimen of nice
13*
legal distinction he had ever met with in the whole
course of his life. It seems a fellow had been caught
with a bundle of counterfeit notes, which the
indictment
set forth was found in his right breeches pocket,
when it appeared in evidence it was taken from his
left breeches pocket. After three days hard
argument
,
the court decided, said my good uncle,
rubbing
his handsthey decided that the prosecutor
had mistaken the
locus in po
or the
hocus in quo
my uncle, as I said before, was no scholarand
therefore the prisoner must be acquitted. Had the
law never done any thing else, but make this
distinction
between a man's pockets, it would in his opinion
have fully merited its title of the perfection of
reason
.
It is worth while to go a thousand leagues,
would he say, to find out how little the actual
commission of a crime has to do with the real
matter of fact, in the eye of the perfection of
reason
.
It is all settled by the
hocus in quo
which I
suppose is what we call
hocus-pocus
in English.
Like a vast many ignorant people, he mistook
quibbling subtilty for deep reasoningthe art of
confounding with that of enlightening the
understanding
incomprehensibility
for clearness, and
perplexity for wisdomforgetting, or rather, never
having discovered, that true wisdom is perfect
simplicity
.
The good gentleman, however, almost
exclusively
confined his idolatry to the common law. He
considered it not only the perfection of reason, but
the wisdom of ages. Nothing, indeed, could equal
his admiration of the common law, except his
thorough contempt for statute and civil law. If he
could have had his will, he would have outlawed
the statutes, and made it capital to read Justinian,
Mercy upon us! how he would rail at Caius,
Ulpian
,
Papinian, Tribonian and the rest of the civil
law gentlemen, whom he called by no other name
than pettifoggers of the forum. Not that he knew,
or had ever read a word of either of these writers.
His contempt was perfectly gratuitousit was the
homage of ignorance at the shrine of prejudice.
Next to his veneration for the common law, was
his profound respect for English judges
confounding
I
beg pardon, expounding it. Even their
contradicting
themselves every day, did not alter his
opinion that they were the only inspired high
priests of the perfection of reason. Towards the
judges and jurists of other countries he looked
rather
askew, believing that human reason never
attained
to any tolerable degree of perfection out of
the three kingdoms, and that a French, Italian,
German, or Dutch judge, knew no more about
managing
the common law, than they did about
boxing
,
or any other abstruse science. But of all the
judges, past or present, he, like most ignorant
people
,
held those of his own country the cheapest for
divers reasons. He maintained that they either had
no opinions of their own, or were afraid to assert
them. That they were in fact little better than
instruments
in the hands of subtle lawyers, or mere
echoes of the decisions of others. He once went
so far as to swear, he could teach a parrot to retail
the decisions of his betters, and thus make a capital
judge of him, for his gravity would pass for wisdom.
So far indeed did he carry this unjust prejudice, as
to declare it his firm conviction, that if the
developement
of their organs, was examined by a
competent
phrenologist, nine out of ten would be found
destitute of the organ of judgment. But in this, I
am convinced, notwithstanding the causes I have to
complain of the perfection of reason, the good
gentleman
carried his prejudices beyond all reasonable
bounds. I have had, as you will perceive in the
course of my narrative, pretty sufficient reason for
dissatisfaction on this head. But notwithstanding
I am free to bear testimony to the talents, learning,
and uprightness of the great majority of the judges
of my native country. As respects the
administration
of justice, they are in my opinion, as able and
upright, as the perfection of reason will permit them
to be. If they err at all, I am inclined to think it
is in permitting too great a latitude to the
subtilties
and sophistries of ingenious pleaders; and in
giving undue weight to ancient precedents, derived
from reasons long since inapplicable to the state
of our manners, habits and social relations. A
want of sufficient confidence in their own opinions,
appears to me another fault, which, however,
almost
deserves to be pardoned on account of its
novelty
.
It has happened to me more than once, to
hear a judge decide upon a case, on the ground of
some recorded decision of another judge, when I
myself would a thousand times rather have
trusted
it to his own unbiassed sense of right and
wrong. It seems odd, to see a lawyer teaching a
judge his lesson, out of a pile of books, and making
him who is there as a master, appear more like a
scholar, learning his alphabet from some beardless
pedagogue.
However this may be, my uncle had a most
vehement
and perfect veneration for the common law,
and for English judges sitting in judgment upon it,
and from time to time pronouncing it to be,
sometimes
flesh, sometimes fish, and sometimes fowl.
I verily think, if he could only have found out in
what impenetrable labyrinth the common law was
enshrined, he would have made a pilgrimage to the
spot. Indeed, he once talked very seriously of
going
to England only to see the chief justice of the
common pleas in his gown and wig. But he was
prevented by one of those untoward accidents,
which disconcert the great schemes of life. He
died before he could come to a determination.
This, however, was long after he had condemned
me to study the perfection of reason. He decreed
that I should be a lawyer, though I am unalterably
convinced, that both nature and fate intended me
only for a client.
I was accordingly sent into the country to live
with a learned jurist, who boarded a certain number
of pupils, to whom he read law lectures three times
a week. In the intervals, we dipt into the works of
the famous writers who have analyzed and laid
down the great principles of the law. We knew
nothing, however, and learned nothing of the real
mysteries of the profession; nor did I discover
until
after long experience in the world, that the
theory
and the practice of the law, were no nearer related
to each other, than the two extremes of the same
earth. They were the antipodes of each other.
Here in the retirement of a country mansion, and
apart from the great business of the world, which
alone furnishes the practical application and
infallible
test of all human institutions, I revelled in
the beautiful theory of the law. Every where I
read the most lofty and eloquent eulogiums on the
science, from the pens of the greatest names; and
every where I saw in the English books, the
highest
,
most unqualified testimony to the unequaled
excellence of the common law, above all others. It
was the aggregate of human experience, the
perfection
of reason. I actually fell in love with it, and
studied with an amorous enthusiasm which I can
hardly believe possible, now that my mistress has
jilted me so many times.
At the end of three years, I was sent for to my
worthy uncle, who was dangerously ill. I found
him in the hands of a physician, who had himself
invented six new diseases, and of course must have
been a clever fellow. But my poor uncle's time
was fast approachinghe grew worse every day,
and the doctor invented a new name for every new
symptom that appeared. Calling me one morning
to his bed side, he expressed his affection for me,
and said he had left me all he was worth in the
world. You will find yourself richbut
remember
that riches make themselves wings, and fly
away. Remember too, that the only way to
restrain
their flight, is by a proper knowledge of the
laws whereby you will be enabled to take care of
your wealth. By knowing what is lawful and what
is not lawfulby applying the immutable rules of
right and wrong as defined by the lawsI mean
the common lawyou will have a due sense of
your rights and duties, and thus no danger can
befall
you.
Rising upon his elbow, he continued, with an
enthusiasm
that lent new light to the dying taper
Law is indeed the perfection of reason
therefore
it must necessarily conform to the purest
principles
,
and inculcate the soundest doctrines of
morality
.
It is therefore the great worldly monitor to
teach us what is due to ourselves and to others. It
is in fact, a practical commentary upon the great
and divine precept, `that we should do to others,
what we would they should do unto us.' It is
likewise
a `rule of action,' as hath been truly defined.
It must therefore be founded upon immutable
principles
.
It is intended for the daily use and
government
of people of common sensetherefore, it
must of necessity be so plain and simple in its
precepts
,
as to be within the comprehension of the
most ordinary understanding. Dost thou
reverence
this noble science, my dear nephew?
I do, replied I, bowing reverentially.
Dost thou believe in Holt, Hale, Somers,
Hard-wicke
,
lord Raymond, chief justice Coke, judge
Buller, lords Mansfield, Thurlow, Ellenborough and
all the English judges?
In every mother's son of them, said I, little
wotting that I had pledged myself to the belief of
greater contradictions, than I could digest for the
rest of my life.
And in the common law? quoth he.
I believe it to be the perfection of reason.
Enough, my dear sonnow take my last
advice
.
Never resort to any tribunal but the
common
law, if you are aggrieved, assaulted, or
defrauded
.
Eschew the court of chancery, as
clogged
,
impestered, and corrupted by an infusion of
that mischievous quality miscalled equity, which
the common law abhorreth. Thou hast only to
appeal
to the common law for redressfor that is the
perfection of reason.
It is the perfection of justice, said I.
I affirm it with my latest breath, said my good
uncle, and expired with a smile of triumph. When
the doctor arrived he discovered symptoms of a new
symptom, which he immediately christened by a
new name. There was a swelling under the tongue.
It was only an unnatural expansion of the organ
of common lawdid he examine the angle of
constructiveness
,
interrupted Mr. Le Peigne, the
third Wise Man of Gotham.
Not that I know of, said Mr. Quominus.
What an imperfect machine your uncle must
have been, said the Man Machine, not to know
that in the perfect state of society, there is no use
for either law or gospel.
Very likely, replied Mr. Quominus, but he
was kind to me, and left me a good estate. I am
therefore bound not to hear his memory insulted.
No intention in the world, returned the other,
but as you made free with the old gentleman
yourself
That may be, quoth Mr. Quominus, but I
don't like other people to take the same liberties.
He then proceeded with his narrative.
Finding myself in possession of a plentiful estate,
I determined not to enter upon the practice of the
law, except now and then
con amore
, and in the
meanwhile, amuse myself with such recreations as
my fortune placed in my power. As I was fond of
14
riding, I bought a horse of a famous dealer, for
which I paid a high price, being verbally assured
that he had an amazing number of good qualities,
and no faults. In a day or two, I discovered he
was broken-winded, and blind of an eye; of
course I insisted on returning the horse and
receiving
my money back again, on the ground of
deception
.
The jockey refused, alleging that neither
loss of wind, or of an eye, was the fault of the
horse, but his misfortune, and therefore when he
denied his having any fault, he practised no
deception
whatever. Moreover, he snapt his fingers
at me in defiance.
This was in my opinion a proper occasion to
resort
to the perfection of reason for redress. I
accordingly
invoked the shade of my uncle, and
commenced
taking my first practical lesson in the
common
law, by bringing a suit against the jockey. I
cannot describe my feelings on this first occasion of
applying to the grand tribunal of human reasonI
looked upon myself, as now exercising the highest
privilege that could possibly fall to the lot of
humanity
,
and entered the court with the awe of a
young devotee for the first time kneeling at the
shrine of his patron saint. Being somewhat
addicted
to blushing, which our lecturer assured us was
always a sign of a bad cause, I employed on this
occasion, a lawyer, who was seldom, if ever, guilty
of that legal enormity. The jury being called and
sworn, the trial commenced.
I proved all I thought necessary, namely, that I
had paid the full price of a good horse, and got one
that was good for nothing. I was satisfied that in
the eye of the perfection of reason, this would of
course be deemed a case of deception, if not fraud.
But I was mistaken with a vengeancethe
perfection
of reason was not so easily satisfied. I was
cross questioned for three quarters of an hour, by a
fellow that had the throat and the impudence of ten
brazen trumpets, until I began to doubt whether I
had actually bought a horse, or a cow. I fell into
a horrible perspiration. As the trial proceeded, I
found this was not by any means so clear a case as
I imagined. Common sense to be sure would have
been perfectly satisfied that I had been cheated;
but in the eye of common law and the perfection of
reason, it appeared exquisitely doubtful. The
difficulty
was in finding out whether I had in fact
received
a warranty for the horse. My lawyer
insisted
that paying the full price of a good horse, was
presumptive proof of warrantyno man in his
senses would wilfully give as much for a horse he
knew to be bad, as for a good one. The brazen
trumpet then attempted to prove me out of my
senses, at the same time stoutly maintaining that
by the perfection of reason, every man had a right
to the benefit of his superior knowledge in
making
a bargain. He has a right too, to keep
secret
every fact that may operate to his disadvantage.
Accusare nemo se debet nisi coram deo
, cried
he, no man is obliged to accuse himselfor his
horse.
Ignorantia facti excusat
, exclaimed my
champion
,
my client was ignorant of the facts of
blindness
and broken wind.
Ignorantia non excusat legem
, brayed he of
the trumpet.
Communis error facit jus
, retorted my lawyer.
Lord Raymond is on our side, in addition to
whose high authority, I have four chief justices, one
baron in eyre, and equity besides in our favour.
A fig for equitycommon law has nothing to do
with it, brayed the trumpet.
In omnibus quidem maxime tamen, in jure
Aequitas
est
, exclaimed our sideprecedents
innumerable
in our favour.
Pish!
Judicandum est legibus non exemplis
,
quoth trumpet
Caius, Ulpian, Tribonian.
St. Thomas Aquinas.
The French judges on our side.
The English judges on ours.
Do unto others as you would they should do
unto you.
That's not law.
No, but its gospel.
The opposite counsel must be hard run for
law, your honours, when he is obliged to resort to
gospel.
Omne actum ab agentis intentione est
Judicandum
,
said our side.
Caveat Emptor
! answered the brazen
trumpet.
This did our businessat that awful
annunciation
my counsel was struck dumb, and word spake
never morethe judge nodded approbation
Caveat
emptor
carried the daythe jury gave a
verdict
in favour of the jockey, and my horse being
thus legally reinstated in the possession of his eye
and his wind, was left on my hands as an excellent
purchase.
I must acknowledge this decision a little
undermined
my faith in the common law, as in
addition
to a bad horse on my hands, I had a bill of costs
to pay besides. However, impressions of long
growth and standing are not worn away at once.
To be sure, law was I found rather an expensive
article. But after all, it is the price that constitutes
the value of a thing in the common estimation, and
it is doubtful whether the ignorant would not come
to despise the law, if they could get it for nothing.
Upon the whole, I continued to cherish a profound
devotion for the perfection of reason.
This devotion was, however, destined to receive
another shock, in consequence of a very trifling
affair
,
14*
which, however cost me no small expense and
vexation. It happened that one day being in
immediate
want, I called in at a shop, picked out a pair
of ready made boots, paid for them the full price
and ordered them to be sent home. After wearing
them a day or two, they went to pieces, the leather
and workmanship being equally bad. Upon the
cobbler absolutely refusing to take back the boots
and return the money, or make any other
satisfaction
,
I again resorted to the great tribunal of human
reason. I was certain the law was on my side on
this occasion, for I had witnessed not long before a
decision on a case which I believed exactly
parallel
,
in which the buyer had recovered. I
employed
the same lawyer, who as ill luck would have it,
was again opposed by he of the brazen trumpet.
To make all sure, the boots were produced in
open court, and admitted on all hands to be utterly
infamous. Even the opposite counsel could say
nothing in their behalf. But he had a great deal to
say for all that. He produced six maxims in good
law latin in his favour; but as my counsel matched
him with six more on our side, that account was
pretty well balanced. We then quoted opinions
and decisions without number, showing there was
always an implied warranty where a fair price was
given for a pair of boots. The opposite side
denied
that this was law, and to it they went, tooth and
nail, marshalling Grotius, Wolf, Puffendorf, Ulpian,
Papinian, and Tribonian, Hale, Holt, Mansfield,
Thurlow and Ellenborough, against each other; for,
however strange it may seem, the perfection of
reason
,
is precisely what the most reasonable people
differ about in toto. There was a bloody battle of
words between them, and all about a pair of bad
bootsthat nobody denied were bad.
'Tis contrary to reason that a man should pay
for what is worth nothing, said we.
Reason has nothing to do with the question,
said the other.
Law is the perfection of reasonand the
perfection
of reason is to be honest.
I appeal to the court if that is law?
The court decided it was not law.
'Tis reason and philosophy. Socrates, says
that the principles of all law are founded in
philosophy
.
Pooh!Socrates was no lawyer.
But he was a sage of antiquity.
Yes, but he was not a sage of the lawand as
for antiquitythey had no books of reports, and
how should they know any thing of the law?
But for all that, said my counsel, lord
Mansfield
calls Socrates `the great lawyer of antiquity.'
The dl he doesI beg pardon of the
honourable
courtbut really my surpriselord
Mansfield
says sowhy, then there is something in it.
He
was a sage of the law. I submit to the
definition
of Socrates, and my learned friend is welcome
to all he can make of it.
The two combatants, each in his turn, read a
number of opinions and cases, from a pile of books
as high as a man's head, each differing from the
other so completely, that I was at that moment
seriously
inclined to compare the law to Hydra, with
its hundred heads, each uttering a different
language
.
What, however, surprised me most, was,
that the opinions of our own judges seemed to
be of little or no authority. Whence I concluded
that human reason was not quite so perfect here, as
in England and elsewhere. I began to be weary of
all this turmoil about my boots, and fairly wished
them in the Red sea.
May it please the court, said I, with due
submission
,
I thought I came here to be judged by a
court and jury of my own fellow citizens and not by
Grotius, Papinian, or my lord chief justice of
England
,
whom I don't wish to trouble about such a
small affair. To cut the matter short, if the
counsel
on both sides will say no more about it, we will
put the law quite out of the question and leave it
to the jury to say whether the boots were bad or
not.
That is impossible, said the judge, the law
must take its course now, and the cause be decided
secundum artem
. Go on, gentlemen.
Facilis descensus
, said the brazen trumpet,
winking at my counsel.
Away they tilted again, and the desperate battle
of the books was renewed with greater vigour than
ever. Common law, civil law and statute law took
the field in the armour of a thousand words, and
long before the contest ended, neither myself or the
jury, such is the perfection of reason, could tell
what was law, or what was reasonor whether
there were any such things in the world. Law
maxims flew about like hail, and as it appeared to
me quite as much at random, for I confess I could
not make out the application of some of them.
Velutas pro lege semper habetur
, said the
brazen
trumpet, it has always been the custom to sell
bad boots and that is common law.
Quid leges sine moribus vanae proficiunt?
What
are laws without morals, as Horace says.
Horace was a jack puddingthe learned
counsel
is irrelevant.
Ubi jus incertum ibi just nullum
uncertain law
is no law.
Tot homines quot sententiae
every man has a
different opinion of his own.
Semel malus semper praesumitur esse malus
your client has often cheated before.
Caveat Emptor
!
I began to tremble and so did my counsel.
Nevertheless
he would not give up the ghostbut
faintly rejoined
Aequitas sequitur legem
.
Caveat Emptor
!
Actus legis nulli facit injuriam
, said we still
fainter and fainter.
Caveat Emptor
!brayed the trumpet, with
a blast that carried all before it. My counsel,
after gaining a little breath, said he committed his
cause to the court and jury. The judge then
addressed
the jury, as nearly as I can recollect, as
follows:
Gentlemen of the jury,
There are four kinds of law, the civil law, the
canon law, the statute law, and the common law.
Three of these are decidedly against the defendent,
but the fourth, which is the perfection of reason,
is fortunately for him, at least one half on his side.
It is true the other half is against him, but of
that I make no account since it appears sufficiently
evident from the authorities produced by the
learned
counsel for the defendent, that the half of the
law which is against him does not apply to the
present
case.
Gentlemen, law is the perfection of reason,
and of course, nothing but a perfect reason can
comprehend it. It is, therefore, not to be
wondered
at, that there should be so many different
opinions
as to what law is. It is also a rule of action
but every rule has its exceptions, and in some
cases the exceptions are very often too strong for
the rule. Law, gentlemen, I speak of common
law, is also the wisdom of ages; but as might
reasonably
be inferred from experience, the wisdom of
one age being the folly of another, and the wisdom
of different nations altogether different in kind and
degree, there is much difficulty in defining exactly
what is the wisdom of ages. That it is the
common
law is certain, but nobody can tell exactly
what is the common law. It is best defined, as the
perfection of reason.
Nevertheless, gentlemen of the jury, there is
not that uncertainty in the rules of the common
law, that might be inferred from these observations.
Various judges decide in various ways, and upon
various grounds. Sometimes we go according to
Lord Coke; sometimes according to Lord
Hard-wicke
;
sometimes according to Lord Mansfield
sometimes according to lawand sometimes, but
very rarely according to our own conscience and
judgment of the case before us. Now, in this case,
gentlemen of the jury, conscience has nothing to
sayit must be quiet, and refrain from interfering
in the deliberations of the court, and the decision
of the jury. It is a question of common lawand
not of justice or equity. It is not for us to inquire
whether the boots were bad boots, or whether in
conscience or in honesty the maker ought to take
them back again, but whether the great maxim
which lies at the root of the common law, of
Caveat
emptor
, applies to this particular case. Gentlemen,
the buyer is bound to beware in all purchases, and
most especially in purchasing from persons of bad
character. It appears by the testimony of credible
persons, that the defendant is notorious for selling
bad boots. Now if a person will deal with a
tradesman of bad character, it is his own fault if he
is taken in. The fault in the eye of the common
law, is not in the seller for being a rogue, but in the
buyer, for not governing himself by the maxim
caveat
emptor
, and taking care of himself more
especially
on this particular occasion.
But we will admit for the sake of argument,
and not with any view to weaken the cause of the
defendant in this suitthat he is a man of fair
character
.
Still, gentlemen of the jury, this would
furnish no justification to the plaintiff in
disregarding
the great maxim of
Caveat emptor
, since the
common law, which is the perfection of reason,
goes upon the supposition, that every man, whatever
may be the character he bears in society, is a rogue
in grain, and therefore, in dealing with all men it
is necessary to bear in mind, that
Caveat emptor
.
Hence it is absolutely requisite, that in all
purchases
,
the buyer should procure a warranty in
order
to guard against this presumption of the
common
law. If he neglect this, he cannot pretend to
recover damages for any fraud or deception, except
in particular cases.
In purchasing, for instance, a pair of ill made
boots, the whole question of fraud or deception
turns upon the fact whether the shoemaker took
measure of him for that particular pair of boots or
not. If he did, the common law holds, that this
taking measure amounts to a warranty, and the
buyer is released from all responsibility to
Caveat
emptor
. If, on the contrary, no measure was
taken, the bootmaker however bad may be his boots,
is exonerated from all blame and responsibility in
the eye of the common law. And this distinction,
gentlemen of the jury, is manifestly founded in the
perfection of reason, and the wisdom of ages.
The mere act of measuring a man for a pair of
boots, is in the eye of the common law in the nature
of a covenant with warranty. And why?a
shoemaker's
measure is either of parchment or paper
if of parchment the covenant and warranty is the
stronger. Now, gentlemen of the jury, it cannot
be necessary to apprise you, that all covenants are
written either on parchment or paper, and
according
to the reasoning of the common law, the substance
or material made use of in measuring a man for a pair
of boots, being the same with that used in all
covenants
,
it follows, from analogy, that it is in the nature
of a covenant with warranty. This is one ground,
therefore, on which the law makes so wide a
distinction
between being measured for a pair of boots,
and purchasing the boots without being measured.
Another ground of distinction is this. The
presumption
15
is, that when a man buys a pair of
ready-made
boots of bad quality, without having been
measured for them, that these boots were actually
made for another person, or at least not expressly
for him. The intention, therefore, of the maker
was not to cheat him, but some other purchaser.
All that can be said is, that a bad bargain lay in his
way and he found it. There was no intention to
defraud him especially, and therefore, in the eye of
the common law, no fraud was practised towards
him individually. The buyer in this case has
clearly
no right to redress for an injury not originally
intended against him, but some one else. It is like
an unintentional blow, which it is not lawful for him
to resent, and it is in the nature of a sort of
Quixotic
career, to undertake resenting wrongs, or
redressing
injuries intended for other people.
There is another light, gentlemen of the jury,
in which the conduct of the defendant is justified
in the eye of the perfection of reason. It is held
that every man is permitted to make a fair use of
his superior sagacity and knowledge, and that
ignorance
is no ground on the part of the buyer for
setting
aside a covenant. The ignorant indeed are
apt in the extreme, to confound this exercise of
superior
sagacity and knowledge, with downright
fraud and deception. But in the eye of the
common
law, and consequently in that of reason, there
is a wide and manifest distinction between deceiving
an ignorant man by superior knowledge, and
deceiving
him wilfully.
Knowledge, gentlemen of the jury, is a quality
of which a man cannot divest himself at pleasure.
It is impossible for a wise man to be ignorantor
to refrain from making use of his wisdom. If then
by an involuntary exercise of his knowledge of
facts, of value, of defect, or of quality in an
article
,
he deceives one ignorant of all these, and makes
a good bargain out of him, in the eye of the
common
law, which is the perfection of reason, this is
but the natural and inevitable consequence of the
eternal and irreversible distinction between
knowledge
and ignorance. As well might you expect
the stronger animal to yield to the weaker in a
contest of strength, as knowledge to yield to
ignorance
in a contest of bargaining. The more
knowing
man therefore does not deceive the other
wilfully
,
which constitutes the essence of every
offence
,
but simply because he cannot help it if he
would. Physicians are punished for being flagrantly
ignorant of their profession, and people that choose
to make bargains without knowing any thing about
it, must take the consequences.
The law in this case, gentlemen of the jury, is,
that the plaintiff, not being measured for his boots,
there is no implied warranty. The defendant is
therefore to be considered as having merely made
a legal use of his superior knowledge of boots, and
the complaint of the plaintiff must be dismissed
with costs. You will find this laid down distinctly
in Twigg
vs.
Twistand innumerable other cases.
The principle may in fact be said to be settled on
the immutable basis of common law, common sense
and common justice.
The jury were so convinced of the soundness of
these principles, that they gave a verdict against
me without leaving the court. One of them, it is
true, made me an apology afterwards. We were
convinced you had been cheated abominablybut
the law was against you, and what could we do, my
good friend? I don't know, not I, replied I,
hardly knowing what I said, for to confess the truth,
I began to be strangely bewildered in the
fathomless
profundity of the perfection of reason. It was
three days, before I got rid of a strange buzzing in
my head, and came to any tolerable perception of
the distinction between right and wrong. Indeed,
I am free to confess, that this argument of the judge,
has ever since strangely confused me, so that to this
day, I am apt to mistake the voice of the law, for
the whisperings of conscience; and to confound the
latitude allowed by the former, with the restrictive
morality of the latter. The continuation of my
story will furnish more than one example of this.
This last decision in the matter of the boots,
made me for sometime rather shy of the perfection
of reason, and I came to a resolution, like some
quarrelsome persons who get winged once or twice
in a duel, never to go to law again, except on the
defensive. But it was not long before my habitual
confidence in the common law, together with the
last advice of my good uncle, again made me the
victim of
Caveat emptor
.
It happened about this time that an agricultural
society was instituted among us, and I became a
member, having a landed estate in the
neighbourhood
.
In order to prove myself worthy of my
station
,
I went largely into the improvement of the
breed of horses, and purchased several fine ones from
time to time. One day a fellow brought me a most
beautiful animal, which he presented to me as a
full blooded horse, with a pedigree equal to a first
rate legitimate monarch. After a good deal of
chaffering, I purchased him at a great price, and
the exhibition of the society happening the next
morning, presented the animal, in the full
expectation
of bearing off the prize for the best horse in
the county. You may guess my astonishment and
mortification, when the committee of investigation
solemnly decided that my horse was a mare. They
all burst into a roar of laughterthe story
circulated
through the fair with prodigious rapidity, and
there was a universal giggle that shook the very
firmament. I was quizzed to death, and to this day
the story is regularly told at the anniversary dinner
of our society. I was mortified to the bone, and
15*
determined on once more appealing to the
perfection
of reason, in spite of
Caveat emptor
, of
whom by this time I began to stand in great awe.
A fraud so open and palpable, I was assured
could not be sheltered even behind his sevenfold
shield. I could not rest a moment till I had
brought this rogue to condign punishmentwhich
was very unfortunate, for under various
pretences
,
he managed to keep off the suit for two
yearsso that I lost two years sleep, in addition to
being the laughing stock of the society. But for
all this there is no doubt that the maxim,
dilationes
in lege sunt odiosae
is as true as the gospel.
My uncle believed it, and so did I. But time
brings all things about at last. Time gives and
time takes awaytime strengthens, time weakens
time builds up, and time pulls downtime brings
us into the world and time takes us out of ittime
in fact does every thingit can even put an end to
a lawsuit.
My uncle used to dwell with rapture on the
sublime
gravity of the law, and of those by whom it
was administered. But I am bold to say that on
this occasion, there was not much to be said in
favour
of either. However, as usual, I proved the
sex of the animal, and the fact of her being
imposed
on me for a horse. This seemed all that
was material to a decision of the case, and I
remained
a few moments quietly expecting a charge
from the judge to the jury denouncing most
exemplary
damages for the injury done to my character
and feelings, as well as a restitution of the purchase
money. So sure was I of the justice of my cause
that I had not employed any counsel. This was a
great oversight, since experience has taught me
that justice is blind, and of course requires a
lawyer
to direct her. By this omission of mine, she
fell into the hands of the opposite counsel, who led
her astray entirely from my interests. His address
to the jury was, as nearly as I can recollect, as
follows
:
Gentlemen of the jury: The plaintiff in this
suit, relying, it would seem, on the justice of his
cause, has omitted to employ counsel, and thereby
set a most mischievous example to the world. He
has in effect committed a fraud, by withholding from
some worthy member of the profession the fee to
which his labours in the acquirement of legal
knowledge
have justly entitled him. Gentlemen, you
are bound to discourage this dangerous example,
by an exemplary verdict, if it be only on the ground,
that should it become general, you will in future be
deprived of the benefits of legal disquisition, and
left as it were alone in the wilderness of the law
with no other guides to a just decision, but the
feeble
and uncertain lights of reason and conscience.
Gentlemen of the jury, the case on which you
are now to decide, is one of extreme intricacy,
although
to the eyes of superficial persons, it may
appear
as clear as the sun. Indeed it is a common
and fatal error, to suppose that justice, law, and
equity, can possibly be apparent to reason and
conscience
at the first glance. Justice, gentlemen, is
represented as blind, and for what reason? To
indicate
that she cannot see, except through the
magic
spectacles of the law, upon the noses of the
learned counsel. Law, gentlemen, is represented
as a bottomless pit, and why? To indicate
metaphorically
,
that profound depth and obscurity which
baffles the visual organs of uninspired people.
Common law, gentlemen, what is it? It is the
sublime
of incomprehensibilityit is the philosopher's
stone, which has baffled the wisdom and researches
of agesit is nothing, it is every thingit is here,
there, every where, and nowhere. Sometimes it is
the conscience of the judge, and sometimes of the
jurysometimes it is the voice of the dead, and
sometimes of the livingit comes from the
mouldering
tomb, and from the judges' benchit is
sometimes
in the head and sometimes in the heartin
short, it is an ethereal essence, eluding the senses,
and sporting before the imaginationa mysterious,
inexplicable, indefinable and invisible guide, that
takes us by a hand which we cannot feel, leads us
by a light which we cannot see, to a consummation
utterly incomprehensible! I beg pardon for this
digression
,
gentlemen of the jury, to which I have
been tempted, by my veneration for the most
sublime
and mysterious of all sciences, and my desire
of warning you against indulging the common
vanity
of supposing that the case is perfectly clear
because
it appears so to you. I trust, if you will
honour
me with a portion of your serious attention, I
shall ere long convince you, that it is one of the
most difficult and complicated cases on which the
wit of man was ever called upon to decide. It is
the error of ignorance to make up its mind quickly
it is the province of learning to preserve the
judgment
in that salutary equilibrium of doubt and
uncertainty
,
which keeps us from deciding at all, for
fear of deciding wrong.
Gentlemen of the jury, the question does not
turn upon a mare or a horse, nor upon the fact of
the animal being purchased by the plaintiff, for
one thing and turning out to be another. All this,
I say, has nothing to do with the question. The
question is, whether there was fraud in the contract
or not, and to this I shall confine my argument.
Gentlemen of the jury, there are cases of fraud, and
cases of deceptionthere are intrinsic defects and
extrinsic defects that, under circumstances, may
vitiate a contract. Intrinsic defects are different
from extrinsic defects, and extrinsic defects are
different
from intrinsic ones. Intrinsic defects are
such as may not appear externally, and therefore
they may be made legal grounds for a presumption
of fraud. Extrinsic defects, on the contrary, are
such as address themselves immediately to the five
senses, and are obvious at first sight. In order,
therefore, that the plaintiff may entitle himself to
relief in the present case, it is necessary for him to
prove that he was blind at the time of making the
purchase. If he was not blind, he must of necessity
have perceived the difference between a mare and
a horse, and having so perceived it, if he purchased
with his eyes open, he purchased wilfully, and
cannot
plead deception. He became in fact a party
in the fraud.
Gentlemen of the jury, there are frauds so
monstrous as to amount to no frauds at all
deceptions
so gross, open and palpable, as to argue, either
wilful co-operation on the part of the person said
to be deceived, or a total deprivation of the organ
of making bargains. In such cases it is necessary
for the person aggrieved, and seeking relief at the
hands of justice, to prove himself either
non compos
,
or so near it as to come within the statute of
imbecility
?
The plaintiff has neither done one or the
other; on the contrary he affects to be learned in
the laws, and a judge of horses, although, I must
take leave to say that he is not very profound in
either. Upon the whole, gentlemen of the jury,
there is no ground for the charge of deception urged
against my client. The fraud would be too
monstrous
for human credulity; it is, as I said before, too
great for a fraud.
But, gentlemen of the jury, we will suppose, for
the sake of argument, the plaintiff in this suit is
not only blind, but actually
non compos
. We will
suppose him, moreover, a notorious swindler,
pick-pocket
and cheatwe will moreover suppose him
a person that has murdered his father, mother,
un-uncle
,
aunt, and several others of his nearest
relatives
we
will, in addition to this, suppose
I could stand this no longer
I beg pardon of the court, said I, but the
gentleman has no right to suppose any such thing.
What, not for the sake of argument? I appeal
to the court, whether it is not an allowable fiction
of law, to suppose, for the sake of argument, any
person we please, a rogue.
The judge decided that fictions of law, and
argumentative
suppositions, were allowable, and the
counsel proceeded
As I was saying, gentlemen of the jury, when
the gentleman thought proper to interrupt mewe
will supposebut, as I perceive, these suppositions
are not relished by the gentleman, whose conscience
seems a little sensitive on these pointswe will
suppose
,
gentlemen of the jury, for the sake of
argument
,
that one half of you were
non compos
, and
the other half utterly incapable of distinguishing a
mare from a horse. Suppose further, for the sake
of argument, that one half of you were intoxicated
at this present moment, and the other half asleep.
Or suppose, gentlemen of the jury, for the sake of
argument, that you were a low-bred, uneducated,
ignorant, obstinate, dirty
Here one of the jurymen, a stout, hard-featured
fellow, with little of the polish of any court but a
court of law, started up and exclaimed in a passion
I'll tell you what, Mr. Lawyer, if you go on
insulting the jury with your suppositions, dam'me if
I don't knock you downfor the sake of
argument
.
The counsel was rather alarmed at this
formidable
threat; but the privilege of supposition was too
dear to his profession, and too essential to a long
speech, to be easily given up.
Will the court permit itself to be insulted in
this manner? said he. Shall a counsel be
interrupted
in the regular discharge of his duty to his
client? I throw myself upon the protection of the
court, and appeal to your honour, whether I have
exceeded the reasonable line of discussion allowed
to counsel.
His honour decided that he had not, and
threatened
to commit the juryman for contempt. Go
on, Mr. Quodlibet. Mr. Quodlibet proceeded
As the gentlemen of the jury, (at least one of
them) seem not inclined to lend a favourable ear to
my suppositions, I will take the liberty of supposing,
for the sake of argument, that your honour is a
judge who brings nothing to the bench with him,
but a superficial knowledge of the quips, quibbles,
and quiddities of the law. I will further suppose
for the sake of argumentthat your honour is a
man so utterly ignorant of those sublime
distinctions
that mark the differencethe eternal and
impassable
separation between the two sexes,as not
to know a horse from a mare. I will further
suppose
for
the sake of argumentthat your honour is
entirely destitute of the faculties of seeing, hearing,
tasting, smelling and feelingthat you are neither
mens sana
, nor
corpore sano
that you arein
shortfor the sake of argumenta miserable,
ignorant
,
conceited, supercilious pettifogger, destitute of
every faculty, but that of citing exploded decisions,
and applying them to wrong casesthatfor the
sake of argumentyou are a mere parrot, saying only
what you have learned by rotean echo repeating
nothing but eternal repetitionsthat
At each of these suppositions, his honour became
more and more uneasy in his seathe looked this
way, and he looked thathe blew his nose, wiped
his face, coughed and hemmedbut it came to be
too hot at last, and he could no longer stand the
cross fire of these suppositions.
Really, Mr. Quodlibet, I don't seeIreally,
sir, it appears to me, that your suppositions have
nothing to do with the question before the court and
jury. I cannot sit still and permit this line of
discussion
.
Be pleased to confine your remarks to
16
the case in hand. Really, sir, I don't like to hear
myself abused, even for the sake of argument.
Why, may it please your honour, rejoined
counsellor Quodlibet, with a low bowwhat can
I do? The plaintiff has come here with malice
prepensehe has brought no counsel into court,
and has offered no argument in his case. I must
therefore either suppose he has argued the question,
and oppose a speech that has never been madeor
I must suppose a case and argue thator I must say
nothing, which is a case not to be found in any of
the books. Will your honour permit me to
suppose
that the plaintiff has actually offered an
elaborate
argument, in this case, and answer it
accordingly
?
I must either suppose a case, or suppose an
argument.
Any thing you please, Mr. Quodlibet, so you
don't suppose me an ignoramus, or a rogue.
Mr. Quodlibet then went on with increasing
animation
,
seemingly resolved to demolish the
shadowy
counsel and his imaginary speech.
Gentlemen of the jury, the opposite counsel, or
rather the plaintiff in this suit, has asserted that a
mare is a horse.
May it please the court, I asserted no such
thing.
Well, then, gentlemen of the jury, the plaintiff
in this suit has ignorantly affirmed that a cow or a
bull are synonymous.
I deny it, may it please the court.
Well, then, gentlemen of the jury, the plaintiff
in this suit, has founded his claim to a verdict, upon
the preposterous assumption that the law was
expressly
devised to protect the weak, the ignorant,
and the inexperienced, against the violence and
fraud of the strong and the cunning. Now, I
affirm
directly the contraryI say, gentlemen of the
jury, the law, whatever may have been its original
intention, is now principally directed to the object
of securing to the cunning and experienced of this
world, the fruits of that knowledge and sagacity, to
which in the eye of reason they are justly entitled.
The law, at least the common law as it is now
quite settled by the decisions of the English judges,
rests upon the principle, that the weak and the
ignorant
are naturally, and therefore properly, the
prey of the strong and the cunning, as much so as
the weaker and less wary birds and beasts are of
the more wily and powerful. In a state of nature,
strength and courage constitute right; in a country
governed by the perfection of reason, superior
knowledge, sagacity and cunning. Hence
originates
the great maxim of
Caveat emptor
(here I
began to quake) a maxim, gentlemen, which
inculcates
upon the purchaser of any article whatever
the necessity of wariness, deliberation, examination
and suspicionwhich says to him, if he makes a
bad bargain it is his own faultthat if he is
ignorant
,
it is his own faultthat if he is cheated, it is
his own faultand that, to sum up all in one word,
`
Caveat Emptor
.'
His honour, after a charge of three quarters of an
hour, in which he told the jury, what the law was
not, at least twenty times, omitting at the same
time, to tell what it was, ended, so far as I can
recollect
,
nearly as follows:
Gentlemen of the jury, to concludethe case
mainly turns, after all, upon two pointsfirst,
whether
a fraud may be so great, impudent, brazen and
enormous, as actually to lose its character, and
become
something else. Secondly, whether, in the
eye of the common law, a mare is synonymous with
a horsea horse with a mare.
As to the first point, I know of no case, nor any
decision, bearing directly upon it, by which to be
governed. I regret this, because I am thus under
the unpleasant necessity of being obliged to resort
to my own judgment to decide, a course extremely
troublesome and inconvenient, and savouring of
vanity. Fortunately, however, there is a decision,
in some one of the books, of a certain court of
judicature
in the kingdom of Brobdignag, which, in the
absence of all other precedent, I shall rely on in
this case. It was there solemnly decided that a
man might be actually too little for a dwarf.
Arguing
from the analogy of the two cases, I am
inclined
to believe, that if a man may be too little for
a dwarf, so may a fraud be too great for a fraud.
Now, gentlemen, it is almost impossible to
conceive
a more impudent, gross, and prodigious
deception
,
than to sell a mare for a horse, to a person
having the use of his eyes. It is in fact so gross a
fraud, that it is quite impossible to believe the
defendant
intended it for a fraud. When a human
being gets beyond a certain size, he is no longer
called a man but a giantso when a fraud is
committed
of an enormous magnitude, it ceases to be a
fraudit is a misnomer to call it a fraud, and the
plaintiff would be nonsuited upon that ground, if
there were no other.
Touching the second point, gentlemen of the
jury, there is no doubt that in ordinary acceptation,
a mare is a horse, but it is not quite so clear that a
horse is a mare. The horse, gentlemen, or as he
is called in the latin tongue
Equus
, gave name to
the equestrain order in Rome, which was so called
from riding on horseback. Now, gentlemen, there
can be little doubt that many of these equestrians
rode upon mares, yet they were called
indiscriminately
horsemen. I am, therefore, inclined to
believe
that mare and horse were considered as
synonymous
at that time. This is, however, opposed to
the maxim, that though a mare is a horse, a horse
is no mare, which being a common saying, whereof
the memory of man runneth not to the contrary, is
of equal authority with the common law, which
16*
cometh from we know not where. If you believe,
gentlemen, that a mare is a horse, you will find a
verdict for the defendantif you believe, on the
other hand, that a mare is not a horse, you will find
a verdict for the defendant on the ground that the
enormity of the fraud makes it no fraud at allif
you believe, however, that a fraud is a fraud,
however
gross and palpable, you must still find a
verdict
for the defendant on the ground that
Caveat
Emptor
.
I never heard this word, that it did not sound to
my ears like the croaking of the prophetic raven, or
the screeching of the ominous owl. The jury gave
a verdict for the defendant, with costs of suit, out of
due respect for
Caveat emptor
, and all I gained by
the perfection of reason, was a bill of costs a
yard-long
,
and the laugh of the universe. I was,
however
,
a little consoled, when an honest neighbour
told me I had certainly the most extraordinary
team in the worlda sound horse that was blind
of an eye and broken-windedand a mare that had
been miraculously metamorphosed into a horse, by
the magic of the common law.
Never, surely, was a man so jilted by his beloved
as I was by the common law. This last decision,
which established the doctrine, that a mare was a
horse, and a fraud no fraud, almost drove me mad,
and could I have conveniently found a country where
there was no such thing as law, I think I should
certainly
have sought it at that time. In truth, these
decisions coming thus one upon the back of another,
at first gave me a mortal distaste to the law,
particularly
the common law, with
Caveat emptor
at its
head. But when again, I reverted to the authority
of so many sages, all agreeing in pronouncing it the
perfection of reason, I was thrown in the
dilemma
of at length being obliged either to
acknowledge
the perfection of the common law, or to
confess
myself an ass. I was never in truth very
confident
in my own opinions, and yielding to the
authority
of great names, and early impressions, I at
length came to the conclusion that the sense of
justice, the suggestions of conscience, and the moral
feeling, by which it is supposed men may almost
instinctively decide upon what is right, and what is
wrong, were so many jack-a-lanterns, when put in
comparison with the steady light of the perfection
of reason. In short, I no longer depended in the
direction of my conduct upon my perceptions of
moral justice. I considered the perfection of
reason
as the only true guide, and yielded implicit
submission to
Caveat emptor
, firmly believing, that
if I could only get him on my side, I might cheat,
swindle and deceive, with perfect impunity, and in
strict conformity not only with the wisdom of ages,
but the perfection of reason. You will perhaps
wonder at this conclusion; but I am clearly of
opinion that many an honest man has been made a
rogue, by being disappointed in his search after
justice at the shrine of the common law, and many
a one perverted by its equivocal maxims. It is
too much in the nature of man, I fear, to convert
decisions against him, which his own innate sense
of right teaches him are immoral in their tendency
and unjust in their principles, into a warrant for the
indulgence of his own evil propensities.
Unquestionably
,
he who has frequently appealed in vain
to the law for redress, in cases where his own
consciousness
taught him he was right, will be more apt,
ever afterwards, to study what is law, than what is
right, and square his morality accordingly. At
least, it was so with me, and I have no hesitation in
confessing that at one time of my life, I became
little better than a rogue, merely through the
seductions
of
Caveat emptor
, and the perfection of reason.
While I was, however, wavering between my
early impressions of morality, and the temptations
of the common law, I was unexpectedly called upon
to act on the defensive in an affair of much greater
consequence than any of the preceding. This was
a suit brought for the recovery of the estate, which
I mentioned as having been gained by my uncle in
a lawsuit, at least thirty years before. He had
remained
in quiet possession, and so had I, ever since;
I should as soon have expected a suit to turn me
out of my skin, as out of my estate. However, a
suit was brought, and by a man that had failed four
times, since we had possessiongiven up all his
property, or at least sworn he had done soand
had never paid one tenth of his honest debts. If
he ever had any rights in the estate, they should,
in the eye of justice, have belonged entirely to his
creditors. These, however, were all dead or
dispersed
,
and the gentleman had now a fair field.
I was served with a declaration of war, which
made my hair stand on end. First, I had entered
by force of arms, and violently taken possession of
this honest man's estateI had beaten him with
staves, sticks, stones and what-not, till he had
scarcely a whole bone in his skin. Then I had not
only got possession
viet armis
, but not content with
this, had actually cheated him out of it afterwards.
In fact, if I remember right, I had got possession in
ten different ways. Nay, I did not stop here,
rogue as I was. I had fraudulently, forcibly, and
illegally kept possession, and forcibly, fraudulently
and illegally converted the proceeds of the said
honest
man's estate, to my own use, profit and behoof,
fraudulently, forcibly and illegally. Now I declare
solemnly, there was not one word of truth in all
this, yet it was no joke I assure you.
After this first shot, my antagonist cited me to
appear, defend myself, and make good my title. I
appeared, ready armed with two great lawyers, as
squires of the body, but as ill-luck would have it a
principal witness of the plaintiff was absent, and
application
was made to put off the trial.
Dilationes
in lege sunt odiosae
, said his honor, and granted
the motion. The next term, I appeared as
before
and
the trial was again postponed. In this
way matters went on for five or six years, during
which my opponent, under one pretence or other,
put off the decision. The different judges never
failed to quote
dilationes in lege sunt odiosae
but
then they all granted the delay odious as it was in
the eyes of the perfection of reason. I begged of
my counsel, as I was all this time kept in a state of
agitation and uncertainty, and could neither sell or
improve my estate, to bring matters to a close as
quick as possible. They assured me this was out
of the questionit rested with the plaintiff to bring
his suit up when he pleased.
And how long can he delay it?
Till doomsdayor until all his money is spent.
Dilationes in leges sunt odiosae
, said I,
shrugging
up my shoulders.
To be sure they are, replied my counsel with
infinite gravity.
And so he can keep me in this state of
uncertainty
all my life?
Yeaand you and your posterity for ever, to
the hundredth generation.
And this is called the perfection of reason, when
any wretch may thus keep the lawful possessor of
property as long as he pleases, in this state of
expense
and suspense. This is the perfection of
reason!
Unquestionablyit is as reasonable that you
who enjoy the sweets of possession, should suffer
the fear of being turned out, as that he who endures
the pain of being out of possession, should enjoy
the hope of getting in. This is the perfection
of equal justice.
At length an aged person, upon whose
recollection
of the facts connected with the former history
of the estate, I had relied materially in maintaining
my title, died. The very next term, the plaintiff
was ready and the trial came on. It was not the
absence of one of his witnesses but the presence
of one of mine, that was so inconvenient to him.
The trial occupied three daysone in hearing
testimony
and
two in hearing speeches, which after
all signified nothing as it appeared. It was the
cases cited, that decided the question of right. My
counsel cited Holtbut he was knocked down by
chief justice Buller, who butted him quite out of
court. After this first round they took a little
breath, and to it again. The opposite counsel
cited Strangeand mine Espinassethey quoted
Fonblanqueand we DallasPish, said they,
this is only a dictum of one of our own judges.
Your honour will turn to page 116, vol. 112,
Troutback
vs.
Sturgeon. Your honour, cried
we, will please to turn to page 250, vol. 99, Crane
vs.
Peacock. Lord Coke saysLord
Mansfield
affirms, your honour, in the famous case of
Cock-a-doodle manor, which settled the principle.
This last blow ended the second round, and in fact
decided the question in my favour. Lord
Mansfield
carried all before him, and our adversaries
never held up their heads afterwards. They
gave in at the third round, with a faint effort at
milling a little with Glanville, and a few of the old
school fancy.
The judge was at last permitted to say a little for
himself. In truth I began to think, he was to have
nothing to do in the business and that my cause was
to be tried by the judges of England, not those of
my own country. I have not sufficient recollection
of his charge to repeat it, but I remember his
decision
turned altogether on the authority of lord
Mansfield. Such was his exemplary modesty, that
he never intruded his own opinions, or appeared to
consult his own judgment. This seemed rather
odd to me, although, I had by this time become
pretty well accustomed to it. I could not help
thinking
that a plain man of good judgment and
acquirements
,
who had heard all the testimony
appertaining
to this special case, was better qualified to
decide
upon it, than even my lord Mansfield, meaning
no disrespect to his lordshipwho died long ago,
and never dreamed of me, my adversary or my
cause. Thanks, however, to my lord, to whom I
shall ever feel grateful, and who I have no doubt
was a very clever fellow, I gained my suit, and
rejoiced
mightily in the laws, which were now
entirely
restored to my good graces.
But I might have kept my joy for a better
opportunity
.
My honest friend was not satisfied like me,
with my lord Mansfield's decision. He appealed to
a superior courtbut luckily lord Mansfield reigned
paramount there also, and again I was triumphant.
It cost me all the proceeds of my estate that year
though; it was one of Pyrrhus' victories. My
honest friend again appealed to a still higher court;
I thought there was no end to them. Here he kept
me dangling for three years more, waiting, as he
afterwards boasted, for some new decision of an
English judge, that should overthrow lord
Mansfield's
doctrine, and turn it upside down. At length
such a decision was made by a sage of the bench;
one in fact that seemed made exactly to suit his
purpose. It was directly in the teeth of his
lordship
,
and unsettled the law of at least half a
century
.
In charging the jury, his honour, delivered
himself to this effect:
Gentlemen of the jury: The perfection and
beauty of the law consists in thisthat it is not
only a rule of action, but a rule which, being
founded
in the perfection of reason and the wisdom of
ages, is not liable to those changes, to which all else
is subjected in this world. Such is the stability of
17
this rule of action, that a man may at all times
know the extent of his rights and his duties, and
the course necessary for him to pursue, in order to
secure those rights and perform those duties. Law
is, in fact, the result of the perfection of reason,
based on the accumulated wisdom of ages. This
may be most especially affirmed of the common
law, which is expressly founded upon maxims and
practices, so ancient that the memory of man
runneth
not to the contrary thereof.
Yet, gentlemen of the jury, certain
self-sufficient
persons, misled by that ignis-fatuus common
sense, have affected to lament that, notwithstanding
this perfection of the common law, it is exposed to
one very serious imperfection. In the lapse of
ages, necessary to produce that perfect oblivion
of the origin of any rule or custom which makes it
amount to law, mankind have from time to time
forgot what the custom actually is, and great doubts
and uncertainties arise in consequence thereof.
Thus, say these cavillers, though there is no doubt
that the common law is really and truly the
perfection
of reason, if we could only rescue it perfectly
from the obscurity of ages, yet, as it is, we
must take it as we find it laid down by persons
who differ continually from each other. The
mischief, continue they, is, that such is the
diversity
,
the waywardness, the pride and the obstinacy of
human reason, that these oracles differ one among
another, upon almost every principle of the common
law. By this means, the common law, in effect,
ceases to be a rule of action, since it is impossible
to say that a dozen different rules can make one
rule.
In order to decide upon these contradictory
decisions, different judges resort, not to their own
opinions, but to the opinions and decisions of
others. Some are of opinion, that as the whole
force and authority of the common law is derived
from its antiquity, it follows, of course, that the
people of these remote ages were wiser than those
which succeeded them. As a matter of course, if
this position be correct, then the decisions of
persons
living the nearest to the sources and origin of
the common law, must be of the greatest authority
in settling its principles. They argue that if those
ages, and sages, which produced and expounded
the doctrines and practice of the common law,
were not wiser, or at least as wise as we are at
present
,
it were best to discard it entirely, or so modify
it as to make it comport with the wisdom of the
present times.
Some, gentlemen of the jury, on the other
hand, maintain a contrary doctrine, in expounding
the principles of the common law. They argue
that as it is a received axiom, that every
succeeding
age is wiser than its predecessor, the probability
is, that it must produce wiser men in every science.
Hence, it would seem to follow, say they, that
those decisions which approach the nearest to our
time should be most relied upon,in other words,
that every succeeding decision, is of weightier
authority
than the preceding one; and consequently
that it operates somewhat in the nature of a new
law, which abrogates the old. Among those who
believe that human reason is every day becoming
more perfect, I profess myself to be one, and of
consequence I consider, the latest decisions on points
of law as unquestionably the best. We prefer new
fashions in dress, furniture and other matters, on
account of their superior elegance, and why should
we not in like manner, prefer new opinions? There
is in fact a fashion in science and literature as well
as in every thing else; and not to follow it, is to
depart from the spirit of the age. A man who
should at this time of day, believe in animal
magnetism
,
and reject phrenology, would be considered
quite as antediluvian as one that should discard
high capes and put on high cuffs. Were a
physician
to confine himself to the lessons of experience,
and invent no new theories, he would never
become
president of a medical collegeand were a
lawyer to found his practice on the simple rules of
a written code, it is almost a moral certainty, that
he would never grow rich. There would be an
end to the glory of the profession, and the still
more glorious uncertainty of the law.
Gentlemen of the jury, it is a vulgar error to
suppose, because the common law is the perfection
of reason, that it is to remain stationary and
unalterable
.
To be permanently perfect, it must be
changing continually, in order to accommodate itself
to the wisdom of the age, which for the time being,
is always the perfection of wisdom. Every thing
new, is undoubtedly an improvement upon the old.
It may be objected, perhaps, to this doctrine, that
as the common law is a rule of action, it is
indispensable
that the rule should be known to all, and
consequently that it should be permanent. This
reasoning is entirely fallacious. In the first place,
there is no necessity that a rule should be settled,
or permanent, to constitute it a rule. The moon
changes every day, and yet nobody denies it to be
a moon. No two years are exactly the same, and
yet the seasons remain unalterableand no man
continues unchanged to the end of his lifeyet
nobody
denies that he is still the same man. So is
the rule a rule, though it should alter every day of
the year. The same fallacy is observable in the
argument
,
that a rule of action should necessarily be
known to those who are expected to be guided by it
in the common affairs of life. Such a doctrine,
gentlemen, would be fatal to the liberal and learned
professions. Men are expected to get well, when
17*
they grow sickyet is it absolutely requisite to
have physicians to cure them. They are,
moreover
,
expected to be acquainted with the laws
which are to regulate their conductyet it is
necessary
to have lawyers and judges to interpret
them, which we all know is rather a difficult
matter
.
If mankind were all virtuous, there would be
no need of preachersif they were all in good
health, there would be no occasion for doctors
and if they were all wise, there would be no
occasion
for lawyers or judgesfor no man would ever
go to law.
Gentlemen of the jury, I flatter myself, I have
now succeeded in establishing the following
positions
:
First, that the common law is the perfection
of reason, because it adapts itself to our reason, or
our reason adapts itself to the common law.
Secondly
,
that inasmuch, as the common law derives
its authority from its
early
adoption by our
ancestors
,
it seems to follow as a matter of course, that
the
latest
decisions on it must be the most
irrefragable
.
There is thus the wisdom of invention
belonging
to our ancestors, and the wisdom of improvement
belonging to their descendantsboth which,
combined
,
constitute the perfection of reason. Thirdly,
that though the law is a rule of action, there is no
necessity
that it should either be understood by every
body alike, nor indeed by any body but gentlemen
of the profession. Nor is it proper that even they
should understand it exactly alike, for in that case
the judges instead of having perhaps ten or a dozen
different opinions to take their choice of, would be
confined to one alone. Besides this, as two
different
opinions are necessary to a suit at law, if the
rule were so simple and plain as to be
comprehended
by persons of ordinary understanding, there
would be none but fools that would go to law, and
that would destroy the dignity of the profession.
Fourthly, that a rule of action need not be
permanent
to constitute it a rule, as instanced in the case
of the moon, which, although not laid down in any
of the books, is conclusive.
From these positions it results, gentlemen of
the jury, that you will find a verdict for the
plaintiff
.
I am free to confess, that had the decision of
lord Mansfield, in the matter of the manor of
Cock-a-doodle
,
been posterior to that of my lord chief
justice Bridlegoose, I should have given an opinion
directly to the contrary. The decision of judge
Bridlegoose, being the latest, is certainly the best,
as he has the advantage not only of lord Mansfield's,
but his own wisdom besides, to direct himwhich
is two to one at least. I acknowledge it is a hard
case, gentlemen, a very hard caseand I could
almost
wish judge Bridlegoose had delayed his
opinion
till this suit was decided. The defendant has,
however, his remedy at law. He can wait till a
new opinion comes out, in opposition to judge
Bridlegoose, and then commence a suit for the
recovery
of his property.
What a pity lord Mansfield had not been a little
later in coming into the world! I should have been
a rich man probably to this day, in spite of the
perfection
of reason. As it was, I lost my estate, only
because judge Bridlegoose unfortunately for me,
had the last word. I would have appealed from
this decision, but unluckily there was no court to
appeal towe had got to the top of the ladder, and
there was an end to the perfection of reason.
This blow was soon followed up by another, and
yet another, which both together left me destitute
of every thing like real property in this world, if
the word real can apply to any thing which lies at
the mercy of the perfection of reason. In
producing
the papers necessary to establish my right
to the property of which I had been divested, in
the manner just related, by the perfection of judge
Bridlegoose's reason, I unwarily exhibited two
deeds relating to two other pieces of land of which
my good uncle and his ancestors had been in
possession
almost a century. It happened that one of
these was without a seal, and the other did not
specify
that the conveyance was made to the purchaser,
his heirs and assigns for ever. The lawyer who
examined
them, immediately scented a couple of
exquisite
lawsuits. He went to work and after more
than half a year's indefatigable research
discovered
the heirs of the persons from whom my uncle
derived his title.
I was again accused, in technical phrase, of
assaulting
,
beating, bruising and maltreating, some
half a dozen men, women and children whom I
had never seen, and of fraudulently keeping
possession
of property, which had descended to me
through two or three generations. Formerly I
should have smiled at these attempts to dispossess
me, but I began to doubt whether, in the eye of the
perfection of reason, there was such a thing as an
indefeisible title even to the possession of a man's
own head. Besides, I was horribly afraid that
judge Bridlegoose might have been giving another
opinion, that would do my business as effectually
as the first.
In the first of these cases the flaw in my title
consisted
in the want of a seal to the deed of
conveyance
.
There was no doubt as to the hand-writing
of the person who made it; but still it was
contended
that the absence of the seal rendered the whole
a nullity. It was the seal and not the hand writing
which verified the instrument. I produced receipts
for the purchase, proving beyond doubt that a full
and fair value was given and received, but all would
not do. Even my own counsel had nothing to say
in favour of my right. All argument was waved
for once, and the judge gave his charge to the jury.
I was rejoiced to see that he was a different person
from the judge who had such a great opinion of
chief justice Bridlegoose, but I soon found I had
only got out of the fryingpan into the fire. His
honour began
Gentlemen of the jury: I cannot sufficiently
congratulate
both myself and you, that we are here
deliberating
and deciding under the purest and most
perfect
system of laws, with which any people were ever
blessed; a system combining the wisdom of our
ancestors
with that of our owna system happily
characterized
by the sages of the law, as the result of
the experience of ages, and the perfection of reason.
I speak, gentlemen, of the common lawwhich is,
I will venture to sayI can hardly say what it is
sometimes it is one thing, sometimes another
sometimes
it is founded upon a rule, and sometimes upon
exceptions to a rulesometimes it is defined and
sometimes it is not definedsometimes it is the
product
of ages of darkness, illustrated and explained by
the wisdom of ages of lightand sometimes it is the
offspring of ages of light, mellowed down as it were
into an agreeable twilight, by the obscurities of
ages of darkness. It is in fact, gentlemen, a chaos
of wisdom and experience, out of which issues
beauty and order, as did the fair creations of this
harmonious universe. Even its inconsistencies and
diversities, may be justly said to contribute to its
unequalled
perfection. As in a concert, the different
instruments all played by different persons, and the
different voices attuned to different pitches, men,
women and children; counter, tenor, treble, and
bass, all conduce to the nicest and most accurate
harmony; so do the different opinions of different
judges and jurists, administer to the harmony,
beauty
and perfection of the common law.
Another excellence peculiar to the common
law, is its capacity of adapting itself to times,
changes and circumstances, without any other
violence
than an occasional departure from common
sense, a species of instinct which the law holds in
little respect. Hence we find it in one age, one
thing, in another age, another thingin the mouth
of one judge it speaks one opinion, in that of
another
judge, another opinion, according to the
variations
produced by time, the difference of climate,
the wind, the fashion and other modifying
circumstances
.
Hence too, and this is another peculiar
excellence of the law, that let a man's case be
apparently
ever so bad, it is ten to one but he can find
somewhere or another, a decision of some court or
judge, that makes in his favour. This is what is
meant by the law looking with equal eyes on all
persons, and presuming every man to be innocent
till he is found guilty. The common law has in
fact all the qualities of the famous pair of
enchanted
seven-league boots, which, it is recorded, fitted
every body, great and small, from little
Hop-o'-my-thumb
,
to the great giant Blunderbore.
Gentlemen of the jury, the common law is, above
all, venerable forits antiquity, a point on which I shall
insist, particularly, as it has a direct bearing upon
this case. Its very essence consists in the obscurity
of its origin, like the claim of many families to
nobility
.
From this early origin arises the
indispensible
requirement of the common law, that a seal
should be necessary to constitute a legal
conveyance
of real property. The necessity of this, will
become sufficiently apparent, when we consider the
fact, that in those remote periods, which produced
that stupendous edifice of wisdom, called the
common
law, not one in a thousand, could either read
or write. I leave it to you, gentlemen of the jury,
to explain how it happened, as it did undoubtedly
happen, that the perfection of wisdom should have
orginated in the perfection of ignorance. It is a
severe reflection upon learning and refinement,
certainly
,
that to this day they have not been able to
improve upon this great work of ignorance and
barbarity
.
However, this we must leave to inquirers
in other placesuntil the English judges have
decided
upon this matter, I shall hold my tongue.
People that cannot write, or who consider writing
beneath their dignity and rank, generally make
their mark now-a-days, in the shape of a cross, to
indicate, I imagine, that by this sacred symbol, they
pledge themselves to what they have thus signed.
But in those early ages of the perfection of reason,
it was the custom to affix a seal bearing some
legend
or device, identifying it with the person to
whose act, or deed, it was appended. This custom
appears at least as ancient as the ra of Solomon,
and thus far we can distinctly trace the antiquity of
this peculiarity of the common law. Gentlemen,
Solomon was a wise man and must have had good
reasons for what he did. The seal of Solomon is
frequently alluded to in the Koran. In like manner
we find the ancient kings of Asia, signifying their
sovereign, behests, by sending a person with their
seal, as evidence of the orders he carried. To
intrust
a favourite with a seal in the days of
Haround
Alraschid, was to give into his hands the
power of the whole empire of the Caliphs. The
custom, therefore, of affixing a seal, is sanctioned
by great names, and long usages, the eternal basis
of truth and justice.
The practice thus derived from the remotest
antiquity, subsists in the present age, in the law
alone, the great depository of all the sacred relics
of time and ignorance, preserved by the hallowed
industry of the profession. I had like to have
forgotten
,
however, to observe that the reasons on
which it was founded have entirely ceased. In this
country at least, almost all persons of both sexes,
who can ever be supposed in a situation to make
conveyance of land, can write their names. If there
should be occasionally a solitary instance to the
contrary, witnesses can always be obtained to sign
18
their names, and thus verify the instrument. I will
not deny too, that the signature of a person in his
own proper hand-writing, properly attested by
witnesses, and verified by the signature of a
magistrate
,
is rather stronger evidence of
authenticity
than the mere affixing a seal. But this
does not in reality render a seal less necessary, as
a corroborative and security, in addition to the
signatures
.
It is easy for a man to sign the name of
another, and to imitate it with sufficient exactness
for all the purposes of fraud; but it is not so easy
to get a wafer or bit of wax for a seal. The seal,
therefore, is additional security that the instrument
is genuine. Besides, if it were not so, the very
tenor of the instrument is
witness my hand and
seal
. Now, if there is not seal, the conveyance
asserts what is not trueit presents on the face of
it a falsehoodit is therefore a fraudulent
conveyance
,
and must be set aside.
The jury accordingly set it aside; and thus was I
deprived of my land, only because king Solomon,
and Haroun Alraschid, not being able or willing to
write their names, signified their sovereign will by
a seal. It is not for nothing, that the most
enlightened
statesmen consider learning as so mischievous
an ingredient in human affairs. If there had been
no such villanous practice as that of writing of
names, my unlucky conveyance would have had a
seal to it, and I might have been in quiet possession
of my land to this day. As it was, I lost it for lack
of a wafer, or a little bit of wax, not worth a stiver.
I confess I considered it rather a hard case, that I
should lose one estate in consequence of one judge's
veneration for the
latest
, and a second on account
of another's veneration for the
earliest
practice
under
the common law.
Well was it said that riches make to themselves
wings and fly away; and if I am not mistaken, one
of these wings is the common law. At least it was
so with me. The very next day, as if to take me
while I was going, the other cause came on, for the
farm that had only been conveyed to my
grandfather
,
and not to his heirs, as was undoubtedly
intended by both parties. The amount of the
purchase money was acknowledged on all hands to
be far too great to admit of the supposition that
my ancestor, who was at the time of purchasing,
almost seventy years old, contemplated only a life
estate. Common sense offered another
presumption
in my favour, in the fact that the property had
never been questioned or claimed till the present
moment, a lapse of more than half a century,
by the adverse party. But these presumptions,
although conclusive in the eye of common sense,
were of no account in the estimation of the
perfection
of reason. The law was against me, and
there was an end of the business. It was,
moreover
,
an old law, which like old wine ought always
to take precedence. Moreover, it had been no
doubt founded in the perfection of reason at some
time or other, and though the reasons had long
since ceased to exist, still the law remained, and it
was the perfection of reason to retain the law,
when the reason had passed away. It was
unquestionably
the misfortune of my ancestor that the
conveyance was not fullbut
Caveat Emptor
!
Whenever I heard Caveat Emptor quoted, I knew
it was all over with me, and quietly resigned myself
to be dealt with according to the perfection of
reason
,
which has decided that if one man places
confidence
in another, he forfeits all right to the
protection
of the common law. Thus it appeared to
me that while the law inculcated morality, it upheld
fraudan inconsistency which could not but be
highly injurious to the integrity of mankind. The
judge charged the jury, that though there was not
the least doubt that the property was purchased
in fee simple for ever, and that it was both unjust
and unreasonable to deprive me of ityet, as by
the common law, which was undoubtedly the
perfection
of reason, I had no title to the possession,
they must of necessity find against me. As by
the common law and indeed the law in general, a
jury is considered as having no comprehension of
any thing but matter of fact, a verdict was given
against me as a matter of course. The opposite
party condoled with me on this untoward result;
but comforted me at the same time with the
assurance
that though he had an undoubted claim to
the back rents, for at least half a hundred years, still
he was too generous to bring it forward against me.
Thus does the law visit the sins of the father upon
the children to the third and fourth generation, and
thus was I dispossessed of three estates, one after
the otherthe first, by the authority of my lord chief
justice Bridlegoose, who was good enough to decide
upon my case without my knowledge or consent
the second, by the inexcusable carelessness of one
ancestor in omitting to have his deed sealed, as well
as signedand the third, because another of my
ancestors, forgot that in buying for himself he was
not buying for his heirs. I think, however, I may
say with perfect truth, that the trouble my losses
gave me was nothing to the trouble I had to
reconcile
these decisions to the wisdom of ages and
the perfection of reason. My perplexity was such,
that I fell sick, and for some time became actually
deranged in the attempt to bring about this
hopeless
reconciliation. In short, I fairly lost my wits
in searching for the wisdom of ages and the
perfection
of reason in the inextricable labyrinth of the
common law. When I recovered, I was told that
during my temporary alienation of mind, I had
delivered
more than one legal opinion, that would
have done honour to a lord chancellor.
On my recovery, my thoughts naturally turned
18*
to the state of my affairs. What, with the wisdom
of ages, the perfection of reason, and judge
Bridlegoose
,
I had scarcely sufficient left for the support
of a gentleman. I had a few thousands in the
funds, but did not know how soon I should be
deprived
of these, by the decision of judge
Bridlegoose
,
or some new luminary of the law that might
spring up in foreign parts, to my utter confusion and
ruin. In casting about for the best means of
retrieving
my affairs, an opening seemed to present
itself in the pursuits of commerce. I saw
hundreds
around me, apparently sporting in the
sunshine
of wealth, and rising from nothing to the
summit of opulence, as if my magic. I resolved
to commence business, upon the capital I had still
left, and the experience I had acquired in the
common
law. I flattered myself I understood
Caveat
Emptor
pretty well, and with it all the mysteries of
bargaining.
I must apologize for the transactions of that
portion
of my life upon which I am now entering. I
confess, when I look back I am ashamed of it. But
we have covenanted to disguise nothing from each
other, and I shall not spare myself. Thus much,
however, I will offer in extenuation. I had been
accustomed from my earliest youth to consider the
common law, not only as the perfection of reason,
but as the standard of moral obligation, the
guardian
of ignorance, the protector of weakness; and
the shield of the oppressed. But I had appealed
to it to avenge frauds committed upon me in vain,
and I had been stripped of a large portion of my
property, by decisions which my own reason, that
guide and monitor which is the only true prompter
of man's conscience, proclaimed were not only
unjust
,
but absurd and ridiculous. These decisions
had not only weakened my respect for the laws,
but my perceptions of right and wrong. Awed by
the authority of ancient usages, and great names to
support them, I was often tempted to think, that I
had myself mistaken the immutable principles of
morality and justice, and that the laws were after
all the only unerring standard. In that case, I had
a right to make use of the experience I had so
dearly purchased, and to avail myself of the
knowledge
which had cost me so much. Heaven knows
I had paid dear enough for it, and I thought I might
exert it, agreeably to the precepts of the wisdom of
ages and the perfection of reason. In fine,
gentlemen
,
I believe it will too frequently be found, that
a man who often appeals in vain to the laws when
his own reason and conscience teach him that his
cause is just; or who suffers by their operation,
without any fault of his own, will be very apt either
to take the law into his own hands, or revenge his
injuries and disappointments, by converting his
dear bought experience into the means of repairing
his losses, at the expense of others. There is
nothing
perhaps which is so productive of violence
and fraud, as a general want of confidence in the
justice of the laws.
I confess with shame and contrition that I
entered
into trade with a full resolution of making
Caveat
Emptor
pay back all it had deprived me of in
the whole course of my life. I was not quite a
rogue; but I was sufficiently so I fear to go to the
full length morality of the common lawand that
is far enough in all conscience. Preparatory to
commencing
business, I determined to reduce my
establishment
,
which indeed I had not the means of
keeping
up any longer. In the first place, I cast about
how to dispose of, to the best advantage, my famous
span of horses, which I was resolved to believe
most firmly, were not only both horses, but both
perfectly
sound and free from faultthey having been
so pronounced by the perfection of reason. By the
way, gentlemen, my last purchase, turned out a bad
bargain in other respects, having all the obstinacy
of her sex, and as many tricks as a monkey.
There was an old lady, a neighbour of mine,
very rich, and nearly blind, who had an old
coachman
half blind himself, and so phlegmatic, that
whenever he drove his mistress an airing, a
pleasant
,
lively, talkative young lady, of the
neighbourhood
,
was always invited to be of the party, to sit
on the front seat, and keep him awake by
incessant
talking. In short, the lady was old, the
coachman old, all the servants of the
establishment
so old, that they had hardly one of the five
senses in perfectionthe horses and carriage were
old, and the cats and dogs so very old, that they
had outlived their instincts, and lay down like the
lion and the lamb in peace together.
This worthy old lady, hearing I was going to
break up housekeeping, took it into her head to
buy my horses, to replace her own, one of which
had been knocked up in the desperate effort to trot
down a hill. I sent them over for her to look at,
and the whole household turned out I was told to
examine their points. There was not a good eye
among the whole of them. The old lady bought
my span, and the very next day, being Sunday, set
forth to a neighbouring church to exhibit her new
acquisition. She arrived there, after no small
vexation and delay, owing to the vagaries of the
ever memorable feminine horse which has
heretofore
figured in my story. She had a habit of
stopping
short now and then, but was not otherwise
vicious
;
and it was worth while to see the one eyed
gentleman, her companion, turn round and look at
her on these occasions, as if to ask an explanation.
He was certainly a horse of great parts, though he
had but one eye and was broken-winded.
There was not a soul at church but knew my
horses, and had heard the story of the mysterious
animal that was a horse in the eye of the law, and
a mare in the eyes of every body else. They all
flocked round, and the tale was repeated at least
two hundred times. Never since the days of Gil
Blas' mule, was an animal so taken to pieces,
criticised
,
reviewed, and held up to nought, as were
those of the good old lady. She was in such a
passion, that when she got home, she could not tell
either chapter or verse of the text. The next
morning she sent them over, with a tart note,
charging me with deception, and demanding her
money back again.
Caveat Emptor
! cried I, and snapt my
fingers
at the old lady, just as the horse jockey did at
me. I was sure I had the common law on my side
this time, and defied justice and all her works. I
had given no warranty, and had not even verbally
answered for my horses. The old lady brought a
suit; but I cared not a rush for it, and only
cautioned
my lawyer to ply them well with
Caveat
Emptor
, whenever he had an opportunity. I ought
to mention there was a new judge on the bench;
the admirer of judge Bridlegoose and his decisions,
being absent on some account or other. As ill
luck would have it the brazen trumpet, who by his
eloquence had wrought the jury to pronounce one
of these same horses, a sound horse in the eye of
the common law, was again opposed to me.
In the first place, the old lady proved the horses
were both bad. But this I did not mind, so long
as I had honest
Caveat Emptor
on my side.
In the second place, she proved that I knew they
were bad. The counsel read the record of the
decision
,
by which I had the blinker thrown on my
hands, to prove him an unsound horse. Now this
was the very decision on which I had relied, in
conjunction
with
Caveat Emptor
, to bring me off with
flying colours. I calculated to prove by it, that as
he had been decided virtually at least, to be a
sound animal, by being thrown on my hands as a
fair purchase, I had a right to dispose of him as
such at any time.
After the testimony was concluded, the brazen
trumpet attacked me with the whole force of his
lungs, and tore me all to nought, for doing exactly
what the perfection of reason authorises every body
to domaking use of my superior knowledge in
bargaining. I am sure I had paid for it. He
contradicted
every word he said on a former trial,
and made me out to be one of the greatest rogues
in existence. And so I was, for aught I know, for
I had been corrupted by the common law, and
Caveat Emptor
. My old counsel made an
excellent
defenceindeed he and the other counsel,
seemed to have exchanged souls, or at least tongues
on this occasion. I remarked that the trumpet
used the very same arguments against me as
defendant
,
that my present counsel did in my favour
when I was plaintiff, in a similar suit, and that on
the contrary my counsel borrowed his old
arguments
to apply to this new suit. All this struck
me as odd, but I suppose the perfection of reason
consists in the capacity of accommodating itself to
time and occasion. But it was the argument of
the judge that threw me into despair.
Gentlemen of the jury, said he, the common
law is not only the wisdom of ages, and the
perfection
of reason, but it is likewise essentially a moral
code which at the same time that it protects and
vindicates the rights of the people, teaches them
their duties. The learned counsel for the
defendant
has relied mainly upon the suit, which has just
been cited, in which the very horse now in
question
,
was decided to be a fair purchase and left on
his hands. He contends that this decision was in
effect sanctioning the practice of imposing an
unsound
animal upon a purchaser, or at least if not
so, he contends that it decided the character of the
horse as a sound animal, in the eye of the common
law.
Gentlemen, the learned counsel forgets, that
though this is the same horse, the court and jury
are very different from those which decided the
former case. My worthy brother, for whose
learning
,
sagacity and legal acumen, I have the most
exalted
respect, is, however, I must be permitted to
say, rather too much under the thumb of
Caveat
Emptor
, and follows the practice of the English
judges, who I think give it too great a latitude in
covering fraud and deception. Now, I, gentlemen,
incline to the doctrines of Grotius, Wolf and
others
of the writers on natural law, which rests in
fact on the same basis with the common law, and
who mingle a considerable portion of equity in their
ideas of covenants. They differ with many of the
English authorities, in their exposition of the
maxim of
Caveat Emptor
, and consequently in their
estimate of the degree of diligence and
circumspection
necessary in the buyer, and the latitude
to be given to the seller in disguising, or making
use of his superior knowledge in the article of
which he is about to dispose.
Gentlemen of the jury, I am free to confess,
that though, in some respects, I agree with
preceding
authorities, in others I differ from them all, and
so differing I shall take leave to consult my own
ideas of justice in this case.
In the first place, there is a manifest distinction
between being silent as to defects in the article
which forms the subject of the covenant, and
fraudulently
concealing them. By merely being silent
on these defects, you practise no deception,
because
you leave the buyer the free use of his eyes,
and other senses, which are the guides and
guardians
of human nature in all the ordinary
transactions
of life. If the buyer should chance to be
ignorant of the nature and value of the article,
that is his own fault; the seller is not obliged to
19
instruct him to his own damage and loss. He had
in fact no business to purchase an article of the
qualities and value of which he was totally
ignorant
.
Ignorance is not involuntaryit is in the
nature of a blameable negligence not to acquire
knowledgeand as
Ignorantia legis neminem
excusat
,
so ignorance of the points that constitute the
value, or of the defects which diminish the value
of a horse, is no ground for vacating a covenant,
or recovering damages.
But, gentlemen of the jury, it is far otherwise
with those natural and involuntary defects which
render it impossible for a person to be a judge of
the article purchased. The plaintiff in this suit is
an elderly lady, who in the first place, lies under
no sort of obligation to become acquainted with
the value of horsesher ignorance is therefore no
bar in law to recovering in this suit. Had the
deception
been practised in the purchase and sale of
a carpet, a silk gown, or any article of that kind,
of which females are bound to be judges, it would
have been a different affair altogether. But not
only is the plaintiff not obliged by her sex to
become
a judge of horses, but if she were, it is in
proof, that she has become incapacitated by a
defect
in the organs of vision. Now, gentlemen,
physical defects are viewed in a very different
light by the common law, from defects of
knowledge
,
judgment and experience. To impose upon
an ignorant person, is held lawful; but to impose
upon one who is incapable from nature or infirmity,
of judging, is fraud. These distinctions are
founded
in the wisdom of ages and the perfection of
reason
.
I am, therefore, of opinion, that the
defendant
take back his horses, return the purchase
money
,
and pay the costs of the prosecution.
Thus was I obliged to receive back my horses,
in spite of
Caveat Emptor
, who seemed destined
in one way or other to be my utter ruin. I could
not help complaining to myself, that I had been
obliged to keep them on my hands after being
cheated in the purchase, solely because one judge
had no opinion of his own; and now was obliged
to receive them again, merely because another
judge chose to have an opinion of his own. If
the judges had only been exchanged, I might have
gained both suitsas it was, both were decided
against me. What a misfortune, thought I, that
though the common law is always the same,
the judges are so different, and that the
perfection
of reason should be expounded by persons
whose reason is so imperfect! Fearful that my
horses would play me some more tricks, I took the
first opportunity to give them awaytaking the
precaution to accompany the donation by a special
warranty, certifying one to be unsound, and the
other worth nothing.
Having got these incumbrances fairly off my
hands, I invested the remainder of my fortune in
trade, and plunged in the mysteries of buying and
selling, under the guidance and protection of
honest
Caveat Emptor, notwithstanding the many ill
turns I had received at his hands. I purchased
articles
at a low price and sold at a high one, always
taking care to avoid any express warranty; and
though I was from time to time sued by the ignorant
for thus making a legal use of my superior
knowledge
,
I always escaped with flying colours, under
the broad shield of
Caveat Emptor
, who I will
do him the justice to say, stood by me like a
brave fellow. Thus I sailed before the wind for
some time and laid up money. My avarice as
usual expanded with my acquisitions, and I
determined
to launch out into foreign trade. I
accordingly
purchased a large ship, which the owner
assured
me was one of the finest vessels that ever
sailed the salt seas, and put in her a valuable cargo,
for Europe. In order to cover all losses, I made
insurance for the full amount of vessel and cargo,
and despatched her on her voyage. This time, I
happened to be perfectly honest. I believed the
vessel to be an excellent one, in all respects, for
as such I had bought her, and the cargo was
precisely
as I had represented it to be. It was on my
part, I solemnly assure you, a fair transaction.
About a month from the sailing of my great ship,
news came that she had sprung a-leak, a few days
after getting to sea, and was run ashore, where she
went to pieces. However, this gave me no very
great uneasiness, as I calculated on being
completely
covered by the policy of insurance. To my
surprise
and mortification, payment was positively
refused
on the ground that I had practised fraud, or
at least deception. Even if this had been the fact,
I should have relied on my friend
Caveat Emptor
to bring me offbut I was entirely innocent,
and innocence, although of little weight in the
eye of the perfection of reason, is of some value
in keeping up a man's courage. I
commenced
a suit for the recovery of my money, in full
confidence of not only having the law, but justice
likewise on my side.
But, miserable is the man who depends upon his
innocence in a suit at common law; he might better
depend upon his guilt, for guilt is careful if
possible
to get the law on its side, while innocence relies
upon itself. The defence of the insurers was, that I
had practised a fraud in representing the vessel to be
what she was not. It was proved by the honest
gentleman, of whom I had bought her, that she was
not only not a first rate vessel, but quite the
contrary
.
That he had built her to sell, and that both in
materials and workmanship, she was defective in a
very great degree. The captains and mate, who
had escaped the wreck, also testified, that she was
rotten in many of her timbers, leaky, and in fact
19*
not seaworthy. They would not have trusted
themselves
in her, if they had known her condition.
Here I took the liberty to ask, how I, who was
totally ignorant of ships, could be supposed to know
of defects, which had escaped the eyes of
professional
men?
Caveat Emptor!
replied the court. I
acquiesced
,
without a murmur, for I relied less upon my
innocence on this occasion, than upon my friend
Caveat Emptor. 'Tis a bad rule that wont work
both ways, thought I, for I had not become
sufficiently
aware what a trimming turn-coat rascal this
Caveat Emptor was, and how he changed sides,
with as little ceremony as a first rate politician. I
desired my counsel to lose no opportunity of
touching
them up with Caveat Emptor, but he struck me
dumb by replying
My dear friend,
Caveat Emptor
won't do in this
case.
Then the Lord have mercy upon me, I
exclaimed
in despairif honest
Caveat
goes over to the
enemy I am a dead man.
I pass over the arguments of the counsel, who
marshalled armies of judges and volumes of
decisions
,
one against the other, and made such a variety
of beautiful distinctions, that not a single man in
court, gifted with common sense, could tell black
from white, or make out what the law was for the
soul of him. But the charge of the judge deserves
to be remembered as a warning to posterity.
Gentlemen of the jury, said he, the principle
involved in the case before you, has been settled
by so many solemn decisions in the English courts,
that no argument, or decision of mine can fix it
more irrevocably. It is only necessary, therefore,
to state one or two nice distinctions, and to
recapitulate
the arguments on which it is to be presumed
these decisions were founded.
The plaintiff hinted in the course of the trial,
that he expected to avail himself of the maxim
Caveat Emptor
, but it is hardly necessary to tell you
that it does not apply in this case. Gentlemen, the
common law being the perfection of reason,
accommodates
itself in the happiest manner to the
accidents
of situation and circumstance. It is
immutable
,
and unalterableyet it is different and
variable
.
It is founded in the wisdom of agesand it
contradicts itself without the least inconsistency. I
will acknowledge, gentlemen, that had this been an
affair of the land, instead of the water, the maxim
Caveat Emptor would go to exonerate the plaintiff
from all suspicion of fraud, but happening as it did
on the water, the case is diametrically opposite.
And the distinction most strikingly exemplifies the
wisdom of the common law. Gentlemen of the
jury, there is one species of animals for the earth,
and another for the seathere is one kind of
vehicle
for ploughing the fields, and another for
ploughing
the oceanand there is also one law for the
land, and another for the water. As well might
you attempt to go to sea in a plough, or turn up the
earth with the keel of a ship of the lineas well
might you travel by land on the back of a whale,
or cross the seas mounted on an elephantas to
apply the same maxims of law to the ocean and the
land. The elephant would drown in the fathomless
deep, and if I might be allowed the personification,
Caveat Emptor
cannot breathe in the atmosphere
of salt-water; his lungs are too weak for it.
Hence, gentlemen of the jury, it follows from
strict deduction of analogy, that there must of
necessity
be a law for the land and a law for the sea,
or the law could not possibly be the perfection of
reason. Hence too, it is law, that when a man
buys a ship ready built, the parties being on Terra
Firma, he does it at his peril, and must look out for
Caveat Emptor
. But if, on the contrary, he
purchases
a vessel, the parties being on the water, I
should say that Caveat Emptor would not apply.
However this may be, I have no hesitation in
saying
,
that though the buyer of a ship is bound to
beware
,
the person who insures her is entirely
exonerated
from that obligation. In the one case if the
buyer purchases a bad vessel it is at his own risk;
in the other, if the insurer takes a risk upon her, it
is not necessary in the eye of the perfection of
reason
,
that he too should beware. Again, gentlemen
of the jury, a man on land has a perfect right by
the common law, to make use of his superior
knowledge
of certain articles of merchandise in disposing
of them to another who has not an equal
knowledge
;
but he has no right to the benefits either of
superior knowledge or superior ignorance, in
dealing
with an insurance company, which, though not
exactly a sea animal, is a sort of amphibious
monster
,
entitled to the privileges of both elements.
Gentlemen of the jury, the counsel for the
plaintiff in this suit has relied upon a decision, in a
cause where he himself was obliged to take up with
a broken-winded horse he had purchased, by virtue
of the maxim Caveat Emptor. But this case
resembles
the present in no one ground of principle.
Between the defects of a horse and those of a ship
there can be no possible analogy. Whoever heard
of a ship being broken-winded or blind of an eye, or
indeed having any eyes but dead eyes, which in the
eye of the common law are no eyes at all? If the
animal had been a
Sea horse
, I am not quite clean
that there might not be some ground of analogy on
which to found an application of the same principle
equally to both cases. As it is, gentlemen, you must
find for the defendants, in spite of Caveat Emptor.
I had now but one resource against absolute
poverty, to which nothing can reconcile a reasonable
man, but the reflection that it puts him in some
measure beyond the reach of the laws. Without
money he cannot sue; and without it there is no
cause for his being sued. He may therefore snap
his fingers at the perfection of reason and defy Satan
and all his works, among the worst of which I
reckon the subtilties of the law. I made one effort
more; I brought an action against the person who
sold me the ship, which it had just been decided to
be a fraud for me to get insured. I had only to
produce the record of that trial to prove that I had
been deceived in the purchase. But the case was
now alteredthere was one law for the land, and
another for the sea; and my old friend Caveat
Emptor
once more changed sides to my utter confusion.
There being no actual warranty, the court
instructed
the jury, that according to the maxim
Caveat
Emptor, it was my own fault if I bought a bad
vessel, although the price I paid might furnish
presumptive
evidence I thought her a good one. The
plaintiff has relied on the decision of this court,
in a case where it was decided partly upon the
evidence of the seller of this very vessel, that she
was not sea-worthy, to prove that the defendant
knew she was so at the time he sold her to the
plaintiff. Now there is no proof that he did
actually
know the situation of the vessel at the precise
moment of making the bargain. He might have
become acquainted with these defects afterwards,
for aught we know. But at all events, if he did
know, he was not bound to disclose them. The
defendant in this cause, is a seaman by profession,
and once commanded this very ship. Now,
gentlemen
,
it is a maxim in law,
accusare nemo se debet,
&c.
and it is a common saying, which amounts to a
precept of common law, that every sailor is a
piece of his ship; of course he cannot be bound in
law or justice to disclose her defects. I am free to
acknowledge that this is a hard case, but that is
neither your fault nor mine. The law must have
its course, let what will become of morality and
justice; for it is a maxim in law, that injustice to
individuals is the good of the whole. There is no
other foundation, under the common law, for
individual
right, but individual wrong; and as one
man's meat is another man's poison, so the decision
of a law-suit, in opposition to reason and conscience,
only the more firmly establishes the perfection of
reason. It is with law as with religion. Each has
its martyrs, whose sacrifice is the strongest possible
proof of the divinity of its origin. Gentlemen of
the jury, you will find for the defendant on the
ground that
Caveat Emptor
.
Thus was I, like many of my fellow men, ruined
by the very friend upon whom I placed the greatest
reliance. Caveat Emptor, whether as friend or foe,
seemed destined to be my bane in conjunction with
the perfection of reason. I had now nothing left
in the world, but a thirty-sixth part, as tenant in
common, of a piece of land about thirty feet square,
in one of the out wards of my native city; together
with a claim of very considerable amount, on a
merchant
in a neighbouring seaport town. This last I
determined to put in suit in good time. But first
I took special care to find out how honest Caveat
Emptor stood affected towards me, in this
particular
instance. To my great content, I discovered
that my case did not turn upon that pivot at all.
I then proceeded to apply all my dear bought
knowledge
to the caseconsulted the lawsransacked
the decisions of every court for precedentsapplied
principles, and in short, had, as I thought, made
myself thoroughly master of the whole subject.
After this, to make all sure, I wrote out a fair
statement
of my case, and sent it with a fee to two of the
first counsel of the place where my antagonist
resided
.
They assured me my claim was perfectly
good. Upon this I sent him a defiance, at least my
counsel did, of twenty folio pages. He accepted
the challenge and I was to meet him on his own
ground in the course of a few months, to decide the
matter then and there, according to law.
I was on the spot in time, as confident of victory
as ever was knight errant, gifted with an enchanted
sword, and invulnerable armour. The trial opened,
and after some little preliminary forms, the lawyer
on the opposite side got up and began to talk about
something that Lord Ellenborough, and a late
deceased
chief justice of Pennsylvania had thought
and decided in a certain case of Twaddle
vs
.
Tweedle. What the plague have I to do with
Twaddle
vs
. Tweedle, thought I, in no little
perplexity
at finding that my cause was in danger of
being decided by the ghosts of Lord Ellenborough
and the chief justice of Pennsylvania, instead of the
chief justice then sitting on the bench before me.
My astonishment was increased tenfold, on
hearing
my counsel instead of saying any thing about
me or my cause, begin to talk about a certain
law-suit
between one Dick Harvey and a Mr. Moody.
Upon this, the other side got up, and talked about
the great decision between Fairbanks
vs
. Fairchild,
which it seems, was too strong for Dick Harvey
and Mr. Moody. Down he popt, and up jumped
we with the still greater and later decision of my
Lord Somebody, in the case of Cannon
vs
. Swivel.
The opposite lawyer was not in the least daunted,
but produced another and later decision of the same
judge, which as he maintained nullified the other.
Whose cause are you trying? whispered I to my
counsel. I thought mine was to come on to-day.
Before he could answer me, the judge rose and said
something about
Locus in quo
, whereupon my
counsel
turned round to me very coolly and said
You've lost your cause. It was too true, though
heaven is my witness that to this day I could never
tell why or wherefore. All I know is that
Locus in
20
quo
treated me quite as bad if not worse than Caveat
Emptor, and that between them both, I had now
nothing left but the thirty-sixth part of thirty feet
square of land in my native city. But fate had
determined that I should become a perfect martyr
to the perfection of reason.
It seems an industrious young lawyer, having just
then no business in hand, purchased out one of the
joint tenants, and being very anxious to get
exclusive
possession of his foot of land that he might
improve it, applied for a partition. I had, I
confess
,
received notice of this, but considered it a
trifle not worth attending to at the time. But I
found to my cost that there are no such things as
trifles in the common law. On my return from the
signal overthrow I had received at the hands of
Locus in quo
, I was saluted with a bill of costs of
partition, amounting to considerably more than my
share of the land was worth. I was glad to make it
over to the professor of the perfection of reason,
for his trouble and expense in procuring the
partition
,
and he generously relinquished all further
claim upon me. Thus we settled the partition by
my being partitioned out of the last shilling of
property
that
Caveat Emptor
and
Locus in quo
had
left me.
Gentlemen, I hope you will not think me
unreasonable
if, by this time, I began to lose my respect for the
perfection of reason. If my worthy uncle had risen
from the grave, I don't think he could have restored
it to my good graces. Like a mistress, so full of
caprices, contradictions and coquetries, that she
at last tires out and disgusts the most ardent
admirer
,
the perfection of reason had played me so
many tricks, that I turned my back on it in utter
disgust. It appeared to me that whatever the law
might have been in ages of comparative ignorance
and simplicity, it had now become so refined in its
distinctionsso subtle in its metaphysicsso
complicated
and contradictory in its decisionsso
wearisome
and capricious in its sinuosities, as to be
compared to nothing but an Indian trail through
some pathless wilderness, invisible to all eyes,
untraceable
by all feet, save those only which are
guided by an infallible instinct, the joint offspring of
nature and necessity. So far from being the
perfection
of reason, it seemed to me nothing more than
the perfection of quibbling sophistry. Instead of a
plain straight forward rule of action, simple in
itself and easy of comprehension to those who are
to be governed by its provisions, it appeared to my
awakened senses little else than a farrago of
contradictory
decisions, pursued through all the mazes
of inextricable subtilty into the obscurity of
fathomless
darknessa jumblea chaos without a sun to
enlighten, or a hand powerful enough to reduce it to
order and beauty. In short, under the influence of
my perpetual disappointments at the hands of the
perfection of reason, I actually rejoiced that I had
now nothing left in the world, and was consequently
above the laws. If any thing can reconcile a
reasonable
man to the ills of poverty, it is the consoling
reflection, that he has passed into that bourne where
the lawyers cease from troubling, and the client is
at rest.
The remainder of my story is soon told. I was a
ruined man, and that too, at the hands of the
perfection
of reason. Being without the good things
of this world, there was nothing left me, but to turn
philosopher, and despise them. Indeed, I have
always observed, that in proportion as a man gets
money he contemns wisdom, just as he who
becomes
poor despises wealth and takes to wisdom.
Money is certainly the root of all evil, as every man
is convinced the moment he sees it in the hands
of others. There are three things which constitute
as it were the three sheet anchors that keep a
man riding steady in the same roadstead all his life
property, friends, and a home. My fortune had
gone off with honest
Caveat Emptor
and
Locus in
quo
my friends followed closely afterand as to
homeI was a bachelor, and a bachelor has no
home.
In casting about for employment during the
remainder
of my days, I at length determined to
travel over all parts of the world, and return laden
with improvements from all countries for the good
of my own. I will visit, thought I, the distant and
polite regions of the earth, and like the bee return
laden with honey. I will bring home with me the
newest fashions in dress, and the latest opinions in
moralsthe most exquisite refinements in taste,
and the most fashionable models in literaturethe
rarest plants, and the most odoriferous flowers. I
will introduce the thistle from Canadathe black
rose and the black swanmummies from Egypt
dust from the pyramids, and cobwebs from the
catacombslittle wooden shoes and white lions
from Chinapaper systems and joint stock
companies
from the British islesPerigord pies from
France, and music from Italy. My return will be
hailed as a new era, and I shall be remembered as
the benefactor of my country by a hundred
succeeding
generations. But from this I was deterred by
the reflection, that with the exception of the source
of the Niger, and the northwest passage, there was
nothing new to be discovered under the sun. The
world had been in fact ravaged, not by an irruption
of Goths or Vandals, but by armies of peaceful
warriors
,
who instead of destroying with fire and sword,
deluged whole countries with bloody ink, and put
men, women and children to the point of the pen
without mercy, insomuch that a nation stood no
more chance of a tolerably decent character among
them, than a man who keeps a company waiting
dinner two hours for him. There was, in truth, not
a hole or corner, either above or under ground, a
pyramid, a cataract, catacomb, subterranean
temple
,
20*
or inexplicable oddity that had not been
ransacked
and described half a dozen times over.
Like Alexander, I wept for a new world, and
remained
in sorrowing perplexity, when, one lucky
day, at least a dozen of them made their
appearance
in the nick of time, each ready to be served
up in Paternoster Row, to the literary epicures,
like boiled eggs at a breakfast. I allude to the
promulgation of the sublime theory of the
CONCENTRIC
SPHERES, which hath sufficiently
demonstrated
that this globe of ours, instead of being as it
were all outside crust, is like the famous pie, which,
when opened, discovered four-and-twenty
black-birds
all gayly singing a beautiful Italian air. Thus,
in a similar manner, the centre of this mundane
terrene, when it comes to be explored by
adventurous
travellers, instead of being tenanted by worms,
ground hogs, embryo locusts, field mice, pismires,
and other inglorious subterraneans, will be found,
beyond doubt, to be peopled by an enlightened race
of illustrious Troglodites, who from the very nature
of their locality must of necessity see deeper into
a subject than other people. At once my mind
was made up. I determined to seek these pure and
unsophisticated mortals who, being thus retired from
the great outside world, must of necessity be free
from those vices, follies, and crimes which have
entailed upon us the disagreeable necessity of being
governed by THE PERFECTION OF REASON.
STORY
OF THE
THIRD WISE MAN OF GOTHAM.
THE PERFECTION OF SCIENCE.
My
brother Harmony, began the Third Wise
Man of Gotham, has, it seems, been shipwrecked
in pursuit of the Perfectibility of Man; and my
brother Quominus has fallen a victim to the
Perfection
of Reason, or the Wisdom of Ages, I can
hardly tell whichI, on the contrary, am the
martyr
of Science.
I was born and educated in the most scientific,
literary, and philosophical city of the worldfor
the women were all Blues and the men
Metaphysicians
.
In truth, I may say, with perfect veracity,
there were so many people running after science,
that there were not sciences enough for them to run
after. The business was overdone; the game was
exhausted, as in countries too thickly settled and too
much cultivated; and nothing was left for them but
the invention of new sciences, to give them
employment
.
Besides, such had been the unwearied
industry
,
the deep sagacity, with which they had pursued
the old sciences, that they had driven them from
their most secret recesses; detected all their
arcana
;
exposed their occult mysteries; and, in fact,
pulled them by the ears, as it were, out of every
hole and corner where they had entrenched
themselves
for ages. Strangers, who were allured to
the city by the fame of its learning, observed with
astonishment, that the women could call every
thing by its scientific name, and that even the very
children talked nearly as wisely as the best of
them. Learning, science, and philosophy, were
becoming vulgar, insomuch that several people
of the highest rank and fashion, began to study
ignorance, and actually sent their children to school
to unlearn every thing. It was high time,
therefore
,
for the lovers of science to begin to look about
them; for the writers and lecturers upon the old
Grey Beard mathematics, philosophy, botany, and
chemistry, instead of an audience of pretty
fashionables
,
with nodding plumes, were content to
confine
their instructions to classes of rusty students,
who actually came for no other purpose than to
learn. The fashionable young ladies began to yawn
at conversations, where they met to relax
themselves
with political economy and metaphysics;
and a universal alarm prevailed, when a great
heiress
,
who was considered the bulwark of the blues,
backslided, and married a regular dandy, with a thin
waist and no learning.
It was high time to get up something new for
these people, and as the natives of our isle are more
apt to improve upon the inventions of others than
to invent any thing themselves, I was selected by
a coterie of philosophers, and sent out into the
world to discover a new plaything for these grown
up children of knowledge. I travelled, and
travelled
,
and travelled, as the story books say, over
divers
countries that have neither latitude nor
longitude
;
I visited all the colleges, scientific
institutions
,
and bedlams; sought out the most learned and
adventurous philosophers of christendom; consulted
the Pundits of India; the Chingfoos of China, the
Dervises of Turkey, and the Jugglers of the
Flathead
Indians of the Missouri. In short, I ransacked
the uttermost ends of the earth, and was returning
disconsolate, through Germany, to my native city,
with a firm conviction that there was nothing new
under the sun, when an unexpected adventure befel
me on the eve of a long day's journey.
Owing to various untoward accidents, one of
which was the lameness of my horse, I had been
overtaken by twilight in the midst of the forest of
Teutoburgium, not far, as it afterwards proved, from
the spot where Varus and his legions had been cut
off by the German hero Arminius. As the night
gathered thick around me, obscured into Cimmerian
darkness by the overarching shades, I became more
and more confused and uncertain of my way. I
heard the growling of bears, the howling of wolves,
the hooting of owls, and the shrill whistle of the
bandit
,
mingling with the sighing and moaning of winds
as they wandered in the impenetrable shades. At
length my progress was arrested by a cold and
heavy hand, forcibly applied to my mouth, with
such excellent aim, considering it was so dark,
that it stopt it entirely and prevented me from
calling for help, had I bethought myself of doing
it. So forcible was the blow, that it knocked me
from my horse, and I lay on the ground for a few
moments insensible to every thing around me. As I
gradually recoveredthe pain of my fallthe
loneliness
of my situationand the apprehension that
the bandit would return with his companions, and
finish, perhaps, what he had begun, overcame me
entirely, and I groaned at intervals aloud. Nothing
for a time answered me, but the dismal echoes of
the forest, and once or twice the neighings of what
I supposed my own horse, who had wandered to a
distance. At length, however, my cries were
answered
by a voice which seemed close to my ear.
Who and what art thou, that thus wanderest
alone, at midnight, on the spot where the bones of
tens of thousands have been bleaching for ages?
cried a hollow and tremulous voice.
I am a pilgrim, exclaimed I, from a far
distant
country, travelling the earth in search of a new
science.
Thou hast hit the nail on the head, replied the
invisible voice. Follow megive me thy hand
21
thou art a lucky man, and hast been born,
without
doubt, with a silver spoon in thy mouth.
But my horse, quoth I.
He is safe, replied the voice, taking me by the
hand. As I lifted it to my lips in token of
thankfulness
,
I started back with horror.
It smells of mortality! cried I.
TrueIt hath handled nothing but the bones of
Varus and his legions, for more than thirty years.
Art thou a sexton?
No.
A grave digger?
Follow me, and thou shalt know.
I again gave him my hand with trembling
reluctance
,
and we struck to the right in a direction
towards a dim light, which had till now escaped
my notice. After proceeding some distance, we
approached the entrance of a cave, which
descended
gently into the bosom of the earth, through a
passage dimly lighted by a lamp, leading into an
apartment that struck me with inexpressible
dismay
.
It was a charnel-house of skulls, which I
took for granted appertained to thousands of
murdered
wretches, made away with by a band of
robbers
,
of which this wily old wretch was the
stool-pigeon
,
or chief, I hardly knew which. His whole
appearance
was a composition of supernaturalhorrors.
There did not seem a drop of blood in his body, or
an ounce of flesh on his bones. His eye, deep sunk
in his head, glimmered dimmer than the half
expiring
lamp which obscured rather than illuminated
the passage by which we had descended; and his
cheeks, for want of the support of teeth, had sunk
in on either side, and met together lovingly in the
roof of his mouth. His head was without a single
hair, and the glossy surface of the skull, divided by
lines into different copartments, like the divisions of
a map. Each of these was numbered after the
manner of sheet maps, for teaching children
geography
.
Gracious heaven! exclaimed I,
mentally
,
he is not only a robber but a necromancer!
perhaps the wild huntsman! perhaps one of the
infernal
quizzical imps of Number Nip! perhaps the
wood demon himself. This forest has long been
famous for evil doings, and these lines and figures
are doubtless the spell by which this diabolical
caitiff
works his infernal ends. I cast my eyes from
the necromancer to the paraphernalia by which he
was surrounded. Nothing was seen but skulls piled
up in various recesses, or lying about in horrible
confusion, so that at every step, they rolled beneath
my feet, and grinned in my face, as if in scorn of
these impotent injuries. The rest of the
embellishments
of this Golgotha, have escaped my
recollection
,
for as I continued to stare around, my
courage
deserted me, my senses wandered, and I
trembled
from head to foot.
Thou art cold and doubtless hungry too, said
the old mystery of horrorI was inhospitable not
to offer thee something to eat.
He then arose and went to an obscure part of the
cave. He is gone to prepare for me the feast of
the worms, thought I, or perhaps he will presently
invite me, like the ghost in Don Juan, to an
entertainment
of shin-bones and petty-toes. Would I were
home again, and perish all new sciences. Presently,
however, he returned, and to my very agreeable
surprise
,
presented a piece of cold venison, some bread
and a flaggon of beer. Eat, drink and be merry,
quoth hefor to-morrow I die! responded I,
inwardly
,
with a sigh. However, hunger is lord of
the world, and will swallow up fear, when he is
sharp set. I fell upon the venison, and ate as if it
were my last; I swallowed oceans of beer, in hopes
it would infuse into me a portion of Dutch courage,
but in vain. While I was taking my meal, the
necromancer
or whatever he might be, was examining
a large skull, divided and marked in like manner
with his own, and apparently comparing it with
mine, while he ever and anon exclaimed
Bless me!astonishing!wonderful!one
would think they had belonged to one and the
same person!Pray, my good friend, if you can stop
eating for one moment, tell me, had you ever any
other head on your shoulders than the one you
carry now?
Not that I know of, replied I.
Astonishingcuriousremarkablenever saw
such an identitywitlocalityamativeness
philoprogenitiveness
idealitywonder
acquisitiveness
cautiousness
tunesizeweightcolouringlanguage
tunesizeweightcolouringlanguage
comparisoncausalitylove of approbation
order
combativeness,
and what not! I would give
thousands for your skull. Why, sir, you must be a
universal genius. You have the finest collection of
organs in the world. You are a poet, a mechanic,
a chymist, a philosopher, a musician, a lover of
children
,
an artist, a metaphysician, and any thing
else you please, besides.
I began now to be ashamed of myself, that I
should have dignified this old fellow with the rank
of a bandit and necromancer, when as it now
plainly
appeared, he was only a harmless madman. At
once my terrors subsided, and I became quite
jocular
.
Pray, said I, how came you to know my
character
and talents so perfectly in this short
acquaintance
?I
don't think I have spoken five words on
any subject connected with these acquirements and
qualifications. Have you the faculty of penetrating
the interior of the brain, or exploring the secrets of
the heart, extemporaneously?
The secrets of the heart! replied the old man
contemptuouslyyou talk like a blockhead in
defiance
21*
of the infallible augury of your cerebral
development
.
The heart, young man, hath nothing
to do with sensations, affections, impulses, passions,
affinities or antipathies. You might as well locate
them in the liver, the gizzard, the great toe, the seat
of honour, or any other obscure and contemptible
part of the human machine
Did he actually call it a machine? interrupted
the Man Machine, eagerly.
He did, upon my honourhe called it a
machine
,
said the other, and proceeded.
Know, young man, continued the hermit,
that I perceive by the infallible augury of the only
real science upon the face of the earth, thou art
destined to be a burning and shining light among
the benighted of this earth. Thou shalt carry the
lamp even to the uttermost ends of the earth, and
into the concentric spheres. Listen and learn.
The whole frame of the old man now dilated into
actual sublimityhis voice gradually swelled in
tones of lofty declamation, and his eye brightened
with what I then supposed was inspiration. But I
have since ascertained that the eye has nothing to
do with the mind, any more than a pair of
spectacles
.
It is only made to see with.
I was born and brought up, continued he,
within the walls of a college, the name of which
I shall withhold, least it might become too vain of
the honour; and my ancestors had been professors
of the same faculty for fifteen generations. Not
one of them, so far as my knowledge and belief
extends
,
ever was out of sight of the venerable Alma
Mater. They studied science in books, and to
books they resorted for that knowledge of mankind
and of the world, which, being the same in all ages,
can only be acquired in the unchangeable lessons of
time and experience recorded in books. My father
was considered a monster of erudition, who, after
having exhausted all the old sciences, imagined new,
which he exhausted with equal facility. He went
on in this way so long that at last he was sorely
puzzled
for new sciences to conquer. He came very
near dying of ennui, for want of a new difficulty to
knock on the head, and in the absence of some
excitement
of this kind, used to amuse himself whole
days with a parrot and a monkey; one of which he
had taught to talk quite learnedly upon scientific
subjects; and the other to go through a variety of
philosophical experiments.
He soon, however, got tired of this, and then
found a temporary amusement in studying natural
history in the persons of a great variety of dogs,
that used to congregate for amusement and fighting
in the large court-yard in front of his residence in
the college. Here, for the first time, he noticed
that peculiarity of the canine race which exhibits
itself in two strange dogs when they come together.
He observed that instead of looking into each other's
faces for information, as to the character, objects
and intentions of their new acquaintance, they
invariably
went round to the rear for that purpose.
At first he was inclined to believe that they carried
their names on the stern, as he had observed was
the case with the boats on the river which ran near
the city; but on examination he could discover
nothing
of that kind. It naturally occurred to him,
to ask himself the reason, or rather the instinct, of
this singular practice. After deep reflection it
struck him that it could be no other than a mode
pointed out by nature for gaining a thorough
insight
into the character, views and qualifications of
those animals, thus superseding the necessity of
long acquaintance and continued scrutiny. He saw
too, that these animals signified their satisfaction,
and indeed expressed most of their sensations, by
wagging their tails, and became thereupon
convinced
that with them at least the eyes and the face
were not the index of the mind. He observed that
a stiff tail denoted hostility, while a wagging tail on
the contrary expressed sometimes pleasure,
sometimes
eagerness of anticipation, sometimes
confidence
,
sometimes doubt, sometimes affection; and
that whenever it hid itself between the hinder legs,
it was the invariable indication of fear. In short, he
had no doubt that a complete system of the
operations
of canine instinct might be deduced from the
developments of the organs of the tail; and he
was only deterred from announcing it to the
literary
world by the apprehension of being laughed at
by ignorant persons.
A hint is, however, sufficient for the wise.
Newton
caught his idea of gravitation from seeing an
apple fall to the ground; Hutton his theory of the
formation of the earth by the operation of an
internal
fire, from a confectioner making
sugarplums
;
another philosopher from accidentally
seeing
a nest of iron pots one within the other, with
pismires crawling between them, conceived his
theory of the concentric spheres; and my father
erected the most stupendous science of modern
times upon the wagging of a mastiff's tail.
Reasoning
upwards by the stair-case of analogy, he
gradually
arrived from the mastiff's tail to a man's head,
which he found closely resembling each other in a
vast variety of particulars. Both were covered
with hair; both were at the extremity of the
animal
;
one nodded, the other wagged. There were
other points of resemblance of which expert
theorists
make a great use, called analogies of
opposition
,
in which the likeness or affinity consists in one
thing being the direct antipodes of another.
Altogether
,
my father, from long and intense observation
and contemplation, came at last to the conclusion
that the tail of the dog, and the head of the man, was
certainly the true index of the mind and
propensities
of each respectively.
I perceive you smile, as if this idea of a man's
head being the seat of sensation and the index of
mind was no very great discovery. In the course
of my details you will see that this was only the
mere threshold, the first step in those speculations
that are destined ere long not only to astonish but
confound the world. The discovery that the head
was the seat of sensation was in fact no discovery
at all. But the improvements he made, and the
ends to which he applied it, are what constitute his
glory. Columbus it is true discovered that there
was actually such a place as the new world; but
this did not deprive those who subsequently
explored
,
settled, planted, and divided it into separate
states, districts, counties and towns, of their portion
of credit. In like manner, others had, it may be
justly said, discovered a man had a head; but it was
reserved for my father to turn that head to some
account, by dividing it into different sections and
compartments; detailing its peculiarities of soil
and climate; describing its various properties and
productions; the temperature of the air; the
animals
that inhabit it; and in fact, giving as it were a
complete statistical account of the whole region.
Here, perceiving me yawn a little, the old man
took the hint. He proposed retiring for the night,
and resuming his details in the morning.
Accordingly
he showed me into a small recess where was
a bed of moss, in which I laid myself down, and
dreamed all night of the catacombs of Egypt.
The next morning the good hermit would hardly
allow me time to eat my breakfast, so impatient was
he to continue his story.
My father, began he, next proceeded to lay
down his first principles, which he justly considered
were more than half the battle. He knew he could
look out afterwards at leisure for facts and
examples
to sustain them. A true philosopher always
makes his facts and reasonings dependent on his
theory
,
and not his theory on his facts and reasonings.
When his theory is well digested and arranged, a
man of the least ingenuity will find all nature
administering
to his use. Appearances and
phenomena
which he never dreamed of before will come,
like
Sancho's
proverbs, pat to his purpose; and
what in the eyes of indifferent persons will seem
fatal to his hypothesis, to him will afford
unanswerable
confirmation. Young man, if thou ever
meanest
to become a philosopher, follow the example of
my father, for be assured if thou waitest for
experience
to authenticate thy theories, thou wilt die
without ever becoming the father of a single new
one. Aware of this truth, my father, as I said
before
,
proceeded first to lay down the principles of
his new science, intending afterwards to trust to
Providence, his own ingenuity, and the liberal spirit
of the age, to establish them by facts and
demonstration
.
He first laid it down as a maxim, that the head
of a man was, as it were, a great organ full of pipes,
on which the different qualities, propensities and
passions each played their favourite tunes, and on
that particular pipe the tone of which best pleased
the said quality, propensity or passion.
That as the pipes of the mechanical organ,
being made of materials incapable of expansion,
cannot be dilated or contracted; so the pipes of
the man-organ, being composed in like manner of
materials directly the contrary in their nature and
capacity, it follows by analogy of dissimilitude that
the animate and inanimate organ are one and the
same, for all the purposes of science and philosophy.
That the form of the brain, and the functions
of the several organs or pipes thereof may be
ascertained
by irrefragable indications, especially by
comparing their size, with the power of manifesting
the mental faculties. The more a particular organ
or pipe of the organ was used the larger it would
undoubtedly become; for as friction uniformly
diminishes
inanimate machinery, so in like manner
does it not diminish but strengthen, develop and
expand the animated machinery, to wit, the pipes,
organs and cavities of the brain.
To prove this position, he instanced the
rope-dancer's
legs; the fiddler's right elbow; and
above all the female tongue, each of which, he
maintained, was uncommonly large and fully
developed
in consequence of continued and violent
exercise. The eyes of children, he observed,
were always larger in proportion than those of
grown up people, simply because as every object
was new to the former, they naturally stared and
wondered at every thing. Again: the nostrils of a
snuff-taker were always more dilated than those of
ordinary persons; and people given to listening at
key-holes always had great ears. All these
positions
he intended to establish as occasion might
offer; and if it proved upon experience that the
facts were not according to his theory, all they had
to do was to accommodate themselves to it as fast
as possible; for it was not to be expected that a
philosopher should abandon an hypothesis, merely
because it was contrary to facts and experience.
My father was resolved that his science should
be quite original. Lavater had already taken
formal
scientific possession of the face, and as it were,
converted all the seaboard of the country to his
use. My father was for that reason resolved to
have little or nothing to do with the old settlements,
but to travel into the interior and cultivate the
back lands. Accordingly he marched round and
settled himself upon the remote, uncultivated
regions
of the cerebellum. Besides the canine
example
which had given the first idea, and the
determination
to occupy entirely new ground, he had
another argument in favour of this novelty on which
he strongly relied. He compared the head to
22
those houses in the city of Edinburgh, which being
built on a side-hill, exhibit a bold front a dozen
stories high, but which when approached in the
rear dwindle into complete insignificance. Thus
there was no such thing as telling what they were
until you examined them from behind; and thus too
by analogy, all conclusions drawn from the face of
a human being were vague and uncertain in the
highest degree. It was, moreover, proverbial for
people to put their best face as well as their best
foot foremost.
Having thus developed the theory of his new
science, he was just setting about propping it up by
facts and examples, when he fell ill, and died. It
rarely happens indeed that the same person invents,
and perfects his invention. Life is too short for
any but a chosen few, to acquire the glory of
beginning
and completing a new science. It was
reserved
for me to rear up and bring to perfection
the magnificent edifice of which my father had laid
the foundation.
At the time of my father's decease, I was a
young man of about forty, and had scarcely ever
been beyond the walls of our college. I once
indeed
ventured out into the world to see a fair in the
neighbourhood, but happening to meet a person
whose organ of destructiveness I perceived was
horribly developed, I was afraid he would kill me,
and ran home as fast as I could. As a proof of the
infallibility of my science, it was afterwards
rumoured
that this very man, or somebody very like him,
was found guilty of manslaughter at a village about
two hundred miles distant. My whole life had
been passed between four thick stone walls, in a
chamber, the light of which was admitted through
the ceiling, where I saw nobody but my parents,
and an old female servant whose organ of languages
bespoke her prowess, for she could out-talk the
whole family. Indeed our prevailing character
was that of shyness, awkwardness, and silence.
We seldom or ever mixed with the world, and
my principle recreation had been to philosophise,
smoke my pipe, and drink small beer. Ever since
my father propounded his theory of the organs to
my alarmed and awakened imagination, I believe I
may say, that I never looked a human being in the
face. Indeed it was the custom of the whole
family to walk leisurely round and examine the
back of the head to ascertain each other's wants,
feelings and sensations. I can proudly say that my
father was never but once mistaken in this
infallible
augury, and then he fell into such a passion with
the organs that they ever afterwards took good care
to accommodate themselves to his theory.
From the period that I became an orphan, I
determined to devote my remaining days to the
establishment
of his favourite science, by actual
experiment
and observation. I considered it as a
sister orphan in a state of helpless infancy left to my
bringing up, and for whose future fate I was in a
great measure responsible. Accordingly I
declined
the hereditary professorship which had been
in our family three centuries, and in order that I
might study the human character without
interruption
,
retired to this forest, and secluded myself
from mankind. I was induced to select this spot
in preference to all others, because it afforded me
the most ample scope and materials for laying the
everlasting basis of what may be emphatically
called
the science of human nature, taught, not by the
quick, but the dead; derived not from the lying
tongues and deceitful eyes of living men, but from
the tomb, whence the hollow socket and the
tongueless
,
fleshless lips, proclaim in accents of eternal
truth, the secrets of the hitherto unvisited brain.
Let no one say that when the brain is out, the man
will die, for it is then only that he may be
figuratively
said to live, to speak, and to disclose through
the medium of the sublime organs of the
cerebellum
the secrets of his heart and head, the mystery of
what he was when living. Here, said he, with
lofty enthusiasm, exhibiting a skull divided and
numbered as I have describedhere is the world
I study, and here the history of the human race
written in characters of eternal truth with the
pencil
of immortality. I do not want to read Tacitus
to know what the owner of this was when living
I know he was rash, self-willed and brave, and that
in the very nature of things, he must have been
governed by the organ of combativeness. Look at
itit is the skull of
Quintilius Varus
, who was
cut off with his three legions on this very spot by
our illustrious Herman, whom the historian calls
Arminius, to make his name sound like that of a
Roman.
How do you know it is the skull of Quintilius
Varus, asked I.
By Phrenology
.
What is that? asked I again.
The infallible science invented by my father.
It is called phrenology, from phrenzy or phrenetic;
my illustrious father having been considered mad
during the latter part of his life, like almost all
other daring geniuses who have had the courage to
instruct mankind. They swallow knowledge with
as much difficulty and as many wry faces as they
do physic, and reward their benefactors for
enlightening
them, by calling them mad. But to go on
with my story.
I have mentioned that this cave is in the centre
of the encampment where Varus and his legions
were slain by the Germans, and their skulls piled up
in heaps as recorded by Tacitus. It was for this
reason I selected it for the field of my
achievements
in demonstrating the truths of phrenology.
Here I could find innumerable examples to suit my
22*
theoryhere I could make what use I pleased of
those reliques which elsewhere the ignorant hold
sacred; and here, above all, I could remain free
from the intrusion of vulgar curiosity, for not a
peasant in forty miles will approach this spot except
unwittingly. You will wonder perhaps that those
skulls should have remained so perfect as you now
see them for such a length of time. But when I
tell you that with the exception of the Egyptians,
the Romans had the thickest and most solid skulls
of any ancient people, you will not be incredulous.
You recollect Herodotus bears testimony to the
thickness of the Egyptian skulls, a fact sufficient in
itself to explode the vulgar opinion that a thick
skull is synonymous with stupidity.
Here I proceeded to establish my science upon
the eternal basis of demonstration. In the first
place I looked into Tacitus, and found that Varus
had imprudently advanced far into the pathless
forests of Germanythat he had encamped on
unfavourable
ground; had finally been surprised by
Arminius, and himself and all his legions slain. It
followed pretty clearly from these premises, that
Varus was a daring, uncalculating sort of a person,
who beyond all doubt had the organ of
combativeness
strongly developed, and that of secretiveness
exceedingly small. Accordingly, I selected from
the skulls scattered around me one which exhibited
these two features in the most marked and
conspicuous
manner. This was beyond all question
the skull of Varus; and here it is. Examine it
Here is the organ of combativeness, or fondness for
fighting; observe how it projects and is expanded.
Herenohere is the organ of secretiveness, or in
other words, the propensity to hide away when
danger
approaches. Observe, it is almost imperceptible.
It is plain that the owner of this skull was without
the sense of fear; of course it must be the skull of
Varus. There is no doubt of itto disbelieve would
argue absolute stupidityit would be flying in the
face of demonstration.
Without doubt, said I, for I began to be of
opinion
that this old man was a sage, and in all
probability
might furnish me with what I had hitherto
sought in vain over half the world.
Very well, continued the sage, we have thus
established the fact, that these particular organs do
actually and invariably indicate the qualities my
father ascribed to them. The next step was to
identify other organs with other qualities until I had
made out a complete system, comprehending all the
moral, physical and intellectual faculties of the
human
race. Accordingly I proceeded to select and
classify the skulls that lay scattered around, placing
all those together which exhibited the same or
similar
peculiarities. After having done this I
proceeded
to christen them agreeably to the nomenclature
of the infallible science. One heap I dubbed men of
genius, because it was the smallestanother thieves
another murdererssome I called lovers of order
some lovers of tunesome of numberssome of
noveltysome I disposed of in one class, some in
another, as situation and circumstances required.
For instance, in this very cave which I have now
inhabited almost thirty years, I found on my arrival
a great many skulls lying dispersed on the floor, or
the recesses within. These I took it for granted
appertained to persons who had retreated there for
shelterhad been discovered by the German army,
and put to death. They must therefore have hid
awayand therefore the organ of the brain the
most remarkable and most strongly developed must
of necessity be that of secretiveness or hiding away.
I confess that there was a great diversity in the
phrenology of these runaways, and that not a few of
them exhibited a most provoking development of
the organ of combativeness, or fighting. This was
a formidable obstacle to my progress, but I got over
it at last, by supposing what was very natural, that
these latter might have been the skulls of the
valiant
Germans who, pursuing the runaways into
their last retreat, were slain in combat with these
cowards, for cowards will fight when desperate.
There was one particular projection or
development
of the organ common to all the skulls I
examined, which I called the organ of order. The
soldiers of Varus were of the veteran Roman
legions
,
who had doubtless been in service almost all
their lives. Now the distinguishing characteristic
of a soldier, is order and discipline, which are in
fact, one and the same. Therefore that organ
which is most universally and strongly developed
in soldiers, must be the organ of discipline.
In this manner I continued to build up by
degrees
my favourite science upon the impregnable
basis of experience and demonstration, until I had
selected a class of skulls to represent the whole
range of human passions and human faculties. In
this way too, by unwearied patience and assiduity,
I `established' the truth of my father's theory in a
manner that I defy the world to shake. So
perfectly
am I convinced of its unerring principles, its
unassailable strength and accuracy, that were I not
so old I would go forth into the world and fearlessly
govern myself by the infallible criterion of
phrenology
in my judgment of mankind. As it is I
must leave it to some young and enterprising
adventurer
to accomplish the only remaining point
necessary
to convince mankind and overturn the
mischievous
absurdities of the contemptible science (as
by courtesy it is called) of physiognomy.
Here Dr. Gallgotha, for that I found was the
hermit's
name, concluded his details, which, in their
progress, had entirely changed my first impressions
in relation to his character and pursuits. As he
proceeded in the development of his system, he
called forth my wonder and admiration; and long
before he concluded, I had become a convert to his
principles. It appeared to me impossible, indeed,
that a rational being could shut up his
understanding
to the conviction of its irresistible
demonstrations
;
and my imagination expanded with the hope
of being able, at last, to succeed in the mission
which had cost me so many toils and dangers. I
remained several days in this abode of science,
during which time the doctor gradually unfolded
the minutia of his system, and taught me the whole
mystery of development. Every day we became
more enthusiastically convinced of the impregnability
of the science; and nothing could equal the delight
of the old man at finding such a scholar, except
mine at meeting such a preceptor.
Thou art just the disciple I should have
selected
from the whole worldfor thou hast the finest
development of the organ of faith I ever remember
to have seen. Come, I will take my staff and skulls,
and, like the sages of old, go forth into the world to
teach and to enlighten. Wilt thou be my
companion
,
my disciple, my son by adoption?
You may suppose I acceded to this proposal
with a transport of delight; and it was accordingly
arranged to depart the very next day, so anxious
were we to begin our scientific pilgrimage. We
shall want nothing, said Dr. GallgothaI will
instruct the people, and they in return will
gratefully
administer to our trifling necessities, when
what we have is spent.
Accordingly, the next day, having deposited the
skull of Quintilius Varus with other specimens
exhibiting
each of the cerebral developments
essential
to the demonstration of the doctor's first
principles
,
in a bag, thrown over my horse, we bade a
final adieu to the cave of Macpelah, and sallied
forth, agreeing to ride and walk by turns. In
passing
the spot where I had been knocked from my
horse by the mysterious hand, I observed a limb
projecting over the road, apparently about the
height of my mouth when on horseback, and
incrusted
with an icy sleet. It occurred to me, it
might have been this limb that knocked me down
and thus, as it were, became a providential
instrument
in bringing about my meeting with this
inspired
old man.
Emerging from the forest, we entered a fine
picturesque
country, full of grassy verdure, blushing
vines and laughing villages. At one of these last
we stopped for refreshment, and were introduced
into a public room where sat perhaps a dozen
travellers
around a large old fashioned oak table. The
old man immediately began to exercise his talent in
demonstrative science. He put on his spectacles,
and walked leisurely round the table, stopping
behind
every man and studying the infallible index of
his mind at the back of his head. At length he
came to one, at the first view of which, he retreated
with horror. He then approached it again, and as
if impelled by the irresistible fascination of
overwhelming
terror, put his fingers upon a part of the
man's skull. The fellow started up, and turning
furiously round upon the doctor, exclaimed
Dn you! what are you about with my
head?
Nnnnnothing, replied the doctor, in
a voice quaking with terrorIIHeavens and
earth! what a supernatural development of the
organ of . Pray, my dear sir, when did you
commit your last m. I'll give you a hundred
rix dollars for that skull of yours.
Old man, replied the fellow, gruffly, its well
for you that you are old, and, as I suspect, not very
wise, or I would
O dontnow dont mm. Pray now, my
dear sir, dont kill me!
Kill you! said the other, with a contemptuous
smile, though my trade is killing, it is not such
tough old animals as you I deal with. He then
quietly sat down again, while the doctor sidled up
to me, and taking my elbow, drew me significantly
out of the room.
We must depart instantly, said he.
What, without our breakfast? said I.
Ayeor it is all over with us. That man is
one of the greatest villains in existencehe has the
organ of murder, almost as large as the bass pipe of
the great organ at AntwerpHe cannot have
committed
less than a hundred assassinations. Come
comelet us depart secretly that the murderer may
not know which way we go. What an invaluable
science, thought I, that thus intuitively announces
to us the dangers, which others discover only when
it is too late.
We now moved ourselves quietly out of the inn
unnoticed by any of the domestics, who, as we owed
them nothing, were indifferent to our motions. The
old man, and indeed so did I, often looked back to
see if the murderer was coming after us, but luckily
we turned an angle of the road, and were out of
sight before he made his appearance.
What a lucky escape! quoth the doctor.
Miraculous! responded I.
We proceeded on slowly till the sun began to
wax low in the western horizon, when being tired
and withal exceeding hungry, we gladly descried a
pretty considerable village, in a rich vale which
spread its soft evening beauties under our eyes as
we reached the summit of a hill, at whose feet it lay
nestling. We pushed forward with new spirits, and
gaily footed down the hill, close to the bottom of
which was an inn, bearing on its sign-post the head
of the great Frederick. There, quoth the
doctor
triumphantlythere is a living proof of the
falsehood of that delusive science, which Lavater
23
palmed upon the world. If you look at that head
in front, it is the head of a blockheadif in the
rear, it is that of the greatest man Germany ever
produced, with the exception of my father, and one
other, whom I shall not at present name.
The doctor's self gratulations were speedily put to
flight by the appearance of the tremendous assassin
we had escaped from in the manner just related.
He rode up to the inn, which I afterwards learned
was a place where horses were let, dismounted,
gave his beast to the hostler, and turned away,
carelessly
exclaiming, with a significant nod at the
doctor
O! you're there, are you?
Its all over with us, cried the doctor, in
despair
I
shall perish, and what is worse than all,
the most noble science ever invented will perish
with me?
Pray, sir, said I to the landlord, who had just
made his appearance, with a portly figure, a
laughing
eye, and a jolly careless gait, giving shrewd
promise
of a pestilent wagPray, sir, what is the
name of the person who rode up just now?
Why we call the fellow Abaellino, answered
mine host.
The great bandit, echoed I.
You may say that, replied hethat fellow
is the greatest robber and murderer in a hundred
miles round.
I told you so, said the doctor aside to me.
Divine science of phrenology! aspirated I
with fervour.
A robber and murderer! resumed the doctor
after a pausewhy is he not secured and
punished
?
O, we can't well do without him, rejoined the
otherhe is the butcher of the village, and though
he regularly robs us in the way of his business, we
don't like to turn our backs upon his beef and mutton.
So saying, he invited us into the house, and at our
request showed us into a room he called the moon,
by ourselves. After sitting silent awhile with his
face rather averted, the doctor slowly moved his
head upon the pivot of his neck, and looking me full
in the eye, began
This mistake, as it doubtless appears to you
who are not yet thoroughly initiated into the
mysteries
of the science, only the more convinces me
of the infallibility of the organs of the cerebellum,
in disclosing to the scientific adept, the mysteries of
every variety of human character. With what
unerring
instinct, as it were, did I dive into the secret
propensities of the man who has just left us. That
his trade or profession was murder, I had not the
least doubt; but whether a murderer of men or
beasts, the cerebellum does not sufficiently
indicate
;
at least I confess I have not yet detected the
precise development of the organ of murder, which
points out the difference between the slayer of men,
and the slayer of beasts.
What a pity! replied I, sighing.
Certainly it is to be lamented, continued the
doctor, but it is no impeachment of a science, to
say that it is not perfect. There are other defects
in our science, which it is one of the objects of this
pilgrimage to remedy or remove. It is not yet
settled
in my system, whether mind operates upon
matter, or matter upon mind; in other words,
whether
those developments, which so unerringly
indicate
the presence or absence of certain qualities, or
propensities of the animal man
I thought you said he called man a machine,
interrupted the Man Machine rather impatiently.
So he did at first, replied Le Peignebut
this time I am positive he called him an animal.
He was a fool for his painsbut I beg pardon;
go on, sir.
Doctor Gallgotha, continued Mr. Le Peigne,
was saying that he was not satisfied in his own
mind whether those cerebral developments, which so
unerringly indicated the presence or absence of
certain
decided and governing qualities or propensities
of the animal man, were the cause or the effect of
these qualities and propensities. This doubt,
continued
he, has occasioned me infinite trouble and
vexation, since upon its decision depends the great
point, whether mind or matter is predominant in
intellectual
beings. Whether in fact, mind is the seal,
and matter the wax, or
vice vers
, is what I must of
necessity decide experimentally and demonstrably,
before I publish my system to the universe.
At this moment there was a loud uproar and
bawling in the passage, which attracted our
attention
,
and drew us to that quarter, where we found
the jolly landlord chastising a boy belonging to the
house, for some fault or other. The lad roared
manfully, but the landlord continued his discipline,
until at our intercession he let him off. I
observed
that doctor Gallgotha took particular notice of
the stick with which the chastisement was inflicted,
and picking it up, examined it with strict attention.
When we returned to our room, he seized my hand,
and squeezing it with trembling enthusiasm cried
out,
Heureka! Heureka! I have found it!
Found what? said I, a little alarmed least the
doctor had lost some such thing as his wits, rather
than found any thing valuable.
I have received a full solution of my doubt, in
the simple incident we have just witnessed. Behold
how we philosophers differ from other men, in
converting
apparently the meanest, most trivial
incidents
into the foundation and supports of a theory.
Look at this stickit has settled a point that has
puzzled the wits of the wisest of all ages.
23*
I looked at the stick, and was obliged to confess
that I saw nothing very particular about itit
was not even a witch-hazel. The doctor smiled
with an ineffable yet condescending look of
superiority
.
Didst thou observe how the application of this
stick affected the mind of that boy so as to cause
him to writhe, and shrink, and cry out aloud?
I did.
And didst thou see or hear any thing of this
kind proceeding from the stick?
Verily no.
Very wellthus then we have a convincing
example, better than all the argument in the
world, that it is matter which operates upon mind
and not mind upon matter, since we see this stick,
which is altogether composed of matter, is not the
least affected by the stripes, at the same time that
the mind of the lad is entirely overcome, even unto
tears and wailings.
I could almost have fallen at the feet of the man
whose capacious mind could thus, as it were, like
some potent enchanter, settle the whole universe
with the aid only of a little stick or wand. Every
moment he gained upon my admiration, and I had
forgot even that I had not tasted food all day long,
when the maid servant opportunely came in with
our supper. Scarcely had she placed it on the table
when the doctor cried out
Come hither, my pretty girl.
She approached, blushing and bridling, and really
looking quite charming.
Pshaw! said the doctor, turn your backI
don't want to see your faceits not worth looking
at. Mercy upon us! what a development of the
organ of amativenesstruly thou hast a neck like a
bull! Thou art over head and ears in love, I
warrant
theeand herehere too is the organ of
secretiveness
,
big enough to hold a stout strapping
lover as secretly as a kernel in a nutshell. And
here, bless me!here is the organ of inquisitiveness
swelled out to an enormous sizeDamsel, confess
now, thou hast listened at a half-open door, and
peeped through a key-hole many a time and oft
hey?
The damsel took this insinuation in dudgeon,
flounced out of the room in a hurry, and
proclaimed
in the kitchen that there was a witch, or a
necromancer
in the moon. There was no getting her
into the room again the whole evening. After
supper we lighted our pipes, for I had learned to
smoke at the instance of the doctor, who assured
me it was the best medium for philosophising in
the world. Doctor Gallgotha then resumed the
conversation on the mysteries and doubts which
gave him so much trouble and stood so directly in
the way of the progress of this stupendous science.
By degrees we penetrated deeper and deeper
into the profundity of phrenology, and step by step
arrived at the conclusion that it was not only the
most noble of all the sciences, but that, if it could
only be brought to perfection, it would supersede
the necessity of all other modes of human
knowledge
.
In proportion as the smoke of our pipes
became more dense and impenetrable, did our
mental
vision seem to become more clear and
penetrating
,
until we discovered through the mists that
enveloped
us, the consummation of all our
anticipations
in the universal establishment of the sublime
mysteries of the cerebral development. Then
experience
would be unnecessary and knowledge of
the world superfluousthen men would no longer
depend upon the vague and uncertain indications of
character exhibited by human actionsthen
inexperience
would no longer be the dupe of cunning
and deceptionand even children might be taught
a profound insight into the characters of each other,
by studying the infallible auguries of the cerebral
development.
Suddenly however we were brought down to the
level of humanity, by a confusion of voices, screams
and exclamations, which proceeded from the
adjoining
room, where we had deposited our baggage.
On hastening thither we beheld a scene which
beggars description. It seems the jolly landlord had
that evening expected a bag of cabbages from a
garden he possessed, a little way out of the village,
but had gone to bed without thinking to inquire
whether they were actually arrived. The
circumstance
occurred to him while in bed, and as he
was one of those fidgety impatient bodies that can
never sleep with a doubt on their minds, he had
rung the bell and directed the fair damsel with the
organ of inquisitiveness so finely developed, to
search for the bag of cabbages, and let him know
whether it had come. In pursuance of this order,
she at length encountered our bag, and feeling
something round in it, untied the string, put in
her hand and brought out the identical skull of
Quintilius
Varus, grinning defiance to Arminius and all
his host. The poor girl screamed and fell flat on the
floor, upsetting at the same time the bag, which
poured
forth its contents, rolling in all directions about
the room. The scream brought out every living
thing within the house, not excepting the cat and
the dog. As they entered the room to see what
was the matter, they encountered the implements of
phrenology, and tumbled one upon the other in
horrible
confusion, screaming with terror as they
discovered
the obstacles that had occasioned their fall.
The jolly host trembled from top to toe, and swore
as loudly as his chattering teeth would permit, as he
stood with his tufted nightcap on one side of his
head; the innamorato of the inquisitive damsel, who
was no other than the hostler, now hovered over
his mistress blubbering, and now fell a kicking the
innocent causes of her catastrophewhile pussy
delighted with so pretty a plaything, was purring
and pawing with the phrenological index of poor
Varus. There was not a face less white than a
sheet in the whole party, except that of the African
cook, which became absolutely ten times blacker
than ever with terror and dismay.
When doctor Gallgotha saw the pillars, as it
were, of his science thus overthrown and rolling on
the floor, subject to the kicks of an illiterate clown
and the pawings of an ignorant pussy, he lost all
patience, and exclaimed in a hollow voice that
seemed to come from one of the tongueless remains
before us, and startled even me
Avaunt! base and illiterate plebeiansfly
skipand leave the sacred depositories of the most
sublime and incomprehensible of all sciences which
ye have thus impiously assailedleave them I say
and thou most sacrilegious of the feline breed, no
longer pollute with thy unhallowed paw the remains
of thy betters. Look at me, continued heI
come from the regions of the deadI have been
for more than thirty years the companion of these
eloquent remains that speak without tongues and
philosophise without brainsI have conversed all
my life with dead men's bonesand may say
without
exaggeration that I come into the world an
envoy from the grave!
A ghosta ghost! shrieked men, women and
children, at this appalling speech; and indeed the
doctor had something extremely supernatural about
him at that moment. His pale and hollow cheeks,
sunken eyes, shining forehead and skull of polished
ivory, unshadowed by a single hair, as he stood
holding up the knob of Varus in his hand,
altogether
seemed to justify the renewed terrors of the
group, which now hurried helter-skelter out of the
room into the dark entry, where the jolly landlord
fell over the damsel with the organ of
inquisitiveness
so finely developedthe black cook over the
jolly landlord, and the rest one upon another in
horrible confusion. On their departure the doctor
replaced his treasures in the bag, which he desired
me to carry up into our sleeping room, where we
disposed ourselves to rest. The last thing the
good man did before he fell asleep was to observe
to me the singular exemplification of the truth of
his principles which had just occurred. It was
phrenologically impossible, said he, that any
other person in the house, but the damsel with the
organ of inquisitiveness, should have had the
curiosity
to open my bag.
We slept late in the morning, partly owing to the
fatigue of our day's journey and partly to the
circumstance
of remaining entirely undisturbed. Not
a soul knocked at the door, and the region about us
seemed as quiet as if inhabited only by Varus and
his speechless companions. Seeing the sun shining
bright into our window, I got up, dressed myself,
and waking my companion, we descended together
into the room we had occupied the night before.
Not a soul came near us, and there was no symptom
of preparation for breakfast. I opened a door
which led into the bar-room to inquire for
somebody
,
and detected the inquisitive damsel peeping
through the key-hole. She screamed, and fled
away like a wild crane. More confirmation of
the sublime science, exclaimed the doctor, rubbing
his handsbut I should like something to eat.
Once more I opened the door and sallied forth, but
could find no living soul save ourselves in the whole
house. I then proceeded to the stable, where by
good luck, as I supposed, I encountered the hostler,
who, the moment he saw me with the doctor at my
heels, who by this time had overtaken me, seized
his pitch-fork and exclaimed, Doant ee coom noigh
menow dont eeoi should'nt mooch loike to kill
a spook, but by gum an ye coom ony noigher oill
make day light shoine through two holes in ee, I
woolso I wool. So saying, he retreated under
cover of his fork into the recesses of the stable and
there entrenched himself behind a large goat who
shouldered his horns at us in defiance.
Perceiving no prospect of getting any breakfast
here, after a little preliminary discussion, we decided
to saddle our horse and proceed forthwith to the
next town as fast as possible, least the panic should
precede us. The hostler stood behind his
entrenchment
and witnessed our preparations without
the least apparent disposition to interfere. When
all was ready, the doctor proffered payment for our
entertainment and that of our horse.
Noanoa, was the replyOi want none of
thy diabolical money, not oioi dare to say 'twould
set moi breeches afire or turn into snakes in moi
pocketnoanoagoa ee away to the grave where
the old mon says he belongsart welcome to the
provenderdang it if I did'nt think he eat his oats
different from a Christian horse loikegoanow
do goa, or dang me if I doant stick ee.
Let me first examine your cerebral
development
to see if you are really inclined to commit
murder
,
quoth the doctor, advancing.
Shalt see it quick enough if thee comest any
noigher, said hostler, marshaling his pitch-fork.
Let us begone, said the doctorI'd as soon
attempt to teach the sublime science to a horse as
to that illiterate Cyclops.
Accordingly we proceeded to the house still silent
and deserted as before, placed our baggage upon
the horse, and leaving what we supposed sufficient
for our fare upon the table, departed from the
village
.
As we turned to take a last look at the inn,
we detected the inquisitive damsel, peeping
cautiously
out of a garret window. Still new
demonstrations
,
cried the doctor, and for a time forgot
24
he had eaten no breakfast. I afterwards learned that
the appearance of the doctor had become a regular
ghost story, already incorporated into the country
legends, and that the jolly landlord would not touch
the money we left on the table until it had been
soundly exorcised.
Proceeding on our journey, about noon we
arrived
at a town, which, being the seat of
government
of a sovereign prince, who had one sixth of a
vote at the Diet, and whose territory was full a
league and a half square, was a place of some
consequence
.
Here we determined to stop for the
purpose of refreshment, and with a design to stay
long enough to deliver a lecture at least.
Accordingly
,
advertisements were posted up in the most
conspicuous quartersfor it is to be observed the
prince would not allow of a newspaper in his
dominions
,
for fear it might overturn his empirean
invitation was also sent to the prince and princess,
together with the lords and ladies of the court, to
honour with their presence a lecture on the sublime
science. No further particulars were given. We
will surprise them, quoth the doctor, with an
entire novelty.
The best apartment of the inn was procured, and
dimly lighted to suit the solemn obscurity of the
science to be illustrated; and the table behind which
the doctor stood to deliver his lecture was covered
with a student's black cloak, borrowed for the
occasion
.
It was somewhat late in the evening before
the lecture began, for the prince always took a nap
after dinner, with his head in the lap of his mistress.
Besides this, some delay occurred in consequence
of several disputes about precedence among the
nobility, which the prince settled on his arrival. It
is currious by the way, that every where else except
at courts, when two well-bred persons are going
into a room together, the contest is not who shall
go first but who shall go last. At length, however,
every thing was settled, and the doctor commenced
his lecture by explaining the first principles, and
general outlines of the sublime science. All this
the company endured with exemplary decorum.
But when, for the purpose of exemplification, he
resorted to his bag, which stood at his side, and one
by one leisurely brought forth the skulls of Varus
and his companions, there was a terrible uproar
among the votaries of science. The sovereign
princess
shrieked and fainted; of course the ladies of
the court could do no less than follow her example.
During their insensibility they some way or other
managed to get out of the lecture-room, leaving me
and the doctor alone, like the children in the wood.
The prince was so enraged that he threatened to
shut us up in a prison he had, called the Seven
Towers
;
but from this he was dissuaded by a cunning
old fox of a minister who reminded him of the
practice
of throwing a tub to a whale. It will keep
the people from thinking and talking about a
representative
government and such dangerous
matters
,
said he, which is the great use of the arts
and sciences. So we escaped the prison of the
Seven Towers. We heard afterwards that the
reigning
princess had been brought to bed of a young
prince whose cerebral development was exactly
that of Quintilius Varus.
I shall pass over the various incidents of the
remaining
portion of our journey till we reached
Paris, merely observing that the doctor, by reason
of enlisting every thing that fell in his way among
the demonstrations and exemplifications of the
sublime
science, had established it, in his own mind,
ten times stronger than ever, and so firmly
convinced
himself and me, that we would have laid down
our lives in defence of its principles. By the time
we arrived at Paris, we were precisely in that state
of enthusiastic excitement, which the vulgar call
madness, but which philosophers and theorists well
know proceeds from an innate and heaven-born
conviction of the truth, connected with a vehement
zeal in its propagation.
At Paris we found the throne of science, as it
were, deserted and vacant. Ever since the
fashionable
world became scientific, it has been
observed
that nothing but novelty will go down at lectures.
They get tired even of inspiration, if too often
repeated
,
and the noblest truths of the most sublime
sciences are interesting and attractive only so long
as they continue to be new. They coquette with
the sciences, as they do with their lovers, and a new
science to a fashionable blue stocking, is as a new
face or a new fashion. In this state was Paris on
our arrival. The astronomers with their great
telescopes had ransacked the heavens until not a
single incognito star remained; the botanists could
find no new plants to christen with unchristian
names; the naturalists having exhausted the living
world, were busily employed upon antediluvian
bones; the chymists having become tired of
enacting
the bottle conjuror, were fast relapsing into
their former usefulness and confining their
lectures
to those who only came there to be
instructed
.
In short, the old thread-bare sciences
were quite out of favour with the fashionable
amateurs, as affording nothing but useful
practical
knowledge, only fit for musty scholars and
greasy mechanics. There was not a good joke
stirring in all Parisnor a new tragedy to frighten
the government, with declamations about liberty in
the mouth of a Greek patriotnor a rumour of a
conspiracy, an intrigue, or a change in the ministry
to keep people from dying of ennui, which they
certainly
would have done if it had not been for a
certain
ultra-viscount and his new theatre. In short,
we came in the nick of time, and the whole world
was, as it were, before us.
The doctor lost no time in announcing his arrival,
and calling upon some of the most confirmed M
24*
cenii of the city, who are said to be so fond of
patronage
that they consider it a great obligation for
any body to apply for it at their hands. One of
these was a good lady, who immediately got into
her carriage, and before night had engaged half the
beau-monde of Paris to come to the lecture on an
entire new science, which had never before been
heard of among the learned. In truth, a most
brilliant
audience collected to hear the doctor, who on
this occasion for the first time promoted me to the
office of handing and returning the cerebral
developments
as he had occasion to use them in the course
of his lecture.
The lecture with which Dr. Gallgotha
commenced
his course in Paris, was the same that frightened
the sovereign princess and her court into fits; but
I will do the ladies of Paris the justice to say that
they stood the display of our phrenological
specimens
,
like heroines; whether it be that the French
women are naturally bolder than the German, or
that a certain fashionable philosopher had in some
degree prepared them for scientific horrors, by his
exhibition of fossil remains. The thing took
amazingly
there
was something new in the idea of
looking at the back of the head, instead of the face,
to ascertain the peculiarities of human character,
and novelty is indispensable to the existence of
people
who have exhausted all other pleasures. There
were indeed some ladies belonging to the coteries of
the old lecturers, who affected to laugh at the doctor's
theory, but even they were effectually silenced by a
discovery of my master, that the organ of tune was
developed in the head of the famous composer
Rossini
,
to such a degree that it had actually
monopolized
nearly the whole of his cerebellum. There
was no resisting this proof, not only that Rossini
was a great composer of tunes, but likewise that the
doctor's science was infallible. The fiddler and
the doctor accordingly were the two greatest men
in Paris. The rage for cerebral developments
became
intense, and thenceforward every lady of the
least pretensions to fashion or science procured a
skull, marked and mapped conformably with the
principles of the sublime science, which she placed
on her toilet in order that she might dress and study
at the same time. Two or three of the most
zealous
female devotees actually fell in love with the
doctor, being deeply smitten with his cerebral
development
.
The fashionable gentlemen whose sole
business is to make love, began to grow jealous of
Varus and his legions, and one or two ludicrous
anecdotes occurred which set all Paris tittering. I
will relate them, although I cannot vouch for their
truth any farther than to say that every body
believed
them.
A young nobleman was deeply enamoured of a
beautiful lady of high rank, and particularly jealous
of one of his rivals who wore powder in his hair. He
had been absent some weeks on military duty, and
returning to town one evening, proceeded directly
to the house of his mistress intending to surprise her
with a visit. Finding a servant at the door, he
inquired
for the lady, and was told that she was so
deeply engaged that she could see nobody. The
jealousy of the lover was alarmed, and pushing the
servant aside, he proceeded silently towards the
lady's boudoir, the door of which he found shut.
Pausing a moment, he heard as he imagined two
voices within exchanging words of most particular
endearment, and something in the pauses that
sounded
like kissing. Human nature could stand it no
longer. He peeped through the key-hole where
he saw a sight that drove him to madness. The
lady was sitting by the light of a fire which was fast
going out, caressing and fondling a figure, the
whiteness
of whose head too well indicated his
detestable
powdered rival. From time to time he heard
the words amativeness, adhesiveness, hope,
secretiveness
and elopement, or something that sounded
very like it. The thing was perfectly plainthey
were exchanging professions of love and planning
an elopement. The sight and the conviction was
no longer to be borne. He burst open the door
furiously, and being in full uniform as an officer of
the guards, drew his sword and making a desperate
blow at the powdered head, it flew off the shoulders
and rolled upon the floor. The lady shrieked and
sunk from her seat; and the jealous lover hearing
a noise in the outward apartments, and supposing
he had done the gentleman's business pretty
effectually
,
bethought himself that it was high time to
take care of himself. He accordingly made the
best of his way out of the house, towards the gate
St. Honor, through which he hurried into the
country
,
nor stopped till he had safely lodged himself
within his castle in Normandy.
From thence he wrote a letter filled with the most
cutting reproachescharging his mistress with
falsehood
,
cruelty, deceit, and all sorts of villany, and
vowing on the cross of his sword, never to see her
more. The lady laughed two full hours on the
receipt of this defiance. When she had done
laughing
,
as she really had a regard for her admirer, she
sat down and wrote him the following reply:
Good Monsieur Jealousy
You are welcome to call me what you will,
except it be old or ugly. However, I forgive you,
and so does the formidable rival whose head you
so dexterously severed from his body, and who I
give you my honour is not the least the worse for
the accident. I solemnly assure you, you may
come back to Paris without the least danger of
being prosecuted by the family of monsieur M
or being received by me with ill humour, for I
shall laugh at you terribly.
Your friend,
N. N.
This epistle puzzled the lover not a little, and
caused him fifty sensations in a minute. First he
would return to Paris, and then he would not
then he resolved never to see his mistress again
and next to mount his horse, return immediately,
look her stone dead, and then set out on his travels
to the interior of Africa. This last resolution
carried
the day, and he forthwith returned to Paris
in as great a hurry as he had left it. When the
lady saw him, she was as good as her wordshe
laughed herself out of breath, and the more he
reproached
her, the louder she laughed. However, as
anger and laughter can't last for ever, a truce took
place in good time, and the lady addressed her lover
as follows:
Cease thy reproaches, my good friend, and hear
me. I am determined to give you the most
convincing
proof in the world of my truth and
attachment
,
by delivering your rival into your hands, to
be dealt with as you think proper. Know that he
is now concealed in this very room.
Is he? replied the other in a ragethen by
heaven he has not long to liveI shall take care to
cut off his head so effectually this time that the most
expert surgeon in Paris shall not put it on again
where is the lurking caitiff?But I need not ask
I see his infernal powdered head peeping from
under the sophacome out villain and receive the
reward of thy insolence in rivalling me.
So saying, he seized the treacherous powdered
head, and to his astonishment drew it forth without
any body to it. He stood aghastand the lady
threw herself on the sopha, and laughed ten times
louder than before.
What in the name of woman, cried he at last,
is the meaning of all this mummery?
It means that I am innocentand that your
worship isjealous of the skull, or what is worse,
the plaster counterfeit of the skull of your
great-grand-mother
,
the immortal author of the Grand
Cyrus. I was but admiring the beautiful indication
of the amative organ, from which it plainly appears
impossible that any other person could have
written
such prodigiously long developments of the
tender
passion.
But why did you kiss the filthy representation
of mortality?
You were mistaken, answered the ladyas
the room was rather dark, I placed my face eloce to
it in order the better to see and admire its beautiful
cerebral development.
Its what? replied the lover impatiently.
Its phrenological indications.
And what in the name of heaven are these?
cried the lover in some alarm for the intellects of his
fair mistress. The lady then proceeded to explain
to him the revolution in science which had taken
place during his absence; and a reconciliation
being the consequence, that night took him to the
doctor's lecture that he might no longer be an
age behind the rest of the world. The story got
abroadindeed the lady could not resist telling
it herself to a friend with strict injunctions of
secrecy
and
all Paris became still more devoted to the
sublime science for having afforded such an
excellent
subject for a joke.
The other story relates to a young nobleman
whose situation near the king, and orthodox
ultraism
,
made him a very distinguished person in the
beau-monde. But he was distinguished only in a
certain way; that is, he was a sort of butt, on whose
shoulders every ridiculous incident was regularly
fathered, whether it owed its paternity to him or
not. As Pasquin stands sponsor for all the wise
sayings of Rome, so M. the Viscount came in for
all the foolish actions of Paris. He was, as it were,
residuary legatee to all the posthumous follies of his
ancestors, as well as the living absurdities of his
noble contemporaries. He was one of those
people
who fancy themselves most eminently qualified
for that for which they are most peculiarly unfit,
and whom folly and vanity combined, are
perpetually
stimulating to act in direct opposition to nature
or destiny. He was contemptible in his person
yet he set up for a beau and Adonishe was still
more contemptible in mindyet he never rested
till he had bought the title of a Mcenas and a
savan, of an industrious manufacturer of
ultra-doggerel
rhymes, whom he had got into the National
Institute
.
He was, moreover, born for a valet, or at
best, a pastry cookyet he aspired to the lofty
chivalry
and inflexible honour of a feudal baron; and
he became a soldier, only, as it would seem, because
he was the greatest coward in all Paris. It was
well known that he gave five hundred franks to a
noted bully to let him beat him at a public coffee
house, and afterwards allowed his brother, a tall
grenadier, a pension not to kill him for it.
The viscount had likewise been absent some
months at a small town, in one of the northern
departments
,
whither he had gone to suppress an
insurrection
,
began by two or three fish women,
stimulated
as was shrewdly suspected, by an old gardener,
who had, as was confidently asserted, been one of
Napoleon's trumpeters. On his return, he for the
first time heard of the sublime science and its
progress
among the beau-monde. The viscount hated
all innovations in science, or indeed any thing else.
He aspired to be a second Joshua, and to make the
sun of intellect at least stand still, if he could not
make it go backwards as he had good hopes of
doing. Without waiting to hear any of the
particulars
of our exhibition, he hastened, armed and in
uniform as he was, to the hotel where the doctor
was at that moment just commencing a lecture.
The valiant viscount advanced with great
intrepidity
close to the table, and leaning gracefully on
25
his sword, listened in silence to discover whether
there was any thing that smacked of democracy or
heterodoxy. At the proper moment I put my hand
into our Golgotha, and leisurely drew forth the
far-famed
skull of Varus, who I have always
considered
the most fortunate man of all antiquity, in
having
been surprised and slain in the now more
memorable
than ever forest of Teutoburgium. As we
scientific gentlemen have a hawk's eye for a new
comer, one of whom is worth a host of old faces at a
lecture, I took care in bringing the cerebral
development
forth, to thurst it directly towards the face
of the viscount with the teeth foremost. The viscount
fell back, fainted, and lay insensible for some
minutes
.
But the moment he revived, he started
upon his legs in a phrenzy of terror, and began to
lay about him with his good sword so valiantly that
nobody dared to come near him. First he attacked
the doctor and myself, who he charged with the
massacre of the eleven thousand virgins, and the
introduction of infidel skulls into France, which was
tantamount to preaching infidelity. The innocent
cerebellum of poor Varus, next felt the effects of
his terror-inspired valour. He hacked it until the
cerebral development was entirely destroyed, and
then proceeded in like manner to make an example
of the contents of the bag, which he shivered
without
mercy, with his invincible sword. In short,
before he fairly came to his senses, the worthy
gentleman
had demolished almost every thing in the
roomput out the lights and frightened every soul
from the lecture. The solitude and darkness
which succeeded, brought him gradually to his
recollection, when finding himself thus left alone
with the ruins of so many pagan skulls, he gave a
great shriek, scampered out of the room, and did
not stop until he had sheltered himself in the very
centre of a corporal and his guard, belonging to his
regiment, who all swore they would stand by him
to the last drop of their blood.
This adventure was fatal to my master, Dr.
Gallgotha
.
In the first place, it deprived him of nearly
the whole of his phrenological specimens, and
without
these he was like a workman despoiled of his
tools. Besides, the viscount had the very next
morning demanded an audience of the king, in which
he denounced the doctor, as tinctured very strongly
with liberalism, and its invariable concomitants of
sacrilege and impiety. Now I will venture to
affirm, that the good doctor was not only perfectly
ignorant of the very meaning of the word liberal, but
that he was equally innocent of the other two
charges. The truth is, all his organs of faith,
morality
and politics, were swallowed up, or elbowed
out of the cerebellum, by the prodigious expansion
of the organ of ideality or invention. However
this may be, the king was more afraid of the three
abominations of liberalism, than of plague,
pestilence
and famine. He consulted the Jesuits,
who forthwith decided upon taking the poor doctor
and all his works into custody. The valiant
viscount
,
who always volunteered in all cases of
liberalism
and impiety, undertook the task, aided by a
guard of soldiers armed in proof, for he did not
know but the doctor might have another bag full of
pericraniums. Advancing with great caution they
surrounded the house, while the captain of the guard
with three stout resolute fellows, entered for the
purpose of reconnoitering the ground and especially
of ascertaining that there were no skulls to frighten
the viscount. That gallant soldier, having
settled
the latter point to his satisfaction, charged
bayonet, in the rear of his guards, and rushing up
stairs in spite of Varus and his legions, detected the
doctor in the very act of committing to memory a
new lecture he had just composed for the purpose
of demonstrating that there was a certain organ of
the cerebellum, the enlarged development of which
always entailed upon its possessor the absolute
necessity of committing murder. The doctor and I
were clapped up in prison, and his lecture carried to
court to undergo a strict examination by the king's
confessor and the Jesuits.
It was sometime before these expert mousers of
radicalism and infidelity could make any thing of
the doctor's lecture, or discover any offence to
church or state. At length they came to that part
where, in summing up the subject, he laid down the
doctrine of the actual necessity certain persons
laboured
under of committing murder, and that the
rule applied as well to kings as to their subjects.
He inculcates the doctrine of equality, cried
onehe denies the divine right of kings.
He is a republican, cried a second.
He is a traitor, cried a third.
A little farther on they found the following
assertion
I
deny that the three legions of Varus
formed
one body.
Behold! said the confessorhe denies the
trinityhe maintains that three is not oneenough,
let us burn the book and hang the doctor.
Some of the more moderate counsellers,
however
,
as I afterwards learned, petitioned for a
mitigation
of the sentence, which was finally
commuted
into perpetual banishment. We were sent
for to hear our doom, and the viscount who
always
liked a good natured errand was the bearer
of the message. As we followed him into the
palace
,
which we all entered uncovered, the doctor
observed to me that the viscount had a most
formidable
development of the organ of self-esteem.
The confessor lectured the doctor upon his vile
infidelity, his liberalism, and disaffection to church
and state, all which came as naturally together as
so many chymical affinities. The doctor
demanded
25*
the proof, and was referred to the passages I
have just repeated.
It was in vain that he referred in turn to the other
members of the sentences thus garbled, to prove that
he was neither alluding to religion or politics in his
lecture.
No matter, said a cunning Jesuit, who could
convert a wink of the eye into treason, and a nod
of the head into blasphemyno mattera
proposition
may be both treasonable and heterodoxical
in itself, although it has no immediate application
to either politics or religion. The assertion that
three does not make one, is complete in itself, and
requires no reference either to what precedes or
what follows. In two months you must be out of
France.
And thus were we banished from the paradise of
lecturers, only because doctor Gallgotha had
wickedly
and impiously asserted that the physical organs
of kings were the same with those of cobblers, and
that three legions, separately encamped, did not
make one body. The confessor advised us to go
to the new world, where, as there was neither loyalty
or religion, we should be in our element. But
in truth, the doctor was become tired of Paris,
and of the world of fashion, which had begun to
discover symptoms of ennui for some little time
past. Indeed, several of his greatest admirers
had lately absented themselves, to go and see an
automaton, who delivered lectures on the
physical
organization of man, to the astonishment of
all the fashionable lovers of science. Besides all
this, the determined valour of the viscount had
demolished the precious materials by which he
exemplified his theory, and he knew not where to
supply the loss without resorting to the forest of
Teutoburgium. While we were debating whither
to frame our course, and just as I had almost brought
the doctor to consent to accompanying me to the
city of my nativity, the good old man fell sick, or
rather the fabric of nature sunk under him, and the
lamp which had illuminated it, began to twinkle so
faintly in its socket that it was plain the oil was
quite spent.
He took to his bed, from whence he never rose
again. I was going to send for a physician. No,
said he with a languid smileI will die a
Christian
,
but not a martyr. It is cruel to torture age
with unavailing remedies. Besides, I have not
money to pay a doctor, and it would mortify my
pride to be killed for nothing.
I have a satisfaction, even at this distance of time,
in the recollection that I attended him faithfully to
the last, supplied his wants and administered to his
infirmities, as if he had been my father. About four
o'clock one morning, a little before the dawning
of the day, and just at the period of time when
nature seems to be in her last and profoundest
repose
,
preparatory to wakingthe doctor, after
laying
perfectly still for upwards of an hour, suddenly
raised himself upon his elbowand with an eye
clear and bright, surveyed the room all around with
a slow and measured turn of the head. For a
moment
his eye rested upon mebut he did not speak.
He then sunk easily upon his pillowI put my face
close to hishe breathed into it onceand there
was a long pause. He is gone, said Ino, he
breathed
again, and there was another still longer pause.
It is all over now, said Ibut he respired yet once
againand that was the lastI waited, but he
breathed no more.
They would not let me bury him in a church-yard,
because, as the confessor maintained, he was no
Christian, and therefore was not entitled to Christian
charity and forgiveness, after he was dead. But
I buried the old philosopher, where the grass grew
as green, the flowers bloomed as gay, and the birds
warbled as sweetly as if the spot had been blessed
by the confessor himself. Having done this, I
turned
my face towards the Athens of the north, which I
now felt myself thoroughly qualified to enrich with
an entire new science. I had succeeded, indeed,
beyond all expectation, and our society having had
from time to time, mysterious hints of my progress,
was expecting me with anxious impatience.
I accordingly gathered together the wrecks of
my old friend's lectures, which had escaped the
researches of the ultra-viscount, and set out on my
return to my own country.
Without troubling you with the incidents of my
journey which are of no consequence, I arrived in
safety at the seat of the sciences. I had been
expected
with anxiety, and was received with rapture,
as one destined to revive the dormant excitement of
the fashionable devotees. I found there had been
a terrible falling off in my absence. Money had
actually got the upper hand of merit; feasts were
preferred to philosophy; dances to dogmatizing;
gallants to gallypots; and what was worst of all,
the most invincible blue stocking, without beauty,
was no match for a country simpleton, with blue
laughing eyes, rosy cheeks, and a partridge figure.
Such was the backsliding which had taken place,
that a fashionable baronet ventured to declare
publicly
in favour of downright ignorance; and an
old professor of anatomy, was detected in deserting
a discussion upon fossil remains, to go and look at a
pretty girl who was dancing a cotillion. In short,
the temple of science was tottering, and nothing
could save it but starting new game, and creating an
excitement by some absolute originality.
My accomplices wanted to know very much what
I had brought home with me to tickle the lovers
of science; but I was determined neither they or
the public should learn any thing on the subject,
until
I disclosed it in a public lecture. I was
determined
to take the northern Athens by surprise.
Accordingly, it was announced that I would deliver
a lecture on phrenology on a particular evening.
Phrenology! it sounded indeed like something new.
The blues ran to their technological dictionary, but
for once they were baffledthe word had not yet
got there. It was an entire new coinage. The
great difficulty was in procuring the necessary
cerebral
developments for the purposes of illustration,
without subjecting myself to the penalty of the laws.
Finding nothing better could be done, I one night
went out of the city upon the common, and picked
up a number of skulls of animals, principally dogs,
to serve me on this one occasion. There was one
which had doubtless belonged to a large bull dog,
that I was resolved should stand for the identical
skull of Varus, which the wrathful viscount had so
inhumanly demolished at Paris. Every exertion
was made by the society and its friends to get
together
a fashionable auditory, and accordingly the
capacious lecture-room of the northern Athens was
crowded with bonnets and feathers most
magnificently
.
There was a brilliant audience, as was
erst said of play-houses, and is now said of churches
and lecture-rooms.
I confess I felt somewhat skittish, in this first
attempt
to try on an entire new science. However, I
put a good face on the matter, and lectured away,
regardless of consequences. I must do them the
justice to say they took it with great good
humour
.
When I talked of the organ of amativeness,
the young folks tittered, and began to feel for it at
the back of each other's headsI was assured that
many secret attachments were brought to light by
this scrutiny, three of which resulted in elopements
the next day. But when I brought forth the skull of
the bull dog, which I announced as that of Quintilius
Varus, the effect was sublime. There was a
general
scream from the ladies, and two or three heroes
of the Peninsula, in full uniform, were observed to
look hard at the door. However, they stood their
ground manfully, and by putting a bold face on the
matter, reassured the more timid of the auditory.
Upon the whole, I got through with flying colours,
and the debut of the new science was pronounced
eminently successful. By the next lecture, I
procured
a real apparatus of cerebral developments,
which I had mapped out to the best of my
recollection
,
according to the theory of Dr. Gallgotha.
After this successful debut, I continued my course,
and made proselytes at every lecture, until at length
they became sufficiently numerous to form a society,
which was accordingly established under the name
of the Phrenological Institute. So alarming indeed
was my progress, that the old sciences which had once
been belles, and still retained a strong disposition
to coquette it a little with their veteran beaux, began
to wax jealous. Finding themselves, like the
ancient
Britons, likely to be subjected by the very
power they had called over in their own defence,
they raised the standard against me and my
phrenological
brethren.
They pronounced my science no science at all;
affirming that unlike all others it was subject to no
rules, or at least, to none but imaginary ones, that
were neither susceptible of demonstration, nor
maintainable on the ground of experiment or
reasoning
.
The physiognomists especially, led the van
against me, as being their most formidable opponent;
and as a wag of our society observed, we were of
necessity in a minority, because all persons without
brains would, of course, take sides against a science
founded on the supposed existence of what nature
had denied them. We continued to make head
against this formidable array, and to maintain our
ascendancy until, in an evil hour, some workmen in
digging among the foundations of a ruined abbey,
discovered the skull of king Robert Bruce, which
falling into the hands of our enemies, was
forthwith
arrayed against Varus and his legions. It
was immediately put to the phrenological test, and
found wanting in many of the cerebral
developments
characteristic of the known qualities of that
renowned deliverer of Scotland, and destroyer of
phrenology. As ill luck, or destiny, would have it,
the development of his organs was phrenologically
at war with the whole history of his life; and there
was no getting over this desperate anomaly except
by either denying its identity, denying its history, or
lastly, explaining the incidents away in such a
manner
as to reconcile them to our theory. If the
mountain wont come to Mahomet, said the wag
of a member, Mahomet must go to the mountain
if the head of king Robert wont accommodate itself
to our science, we must make his history do it,
which will be just as well. Accordingly he set
about the task, and at our next meeting produced a
dissertation, in which he proved pretty clearly that
king Robert was altogether a different person from
what all the world had believed him to be for
centuries
;
and that so far from his cerebral
development
contradicting the principles of the sublime
science, it demonstrated their truth beyond
question
.
This dissertation was immediately made public,
but although every member of our society believed
it would effectually silence all our opponents, such
is the obstinacy of long received opinions, and such
the inveteracy of jealous rivalry, that it had little
influence on the world, and the skull of king Robert
proved in the end the battle of Bannockburn to our
society. Daily desertions took place from the
benches of my lecture-room; the young lovers
began again to look into each other's eyes and study
the changeable velvet of the cheeks, for indications
of the universal passion; and at length it came to
26
pass that none but the canine race thought of going
to the rear to study characters. What the head of
king Robert had begun, another head was destined
to finish.
A gentleman just arrived from abroad, brought
with him, and presented to our society, a cast which
he assured me was an exact representation of the
skull of
Servin
, immortalized in Sully's Memoirs,
as a monster compounded of the sublimest genius
and the most grovelling detestable vices. On
examination
,
I discovered to my infinite delight that
the cerebral development exhibited the character
and propensities of Servin, with a degree of precision
that, if known, would silence all cavilling, and go far
to establish my system beyond question. I
determined
at once to bring it into the field in opposition
to the head of king Robert, and let them fight it out
before the public. Accordingly I announced the
receipt of my treasure, and invited all sceptics to
come and receive a demonstration of the sublime
truths of phrenology. I had not seen such an
audience
for many a day, although the evening was
stormy, and commenced my lecture on Servin's
head, in high spirits. I pointed out the
development
so exactly corresponding with the character
here the organ of ideality, announcing the extent of
his geniusand there the organ of cunning and
cruelty, announcing the extent of his crimes and
duplicity. Here the organ of tune, demonstrating
his taste for music; there the organ of languages,
exemplifying his unequalled capacity for their
acquirement
.
Here philoprogenitivenessthere
destructiveness
here
secretivenessthere
concentrativeness
.
In short, I proved that the head could have
belonged to none but a person of great intellectual
capacity, contrasted with equal depravity. In the
triumph of my heart, I held it up to the audience as
the hero of phrenology, the invincible rival and
conquerer
of king Robert. I shook it in the faces of
the unbelievers, and handled it at length with so
little discretion, that it fell from my grasp upon the
floor, and the plaster flew about in all directions. I
hastened to lift it up again, and presenting it to the
light, was struck with horror and dismay. The
scaling of the plaster had exposed to view the rude
outlines of one of those wooden heads which
sometimes
ornament the coasting vessels of my native
country. I had not the presence of mind to put
it out of sight, but stood in stupifying embarrassment
without uttering a word, when I was at length
roused
by a hoarse voice crying outDn my eyes,
Tom, is'nt that the head of the Lovely Nancy, that
some rascally land lubber stole from her bows the
other night? Tom immediately confirmed this
with a round sailor's oath, adding'Tis a lucky
godsend that we came in here for a harbour from
the storm to-night, to unkennel this thief of the
world, with his outlandish gibberish about serving
headsif this is the way he serves them, he'll get
served with a baker's dozen at the gangway before
long. So saying, the two gallant tars advanced to
the table and seizing the head of the Lovely Nancy
bore it off in triumph, amid shouts of laughter on
all sides.
There was no lecturing in the northern Athens
after this untoward accident, which shook the faith
even of the true believers. All my disciples left
me with the exception of a worthy advocate, who
was saved from utter condemnation as an
insuperable
blockhead, only by the uncommon development
of the organ of ideality, which sufficiently
demonstrated
the extent of his genius. It was neck
or nothing with himhe must either be an ass or a
phrenologist. The others were all laughed away
from me.
There was now but one way left me to establish
the truths of the sublime science, and that was to
demonstrate
them by actual practiceto make them
the guides of my conduct in life, and to disregard
entirely the flickering lights of experience, as well
as those vague, uncertain, and delusive indications
of character which are supposed to exhibit
themselves
in the conduct and disposition of mankind.
I determined either to show the world the
superiority
of the unerring test of the cerebral
developments
,
over all other touchstones of human passions,
or perish in the attempt. Men have in all ages and
nations sacrificed themselves to the establishment
of great truthsnay, many have voluntarily become
victims to the most absurd, vain and mischievous
theories. Superstition has had, if possible, more
enthusiastic and willing martyrs than true religion;
and thousands have shed their blood for the support
of falsehood, who would have shrunk from doing it
in defence of truth. I will therefore, said I, not
flinch from the duty before me. I will become the
high priest, or the martyr of my science; and if I
cannot prove its sublime truths, will at least offer a
demonstration that I believe in them myself.
For this purpose it was necessary to leave for
awhile the path of philosophy and abstraction, for
the busy occupations and pursuits of practical life.
It is these and these only, that in the eyes of the
vulgar and near-sighted of mankind, furnish the
test of truth. They judge of a science, or a
theory
,
not by the unerring standard of its abstract
beauty, ingenuity or grandeur, but by its pitiful
practical operation, within the sphere of their own
actual experience. The great and radical
difference
between the ignorant and the wise is, that the
former persist in obstinately believing what they
see, without being able to explain its causes; while
the latter consider the evidence of the five senses
as only fit for a court of justice, and believe in
nothing
but what they can account for. They justly
consider, that as man is emphatically a reasoning
26*
being, he ought not to give credit to any fact,
however
obvious it may be to his senses, unless it is
supported
by at least one good substantial reason on
either side, like a bladder under each arm of a
swimmer
.
The vulgar, for example, believe that beef
killed in the decrease of the moon, will always
shrink in the boiling, because they see it every day,
although they can't account for the phenomenon;
while the wise go upon surer groundsthey first
decide whether a thing is theoretically possible and
then assert that it exists. The vulgar are like the
blind man, who denied the existence of light,
because
he could not feel it with his fingers, nor snuff
it up with his nose, nor taste it with his tongue, nor
hear it with his ears; while the wise may be
likened
to the ancient philosopher who would not believe
his eyes when he saw his house set fire to by
lightning
,
because he could not account for the
phenomenon
.
In fine, the ignorant are the dupes of the
five senses; while the wise are governed by the
imagination alonethat sublime and almost
omnipotent
faculty which creates worlds out of nothing,
and makes laws for those that never had an
existence
.
But to return from this digression.
The practical business of this life, it will be
found, consists principally in three things
getting
marriedgetting a familyand getting rich.
There are other miscellaneous occupationssuch
as driving tandemrunning in debtbilking
landlords
and tailorsand walking up and down the
streetsbut these are not so general as to form any
of the grand divisions of human pursuits. In the
furtherance of my great object of demonstrating
the sublime truths of phrenology by the vulgar mode
of practical application, I resolved to kill two birds
with one stone by entering into business, and
looking
out for a wife at the same time. Not knowing
much of the ordinary transactions of the mercantile
world, I found it necessary in the first place to
choose a partner, with whom I could entrust my
capital, and in whose skill I might rely in the
transaction
of our business. Some people would have
gone about, inquiring whether this man or that
man was a prudent, honest, sensible and experienced
person; and whether he had been long enough
known in the community to have established, as the
vulgar phrase is, a good character. But I was
determined
to go a short way to work. I advertised
for a partner with a head as like Sir Thomas
Gresham
as possible, having the zygomatic process very
projecting, the organ of order strongly developed,
and the sentiments of cautiousness,
conscientiousness
,
veneration, benevolence and firmness all
beautifully
exhibited on the cerebellum. Without all
these, I was fully convinced no man could be a great
merchant or build a royal exchange.
In the course of a few days several offered
themselves
to inspection, whose characters were
excellent
,
but whose cerebral developments convinced
me they either had been, or would be, in the course
of their lives, consummate rogues. It is astonishing
indeed to see how the world is frequently, not to
say continually, imposed upon by people who
actually
go down to their graves, with the reputation of
virtue, although fate and phrenology both ordained
it should be otherwise. I can only account for it
on the ground of deception, or want of opportunity.
Being resolved not to be imposed upon by the
specious
seductions of a good character, I dismissed
these applicants one after the other as civilly as
possible. At length a person presented himself,
who underwent the phrenological test greatly to
my satisfaction. He had the finest development
for a merchant I ever saw. The organ of
acquisitiveness
was on a great scale.
Where is that? asked Mr. Quominus.
At the anterior inferior angle of the parietal
bone.
Hum, quoth Mr. Quominusand what
does the said organ indicate?
Sometimes it indicates the tendency to acquire
and the desire to possess in general. It is the organ
in which the idea of property first originated.
Sometimes
it leads to the collection of coins, minerals,
paintings and other curiosities of science
sometimes
to the collection of bugs, butterflies and
beetles
.
In men of sense it gives rise to the
disposition
to acquire useful things; in fools and idiots,
to collect those that are worth nothing. In some it
is the love of science; in others the love of money.
A man with the organ of conscientiousness pressing
upon that of acquisitiveness, will, if he has a
hundred
acres of land, feel vast delight in acquiring one
hundred more, but he will not resort to any
improper
means to attain them; while another man who
hath the organ of acquisitiveness, combined with that
of secretiveness, will become a thief in spite of
himself
.
He cannot help it if he would. Among the
inferior animals, beavers, bees and ants, are
observed
to have the organ of acquisitiveness in great
perfection
.
Indeed, it is conspicuous in all
hoarding
animals
.
What a wonderful science! exclaimed the
other two Wise Men of Gotham.
To proceed with my story, said Le Peigne, such
was the apt, admirable and harmonious association
of organs in the cerebellum of this person, that I
perceived
it was quite unnecessary to make any
inquiries
into his character, qualifications and pursuits.
I saw at once that he was destined to be another
Cosmo de Medicis, and forthwith entered into
articles
of trade with him on the spot.
My next business was to get an experienced
clerk, which I soon did, by applying the touchstone
of the infallible science. I found a man whose
organ
of number was beautifully developed, and most
harmoniously associated with that of individuality.
Where are they situated? asked Mr.
Quominus
.
The organ of number, is designated by the arch
of the eyebrow being either much
pressed
downwards
.
or
very much elevated
.
Then, observed the Man Machine, it seems
that two appearances exactly opposite to each other,
denote the same thing in the science of phrenzy
I mean phrenology?
No such thing, replied the otherit only proves
that two appearances entirely dissimilar may yet
be as like as two peas. The development of
this organ to any extraordinary extent, renders
it impossible for the owner not to be a most expert
hand at figures and calculations; and when
associated
with the organ of individuality
Where is that? interrupted Mr. Quominus.
In the middle of the lower part of the forehead.
And what does it indicate?
It is the organ of the memory and the sense of
thingsand it is always most strongly developed
in children. It is also the organ which indicates a
proneness to adopt new theoriesto embrace the
opinions of others, and a vast facility in
accommodating
ourselves to customs, manners and
circumstances
.
Persons with this organ strongly
developed
,
have moreover a desire, accompanied by the
ability, to know facts and things in generalit
prompts to observation and investigationit greatly
aids in producing a talent for all practical business
involving details, and hence, to the medical
practitioner
,
the lawyer and the merchant it is
invaluable
it
communicates power to the oratorart to
the novelistit tends to allegory and
personification
it
inspired Spenser and John Bunyanand
above all, it delights in the analysis of specific
existences.
What an invaluable organ! exclaimed Mr.
Quominusit indicates but every thing, and I
should think ought to have been christened the
organ of universality, rather than of individuality.
You are mistaken, quoth the otherit is not so
universal as you may imagine. A person having it
strongly developed, retains only general ideas
he is not able to command his knowledge without
previous preparation, and therefore can hardly ever
become learned, or a great extemporaneous orator.
This has been proved by an examination of the
skulls of almost every species of animals from the
frog to the elephant.
But what has the head of a bull-frog to do with
that of a man? asked the Man Machine.
Just as much as the tail of a dog, said Le Peigne,
rather contemptuously.
I believe it, said the other dryly. But
really
,
with submission, sir, it appears to me that in
your science not only different and opposite
developments
signify the same thing, but what is still
more remarkable, the same development of an organ
signifies things altogether differentyou first tell us
that the organ of individuality is the source of
oratory
,
and then that it prevents a man from speaking
extemporaneously, a quality very essential in
oratory
,
I should think. You tell us it is indispensable
to certain sciences which children cannot
comprehend
,
and certain pursuits, such as law, physic and
merchandise, which children cannot engage in, and
yet you say it is most strongly developed in
children
.
It seems to me this savours as it were of
contradictiontwo assertions so contradictory
cannot
,
I should think, be both true.
Sir, replied Le Peigneyou had better stick
to the perfectibility of man and the
counteracting
principles. Do you not know of the modern
discovery, that what is morally impossible, may yet
be scientifically true? No science is now
considered
perfect, except it can not only reconcile
contradictions
,
but impossibilities. My dear sir, I never
doubted the perfectibility of your Men Machines;
pray allow me the perfection of science.
With all my heart, said the other. Be
pleased
to proceed, brother Le Peigne. Did you engage
the Man Machine with the supernatural
development
,
that signified so many opposite yet
reconcileable
things?
You shall hear, returned Le Peigne, whose good
nature soon smoothed down any little irritation. I
had now got a partner and a clerk, on whom I could
confidently rely, for the successful conduct of our
affairs, and the speedy acquisition of fortune.
Nothing
was now wanting but a wife, selected and
chosen
with a proper regard to the infallible auguries
of the cerebral development. As this was the
most important matter of all, I resolved to be very
particular, and to apply the rules of my art with
more than ordinary circumspection. In the first
place, it was indispensable that she should have a
perfect development of the organ of amativeness
Excuse me for interrupting you, said Mr.
Quominuswhere is that same organ and what
does it signify?
It is situated, sir, between the mastoid process on
each side of the projecting point, in the middle of the
transverse ridge of the occipetal bone.
Any man but an anatomist might as well look
for the northwest passage as for these incognito
organs, said QuominusBut the indications?
The organ of amativeness is placed first in the
sublime science, because it indicates the propensity
to falling in lovethe desire of propagating our
species without which there would be neither dog's
tails, nor men's heads, and of course no science of
phrenology. It is in fact the foundation of all the
sciences. Besides this, it is the organ of a variety
of other propensities. Monsieur Flourens, who
27
amused himself occasionally with trepanning
bullfrogs
,
discovered that it was the organ for regulating
muscular motion. On removing the cerebellum
over this part, says he, the animal loses the
power of executing combined movements,he
can move one leg, but not both at the same time.
It is also the organ of retrograde motions. Doctor
Magendie, who is famous for illustrating the nature
of man by the peculiarities of frogs, in performing
some experiments upon these animals, discovered
that disturbing this organ occasioned an
irresistible
propensity in the animal to run, jump or swim
backwards. Other scientific inquirers have found
that when one part was cut the animal rolledwhen
another, it went forward in extensowhen another,
it bent double.
O! I see, interrupted the Man Machine.
This organ is a sort of jack of all tradesit can
turn its hand to almost any thing. I don't wonder
you think it so indispensable in a wife, who should
always be particularly expert at jumping and
swimming
backwards.
The next indispensable requisite in a wife,
continued
Le Peigne, not heeding this interruption,
is the organ of philoprogenitiveness.
What is that? said Mr. Quominus.
The organ which indicates an instinctive love of
offspring.
I should suppose that to be universal.
By no means.
Peg Macquarrie
, who murdered
her child, was entirely without itand so was the
skull of Varus, who I have no doubt, as Tacitus
don't mention his wife or children, was a confirmed
bachelor. Many animals of good reputation drive
their offspring from them when young; and the
birds turn their little ones neck and heels out of the
nest as soon as they are fledged. All these, it is
very remarkable, are destitute of the organ of
philoprogenitiveness
.
It is situated immediately above
the middle part of the cerebellum, and corresponds
to the protuberance of the occiput. It is large in
the Hindoo, Negro and Carib women.
Do they love their children better than other
women? asked the Man Machine.
If they don't, they ought to do it; they are
scientifically
under the necessity of being what nature
plainly intended they should be. The next
cerebral
development indispensable in the organization
of a good wife, is that of concentrativeness.
Where is that, and what doth it signify?
interrupted
Mr. QuominusI beg pardon, but as I
may one day marry myself it may stand me in stead
to know something of these matters.
It is just above philoprogenitiveness and just
below
self-esteem. It indicates sedentary habits and
love of homeas is proved by the organ being
enormously expanded in a toad that was found
imbedded
in a solid block of marble, where he must
have remained for centuries. It is likewise very
strongly developed in snails, who seldom go from
home, as you know.
I suppose then it must be something like a horn,
such as the snails have, said the Man Machine.
Le Peigne gave him a queer side look and
proceeded
.
Doctor Gallgotha observed, in addition to this
love of retirement and indisposition to motion,
that the development of this organ was very
perceptible
in the chamois and other animals fond of
climbing heights and browsing upon precipices.
An excellent quality in a wife, quoth
Quominus
.
And a most exquisite organ, said the Man
Machine
it
plays so many different tunes. Who
would have thought that the same thing could
signify the propensity of a toad, a snail, and a wife
for staying at home, and the propensity of a goat to
climb perpendicular rocks and browse upon the
edge of precipices?
The next organ essential to the perfection of
woman, or, as the learned say, the
sine qua non
of
a good wife, is
What? said the Man Machine, rubbing his
hands eagerly.
The organ of adhesiveness, which is just above
the lambdoidal suture. It is designated by No.
4, on the phrenological map of the skull.
Have you got the map with you? I should like
to take a look at it, said the other, again
interrupting
him.
I will show it you, when I have finished my
story, said the doctor, and went on. I cannot
better define the indications of this organ than in
the words of one of Dr. Gallgotha's lectures.
The faculty of adhesiveness, says the doctor,
produces the instinctive tendency to attach one's
self to surrounding objects, animate and inanimate.
Those persons in whom it is very strong, feel an
involuntary impulse to embrace and cling to the
object of their affections. In boys it frequently
indicates itself by attachment to dogs, horses,
rabbits
,
squirrels, birds, and other animals. In girls it
shows itself in affectionate embraces of
Of what? interrupted the Man Machine
eagerly
.
Of dolls, replied the other. It is stronger, and the
organ is larger in women than in men. When too
strong it produces the disease called nostalgia
What's that? asked Mr. Quominus.
When feeble, Dr. Gallgotha says, it turns men
into hermits, and women into nuns. The organ is
large in Mary Maginnes.
[16]
[16]
It may be as well to apprise the reader in general, that
nearly
the whole of these phrenological data has been borrowed from
Mr. Le Peigne, by the author of a work lately published, called
Elements of Phrenology.
Ed
.
27*
The last cerebral development I was resolved to
insist upon in the phrenology of my wife, was the
organ of order.
Where is that to be found? asked Mr.
Quominus
.
It lies contiguous to the angle of the frontal bone,
and indicates a love of regularity, and habit of
keeping
every thing in its proper place. Doctor
Gallgotha
established this indication from seeing a Dutch
woman, who had a large development of this organ,
actually faint away at finding a chair out of its place.
It is also prominent in the
Termes Bellicosus
, the
honey bee, and all animals and insects that live in
communities. No animal, however, exhibits it in
such perfection as the beaver.
And did you get such a wonder for a wife?
asked the Man Machine.
You shall hear, returned the other. It was a long
time, and not until I began almost to despair of
meeting a woman phrenologically perfect, that I
succeeded to my wishes. At length, in passing
through a country where I was a stranger, I
encountered
one that answered exactly to all these
indications. I inspected her cerebral
development
and found all the indications quite perfect.
This was all I wantedI made no further inquiries,
being determined to put down the enemies of the
sublime science by actual demonstration.
Had she the
sine qua non
, as you call it? quoth
the Man Machine.
Beautifully developed, said the other. I made
short work of it. We were married out of hand,
and after being acquainted just long enough for me
to examine the cerebral development. I brought
her to town in triumph, as a being destined to
insure the triumph of the sublime science. I took
a fine house, and lectured to all the company I
could persuade to visit us, upon her irrefragable
cerebellum. So immersed was I for some time in
this extatic scrutiny, that I forgot my business, my
partner, and my clerk, until a friend came to me
one day, and with a face of concern, hinted that
our business was going on at a sad rate. Your
partner, said he, is either a rogue or an
ignoramus
and
your clerk spends his time at taverns and
brothels. Every thing is at sixes and sevensyou
will be ruined to a certainty, if you are not so
already
.
What! in spite of the cerebral
development
.
In spite of fate, replied my friend.
Pshaw! replied Ifate is a mere flea-bite
compared
to phrenology. He left me shaking his head
with an air of great concern.
I confess, notwithstanding my reliance upon the
cerebral development, I was a little uneasy at these
warnings of my friend. My wife too did frequent
violence to the organs of order and adhesiveness
for she left my house at sixes and sevens, and
seemed
to adhere to nothing but her own will. We
never had any children, so that I can't say how it
was with the organ of philoprogenitivenessand as
to that of amativeness, the truth of its augury was
demonstratedonly there was a little mistake
she embraced her lap-dog ten times oftener than
me. I shall pass over the remainder of my story
with all brevity, as it is not very pleasant to my
recollection, nor very material to my purpose of
establishing the practical truths of the infallible
science. My partner dissolved the firm about two
years after my marriage, by running away, and
leaving me answerable for debts which consumed
all I had in the world. He took with him every
thing he could lay his hands on; even my
invaluable
clerk with the beautiful development,
accompanied
the second Cosmo De Medicis, and I never
saw either of them again.
My house and furniture, together with all my
phrenological specimens, not excepting my wife,
soon departed from me, either by course of law or
course of nature. Though entirely destitute of the
organ of combativeness, she held John Doe and
Richard Roe at bay three whole days, and defended
the fortress like another Jane de Montfort. At
length, however, they came to terms. She
stipulated
for permission to march out with bag and
baggage
,
and I took it for granted that, like the women
of Abensburg, she would leave all her finery and
carry me off on her back triumphantly. But I was
sadly disappointed, when, after packing up her
clothes, trinkets and other things exclusively
appertaining
to herself, she came up to me, and making a
low courtesy, bade me good bye.
Where are you going, my dear? said Iwhat
will you do alone in the world, without your
faithful
husband. You had better stay and
accompany
me to prison.
No, thank you, my dear, as much as if I did,
replied she, making another low courtesyI am
too prudent a woman to trust myself alone in the
world, and am not very fond of retirement. One of
my husbands is waiting outside with a hackney
coach to take me home with him.
One of your husbands! cried IWhy, how
many have you?
A baker's dozen, replied she, gliding gracefully
out of the room.
A baker's dozen! cried the Man Machine
this comes of the organ of amativeness and the
sine qua non.
Well, said Mr. Quominus gravelyI
suppose
this put an end to all doubts as to the infallible
auguries of the cerebral development?
It did, replied the otherit established their
truth in my mind beyond all contradiction or
question
.
You don't say so, quoth the other.
But I do say so, cried Le Peigne, waxing rather
warmI affirm that the failure of my experiment is
the best possible proof of the sublimity of the
science
.
Of its sublimitynot of its truth, observed
Quominus.
Of its truth, sir. Every failure in
demonstrating
the truth adds to the certainty of its existence,
and leads most directly to a discovery. You might
as well say that there was no new world before
Columbus discovered it, as that nothing is true
until it is proved to be so. The science of
phrenology
may be compared to an undiscovered
country
a
A terra incognita, said the Man Machine.
An island of Atalantis, said Quominus.
An Utopia, cried the other.
A survey of a canal across the Alleghanies,
cried Quominus.
A rail-way over the Atlantic, roared the Man
Machine.
A mountain in the moon, vociferated
Quominus
.
But really, said the Man Machine, after a short
pausewere you reallyexcuse mewere you
really such a goose as to believe in the cerebral
developments after they had treated you so
scurvily
?
What could possess you?
The same spirit that possessed you to believe
in the perfectibility of man, and your friend in the
perfection of reason.
And you don't believe in the perfectibility of
man, roared the Man Machine.
Nor in the perfection of reason, exclaimed
Mr. Quominus, half laughing, as if he did not believe
in it himself, though he did not like other people
to call it in question.
No more than I believe the moon is made of
green cheese, and peopled with Welsh rabbits. But
I do not wonder at your putting these visionary
follies
and absurd theories in competition with my
demonstrative science, since I perceive quite
plainly
,
each of you is entirely destitute of the organ of
comparison.
No organ of comparison! exclaimed the Man
Machine.
No organ of comparison! cried Quominus.
No, sirnor of witnor ordernor time
nor tunenor causalitynor constructivenessnor
colouringnor numbernor idealitywhich is
synonymous with genius. Your cerebral
developments
are horridyour indications abominable
your cerebellums no better than pine barrensand
the backs of your heads have no more meaning
than other people's faces.
No genius! cried the Man Machine.
A pine barren! exclaimed Quominus.
He is terribly under the influence of the
counteracting
principles.
He is worse than Caveat Emptor, or Locus in
quo.
I could make better skulls out of a potatoe,
said Le Peigne, furiously.
Or the head of the Lovely Nancy, retorted
the Man Machine, who with Quominus burst into a
roar of laughter at this lucky hit.
I have seen people keep their temper when the
argument was against them, but I never knew even a
philosopher that could stand two to one against him
in a laugh. Le Peigne lifted up a stout ivory
headed
cane with intent, as I believe, to let it fall on
the cerebral development of the Pupil of
Circumstances
;
but that expert Spinning Jenney warded
off the blow with his cocked hat, which was
unfortunately
knocked overboard, and the cane lighted
directly on the combative organ of the Perfection of
Reason. Each of the Wise Men now started up
for the purpose of defending his person, or his
theory
;
and in the confusion the jolly Bowl, being left
without a cockswain, imperceptibly drifted into the
eddying circles of a great whirlpool, supposed to be
the Maelstrom of Norway. Here, after whirling
round and round for some time, it unluckily struck
against the head of the Man Machine, who was
dodging
to avoid a second application of the ivory
headed
cane. The concussion of these two hard bodies
proved fatal to the Bowl, which parted exactly in
two pieces, just as it floated to the centre of the
vortex, in which the whole party was suddenly
engulphed. The last vestige of them that was
seen, was the tip of the ivory headed cane, which
the doctor seemed still flourishing in vindication
of the infallible science.
What became of these renowned philosophers is
not precisely known. The most probable, and at
the same time, the most consoling opinion is, that
this tremendous vortex was one of the great avenues
to the newly discovered
Concentric Spheres
;
and that, consequently, there is a possibility at least
that our illustrious trio may have found in some
other world, what they vainly sought in this.
THE END.